Language: <F P=105>Russian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Table of Contents and select chapters from special </F>
supplement of journal OBOZREVATEL-OBSERVER: "National Security: 
Russia in 1994"] 
  [Text] Table of Contents 
  Summary of the special supplement in English [not 
transcribed] 4 
  List of subscribers of the OBOZREVATEL-OBSERVER information 
and analysis journal [not translated] 
  12 
<H5>  To the Reader </H5>
  17 
<H5>  National Security: Russia in 1994 </H5>
<H3>  I. Preservation of Civil Peace, of an Integral and 
Independent Russian State </H3>

  1. Preservation of Civil Peace and Accord 
  23 
  2. Improvement of the Federal Structure, Prevention of 
Regional Fragmentation 
  26 
  3. Elimination of the Seats of Interethnic Conflicts 
  31 
  4. Russia Within the System of Newly Independent States 
  37 
  5. Ways to Form a Civil Society 
  41 
  6. The Status of Crime and Russia's Security 
  44 
<H3>  II. Formation of Genuine Spiritual Principles and Values of 
the Russian People </H3>
  1. Need for a National Idea 
  49 
  2. The Role of Science. Russia's Scientific and 
Technical Priorities 
  52 
  3. Guidelines for Politicians in the Education Sphere 
  57 
  4. Culture in Russia 
  60 
  5. The Growing Role of the Orthodox Church 
  64 
<H3>  III. Stabilization of the Socioeconomic Situation in the 
Country </H3>
  1. Stabilization and Recovery of the Economy 
  71 
  2. Structural Reorganization of Russia's Economy 
  74 
  3. Agrarian Reform 
  80 
  4. The Stabilization of Finances 
  82 
  5. Social Policy 
  89 
  6. Toward Realism in Economic Policy 
  92 
<H3>  IV. Protection of the Interests of Russian-Speaking 
Population </H3>
  1. The Contemporary Status of Russians 
  95 
  2. Political Aspects 
  100 
  3. Toward Integration Via Coordination 
  101 
  4. Problems of Migration 
  102 
  5. Problems of Russia's Economic Mutual Relations with 
CIS Countries 107 
<H3>  V. The Creation of Favorable International Conditions for 
the Implementation of Reforms in Russia </H3>
  1. Existing Realities 
  109 
  2. National Interests 
  112 
  3. Foreign Policy 
  114 
  4. Threats to State Stability and Security. Measures for 
Their Neutralization 
  118 
  5. Disarmament Problems 
  124 
  6. The Need To Improve the Mechanisms for Managing 
Military Organizational Development 
  128 
<H5>  Challenges and Potentials </H5>
  130 
<H3>  Appendix I. Tables of Contents of the journal OBOZREVATEL 
for 1993 [not translated] </H3>
  137 
<H3>  Appendix II. RAU-Corporation in 1993 [from the 
Corporation's annual report [not translated] </H3>
  163 
<H5>  To the Reader </H5>
  The Federal Assembly is beginning its work at a crucial and 
dramatic period of Russia's history. The decisions to be 
adopted by the legislative and executive organs of power will, 
to a large extent, determine not only Russia's future but also 
whether we will remain plunged into crisis or whether a slow and 
painful recovery will begin -- this is the question. Let us 
recall that 1992 has gone down in Russia's history as the year 
when mortality rate exceeded birth rate for the first time ever 
in peacetime. The situation deteriorated still further during 
the first nine months of 1993 -- deaths have already exceeded 
births by 500,000. The existence and survival of the 
nation itself is in jeopardy. 
  Before a cure can be started, it is necessary to arrive at 
an 
accurate diagnosis, in other words to appraise soberly and 
without prejudice the situation in which the country finds 
itself. To understand the causes of such tragic events. It is 
necessary to abandon the habit of making analysis and appraisal 
fit in with the goals pursued by different political parties. 
The interests of the country and of the people as a 
whole must, at long last, come to the foreground in deed 
and not just in words. 
  On this basis it will become possible to take the path 
toward 
accord between different political forces. After all, due to 
the existing split, it is impossible to elaborate a correct 
policy and pool efforts to implement a joint program for 
extrication from the crisis. 
  The following must be one of the main principles of state 
policy at this stage: Protection of the country's national 
interests on the basis of science, pragmatism, and national 
accord. 
  The authors' collective does not in any way claim that the 
material it offers is consummate or complete. We have attempted 
to identify approaches toward the solution of problems. Some of 
them are only outlined in the text. The important point is that 
those in whom the right to make decisions is vested should be 
given an opportunity to choose from the broadest possible 
range of substantiated proposals. 
  Unfortunately, today there are frequent occasions when 
incorrect and wrong decisions are not only proposed but are also 
adopted, with the consequence that the state and society suffer 
afterwards. In order to avoid this, it is necessary to 
encourage by all possible means the elaboration of various 
drafts and options for political decisions by independent 
experts and submit them for broad discussion. 
  Such an approach is especially important when working on the 
complex problems of the state's security and development 
strategy since many important questions have hitherto been 
studied and practically resolved in isolation, and this has 
caused and continues to cause enormous harm. It would seem, for 
example, that the correct decision to attain parity with the 
NATO countries has resulted in a sharp weakening of economic 
security. The pursuit of gross indicators and the lack of a 
systematic and intelligent concept of the habitat have produced 
ecological disasters with the most serious impact on the 
biosphere as a result of anthropogenic activity (Chernobyl, 
territories in the Far North, and virtually all industrial 
regions). 
  All this was apparently undertaken for the sake of the 
security of the country as a whole, although it had a negative 
effect on it, let alone the irrational expenditure of vast 
quantities of material resources. 
  Look at the latest examples. While talking about conversion, 
we have in reality ruined the military-industrial complex, 
withdrawn from the world arms markets, and are now incurring 
huge foreign currency losses because the market has been 
captured by the Western countries. 
  To curb inflation.... How could anyone object to this? But 
the methods used to implement this concept have become one of 
the factors paralyzing the economy, which has led to strikes and 
the shutdown of enterprises with all the ensuing consequences. 
  Neither the president, nor the Federal Assembly, nor the 
government, nor any other state organ, comprising the most 
competent and experienced people, could elaborate in depth and 
comprehensively consider and adopt substantiated decisions on 
questions of state security unless the sessions of these organs 
are preceded by a thorough scientific elaboration of the 
problems under consideration. 
  There is also a need for consultations with scientific 
institutions and leading scientists and specialists. A series 
of questions also require international cooperation, because in 
our time it is impossible to contain the elaboration of security 
problems only within the national framework. 
  History has proved that it is impossible to achieve 
security for the country and peace and tranquillity for its 
citizens by military force alone. This is easy to comprehend if 
the term "security" is extrapolated to the individual, the 
nation (the people, the state), and the international community. 
  A nation can achieve tranquility and function normally only 
if it is confident that it will not be subjected to devastation 
by war and that it will not die out from an AIDS epidemic or as 
a result of an ecological crisis; that its economy will undergo 
stable development and will not only save the country from 
famine and ruin but will also prevent any potential aggressor's 
illusions about the likelihood of winning a war against it; that 
a developed system of legislation and legality will protect the 
nation from unbridled crime and will ensure the harmony of the 
interests of all strata of society, of all peoples of Russia, 
and of each individual. 
  In this special supplement to the RAU Corporation's 
information and analysis weekly OBOZREVATEL-OBSERVER, experts 
from centers and authors of the journal offer their 
own alternative strategy for Russia's extrication from the 
crisis. It is meant for people elaborating and adopting 
political decisions or actively participating in their 
preparation. Primarily for deputies of Russia's Federal 
Assembly. Thus, this supplement is a concept of Russia's 
development in 1994 and a kind of digest of ideas and materials 
by the Corporation's creative collectives. 
  With most profound respect for our subscribers, readers, and 
opponents, 
  [Signed] Doctor of Historical Sciences A. Podberezkin, RAU 
Corporation president and academician of the Russian Academy of 
Natural Sciences 
<H5>  National Security: Russia in 1994 </H5>
  Today, more than ever before, we need a critical analysis of 
the path we have traversed and a clear objective for society's 
further development. After all, we find ourselves at an 
historical crossroad: There is no turning back, but we still 
have to choose the new road. Within a very brief period of 
time, the country has moved from one historic period to another: 
  -- there has been a radical change of state structure; 
  -- an end has been put in Russia to the previous political 
system, which was underpinned by the CPSU's monopoly of power 
and ideology; 
  -- a headlong change is under way in the correlation of 
forms 
of ownership in Russia and, correspondingly, in the entire 
system of social interrelations; 
  -- there is a growing accumulation of interethnic 
contradictions within Russia and of problems with former USSR 
republics which are now sovereign states; 
  -- there has been a fundamental change in Russia's position 
in the world community and in its mutual relations with foreign 
states. 
  In this context it is necessary to clearly define the 
current 
and long-term Russian national interests which correspond with 
the interests of individual citizens and of society as a whole. 
It is necessary to highlight those on which the very existence 
of our state depends. 
  In our view, the main point today is to prevent the 
weakening 
and collapse of the Russian State. But how is this to be 
avoided? 
  Having defined the priorities, it would be expedient to 
elaborate a program of reforms in the interests of society as a 
whole and not in the interests of individual groups. This 
program will obviously be nationwide. It must be comrehensible, 
realistic, and pragmatic, it must not be burdened by any 
political bias. Citizens have the right, and even the duty, to 
know what kind of "bright" future they are offered, how will 
reforms be implemented, and how long they will take. They are 
fully entitled not only to ask questions about all this but also 
to altogether disagree with the proposed program and ultimately 
to demand an account of the government's activity. 
  The way to national accord must be sought on the basis of 
respect for the individual and each citizen's rights regardles 
of party, religious, or national affiliation. 
  What we need today is a government capable of finding a way 
out of the crisis. Only a program geared to the needs of the 
majority of the population will enjoy the population's support. 
This is also the only way to achieve the consolidation of all 
progressive forces. It is necessary to curb inflation, restore 
confidence in the ruble, and create a normally functioning 
financial-state mechanism geared to support for producers rather 
than for dealers. 
  How do we propose to begin? 
  FIRST, to abandon the excesses of political struggle and to 
strengthen legality, law and order, and elementary executive 
discipline without which any power is doomed to anarchy, in 
other words to strengthen the state. 
  SECOND, to undertake a series of measures to improve living 
conditions for the Russian Federation's citizens, and primarily 
for the least well-off section -- pensioners, children, the 
sick, and those unable to work. 
  THIRD, to uphold Russia's unity and its economic and 
political independence. 
  FOURTH, to revive Russia's spiritual potential. 
  THE MAIN THREAT is the weakening of power and statehood. Any 
weakening of any of the branches of power means the weakening of 
power and statehood as a whole. It is extremely shortsighted to 
sow the branch on which you are perched. It would be much wiser 
to reciprocally strengthen the representative, executive, and 
judicial branches of power. 
  We offer for your attention an analysis of the situation and 
a package of measures to strengthen the state. 
<H3>  Section I: I. Preservation of Civil Peace, of an Integral 
and Independent Russian State </H3>
<H6>  1. Preservation of Civil Peace and Accord </H6>
  Armed conflicts and local wars are increasingly often waged 
along Russia's borders. The fatherland is on the threshold of a 
war which could begin either on its borders or beyond them. It 
has, in fact, already begun. Therefore, the main 
task today is to prevent its escalation into all-out 
war. For this purpose we need primarily national 
unity and accord. No matter how the situation in the 
country may develop, it is impermissible to make the state 
dependent on "victory" by different views or political forces. 
Politicians and their ambitions, even the most outstanding 
ones, come and go, but Russia lives on. Any political victory 
would turn into defeat if a blow is dealt on statehood and 
society slides toward confrontation. 
  It is impossible to achieve stability and accord in society 
unless an end is put to the division into "ours" and "theirs," 
into "correct" and "guilty." There is already widespread use of 
the terminomoly and methodology of psychological warfare, which 
are used during preparations for the conduct of combat 
operations against opponents who will have to be sooner or later 
destroyed. The division of citizens into "victors" and 
"vanquished" is a state crime, because it leads directly to 
civil war. 
  In order to avoid this and halt this movement toward direct 
confrontation, leading politicians should be made to, 
first, abandon personal (party) interests 
in the conduct of affairs and promote state interests 
to the foreground. Second, to find within themselves 
the courage to cease the endless search for "enemies" and 
declare the responsibility and repentance of all for 
the catastrophe which has befallen Russia. Our history shows 
that precisely this spiritual-moral approach has always 
underpinned Russia's extrication from crisis. 
  In this context it is necessary to impose a direct 
legislative ban on the propaganda of enmity equating 
it with calls for civil war, and introducing penalties for 
the publication of unverified information detrimental 
to the state and to civil peace (but without preventing 
journalists engaging in criticism based on facts). 
Democracy and its principles must become a means for 
strengthening rather than weakening the state. 
  Not a single political force can or should claim 
to be absolutely correct, and consequently to exercise absolute 
power. It is necessary to consolidate all forces in society 
without dividing them into "reds," "whites," "browns," and so 
on. This approach has proved pernicious for our statehood over 
the last few decades. 
  The economic chaos today has been compounded by interethnic 
conflicts, the collapse of moral foundations and cultural 
heritage, and finally the crisis of political power. 
  Instead of a middle class which, in all civilized societies, 
comprises the scientific, technical, and creative 
intelligentsia, skilled workers, and entrepreneurs, we have 
created a minute privileged stratum of dealers while the 
remaining strata are undergoing headlong lumpenization. At no 
time and in no place has this path ever created a reliable 
support for democracy and state power in society. It is 
paradoxical but for many years on end the state has 
pursued an antistate policy aimed at the disintegration and 
elimination of its most important institutions: the Army, 
national domestic policy, and the state security system. 
  The most acute problems facing the state today are: 
  a) to prevent a civil war; b) to strengthen 
the state institutions; c) to prevent Russia's 
collapse; d) to overcome the socioeconomic crisis and 
save the nation; e) to preserve science, culture, and 
education. 
  Cadres pose an especially acute problem. When promoting 
people to the levers of state administration, society envisages 
a system of measures to train administrative cadres. All over 
the world (including prerevolutionary Russia), any citizen who 
wishes to become a professional politician has to go through the 
school of upbringing, education, and practice before he is 
allowed access to political activity in local organs of power. 
In order to be launched into state-level orbit, the candidate 
has to climb a long ladder of practical work and training. In 
the United States, before a citizen can hold prominent office, 
he is polished in a prestigious university and in the course of 
work abroad, in the ministries (including the State Department 
and the CIA) or party apparatus, in Congress, and so on. The 
result is a skilled functionary meeting the needs of his 
society's ruling circles, but even here mistakes cannot be 
avoided. 
  The polarization of political forces and their growing 
confrontation (taking the most uncivilized forms in Russia) not 
only did not end with the elimination of the Russian Federation 
Supreme Soviet, but are actually intensifying. The 
election campaign considerably stimulated this 
process. Consequently, it is probable that one section of 
the ruling elite will succeed in crystallizing into a clearly 
defined party structure which will attempt to establish control 
first over the government and then over the president, de 
facto reviving the one-party political system. The 
accession of such a party to power will, in turn, inevitably 
lead first to a clash between the president and the Federal 
Assembly, and then to a leadership struggle within the ruling 
party itself. Unfortunately, the history of the USSR and the 
CPSU offers us numerous tragic examples of such development of 
events. 
  In this context, from the state's point of view, there is 
need for measures for legislative and political regulation 
of party activity, making provision for temporary 
suspension of the activity of all parties and 
sociopolitical organizations in the event that the nature of 
their political activity becomes damaging to the state's 
security. 
  This kind of decision -- and this is of fundamental 
importance -- must be made and monitored by the supreme organs 
of state power subject to one immutable condition: 
Political decisions must under no circumstances 
become the prerogative of executive and monitoring organs 
like the MVD [Ministry of Internal Affairs], the Ministry of 
Security, the Prosecutor's Office, and so on. In our view, the 
ideal authority to make such decisions would be the 
judiciary. 
  The real strengthening of the aithority and potential of 
the judiciary must become a priority task in Russia's 
state building. 
  Basing our analysis on the supreme interests of the state 
and 
the nation, we have concluded that firm authority is 
needed today. The most effective, indisputable, and 
bloodless form for Russia could be an interim presidential rule 
monitored by the Federal Assembly. 
  If we were to leave aside political bias and the ambitions 
of 
political leaders and forces desiring to make capital out of 
discord in Russia, we are confident that many of our fellow 
citizens would agree: Even an imperfect leader of the nation is 
better than a group of political leaders looking primarily after 
their own interests and corrupt elements straining to come to 
power. 
  During the most difficult times in Russia's history (feudal 
strife, invasions, the Time of Troubles), the country emerged 
victorious having mobilized all its resources and the 
spiritual potential of the masses under a single leader's 
leadership. The Soviet era was no exception, seeing that 
Stalin's dictatorship was objectively a positive factor of 
victory in World War II and of the country's reemergence from 
the ruins. 
  The press occasionally writes that Russia today feels not 
only the urgent need but even the inevitability of the 
appearance of an authoritarian regime capable of extricating the 
country from the crisis. 
  Some people assume that Russia has already taken this path 
and therefore the question is not how to avoid a transition to 
authoritarianism but to choose its most acceptable form 
and the method for transition. We, it is said, have 
already diverged from the possible forms and norms of a 
developed democratic state in the transition period. It is 
therefore necessary to accept this fact as an objectively 
existing reality and, second, to try and find a method -- 
peaceful and the one most acceptable for the state -- of 
transition to one of the more preferable forms of 
authoritarianism. 
  This assumes that new qualities will be demanded of the 
representative of the authoritarian form of rule: Leader of the 
nation rather than of a party; staunch defender of the state and 
its interests rather than leader of reformers; a builder rather 
than a destroyer, in other words a major revision of the 
priorities and values which have been dominant in the last few 
years. 
  The list of these character qualities could be logically 
extended to include a serious change in the disposition of 
political forces: The transformation of recent allies and 
friends into political opponents and the obverse -- the 
attraction of broad strata of professionals and specialists not 
committed to any one political party or movement. 
  It may happen that, instead of authoritarianism, we could 
end 
up with incessant struggle, intrigues by different groupings, 
parties, and juntas, and attempted coups -- with the State and 
the Nation at stake. Any such struggle, which has become an 
accepted form of existence for these leaders and a part of their 
essence, will inevitably and for a long time to come 
hinder and delay the stabilization of the situation in the 
country and will weaken our might. 
  The country's earliest possible extrication from the crisis 
and the gradual formation of durable democratic foundations of a 
civil society are important for Russia because real democracy is 
possible only in a society where there are no mortal 
threats against the State and the Nation. 
<H6>  2. Improvement of the Federal Structure, Prevention of 
Regional Fragmentation </H6>
  What should Russia be like following the disappearance of 
the 
superpower -- the Soviet Union -- from the world map? Its 
former Constitution calls it the Russian Federation. But is 
this really true? 
  A genuine federation is possible only when two or 
several states are united and, as a rule, it is based on 
lasting integration without the right to "secede." The autonomy 
of a union state's components is guaranteed insofar as it does 
not threaten the state's unity. Precisely this principle was 
used in forming the majority of federal states existing today: 
the United States, Switzerland, Canada, Germany. 
  True enough, some other states also style themselves as 
federations -- Argentina, Brazil, Mexico, Venezuela, India, and 
Spain, for example. Essentially, however, they are unitary 
states with a certain amount of autonomy for their provinces -- 
pseudofederations in the classic sense of the word. World 
experience has shown that a durable federal state is possible 
only when it is formed by autonomous states keen to 
unite by dint of various vitally important reasons. More 
recent historical examples already prove that any attempts to 
create a federation out of immature national and territorial 
formations inevitable engender instability and disintegration, 
which swiftly lead to the collapse of newly formed states or the 
formation of a unitary state. 
  The Soviet Union was a federation only in name, proclaimed 
by 
its Constitution, but in essence was, in our view, a typical 
pseudofederation. It is well known that a treaty between a 
series of republics was concluded in 1922. But, in the strict 
juridical and legal sense, not a single one of the components 
agreeing to the union was a state. 
  As for the RSFSR [Russian Soviet Federal Socialist Republic] 
as one of the contracting parties to the creation of the USSR, 
from the very beginning it was also a pseudofederation -- both 
in form and in its inner composition. 
  The conclusion of the Federation Treaty in its present form 
did not solve the problem, either. With whom did the Federation 
components conclude the treaty? With the federal state 
structures, to be precise. If they represent a single state, it 
emerges that the Russians -- its numerically largest people, 
comprising more than 80 percent of the population -- are 
dispersed among the Federation components since their own 
statehood is not even mentioned. Furthermore, Tatarstan and the 
Chechen Republic did not sign the Federation Treaty, while the 
stance of a series of republics and regions as regards the 
distribution of powers is threatening the Russian Federation's 
unity. It is fair to ask: Is the newly emerging Russia not a 
worse variation of the same old pseudofederation? 
  It has to be objectively noted that, ever since the collapse 
of the Russian Empire, the ethnic Russians have been 
gradually losing their statehood. 
  This is the fundamental question of our community's 
development: In view of all that has been said above, will 
Russia be able to become a genuine federal state? 
  The fatherland's history contains several examples of 
attempts to impose a federal unification of territories -- 
during the Kievan period right until the invasion by the Golden 
Horde, during the Suzdal-Muscovy period, during the Time of 
Troubles, and in 1917 right after the February Revolution. 
  It is, of course, possible today to blame the Soviet power 
for failing to take everything into consideration when forming 
the sovereign republics, but the main point is that many 
peoples acquired or restored their statehood precisely thanks to 
the Soviet power. 
  The pull toward integration and unity of the peoples of both 
Russia and the former USSR stems from numerous factors. The 
territory which they inhabit -- Eurasia. Throughout the many 
centuries of their existence, these peoples have on many 
occasions united within state formations and have produced 
unique cultures and single spiritual areas. They perceive 
Eurasia as their "motherland-continent" whose fate is 
inseparable from the fate of each one of its peoples. 
Experience shows that whenever the Eurasian ethnic groups have 
failed to reach accord, their lands have become easy prey for 
aggressors. The struggle for Eurasia's repartition could 
disrupt the world geopolitical equilibrium and cause a global 
catastrophe. 
  Another common feature of Russia's peoples is the highly 
polyetnnic nature of all newly formed states. Only six of the 
multitude of Russian peoples claim more than 50 percent of 
indigenous population in their republics (the Chuvash account 
for 69 percent, the Tuvinians for 64 percent, the Komi-Permyak 
for 60 percent, the Chechen for 58 percent, the Buryat in 
Aga-Buryat Autonomous Okrug for 54 percent, and the Ossetians 
for 53 percent). The average "indigenous population" in all 
Russian Federation republics is 32 percent, and even less -- 
10.5 percent -- in autonomous okrugs. It is simply impossible 
to divide all this into some sort of state formations. The 
following conclusion suggests itself: Russia's peoples are 
destined to live in one state -- federal in spirit and form. 
  So, what are the ways to solve the national-state 
question in Russia? There are two main dangers apparent in 
the possible development of nationality processes today. The 
first is the uncontrolled explosion of Russian nationalism 
as a natural defensive reaction to the threat of Russia's 
fragmentation and to the insult of national dignity, taking 
the form of the Russophobia and chauvinism typical of some 
former Union republics and of individual national regions in 
Russia itself. But the establishment of nationalist 
dictatorships is no solution. The lamentable experience of such 
dictatorships and regimes in a series of states which emerged on 
the territory of the USSR offers convincing proof of this. 
Territorial and state collapse is, as a rule, the price that 
has to be paid for the triumph of "national ideas." 
  The second danger lies in the attempts to turn Russia back 
to 
its prerevolution state structure, dividing it into guberniyas. 
In practical terms, this would mean the forced colonization of 
national republics. The rights which non-Russian peoples have 
acquired can no longer be withdrawn or curtailed without 
tragic consequences for them and for the Russian nation. 
Russian or any other nationalism will not only lead inevitably 
to the destruction of Russia's integrity but will also render 
the statehood of these very peoples just a pipedream. 
  The ideal way to a genuine federal state is to conclude 
a full-blooded federation treaty between the 
republics. 
  Russia's krays and oblasts as Federation components 
must enjoy equal rights with the republics, with a 
possible subsequent establishment of new integrational 
formations (guberniyas, laender). The more extensive the level 
of self-government, the more lasting will be the real 
integration between Federation components, including the 
"Russian regions." 
  The comprehensivess of this integration eliminates the 
problem of the Russian nation's possible "self-dismemberment" in 
the event that krays and oblasts are elevated to the level of 
republics. Thus, federalism could be founded simultaneously on 
the national-state, national-territorial, and territorial 
principles, which would be most in line with Russia's specific 
features. There is need to constitutionally enshrine the rights 
of national groups and the guarantees of cultural autonomy. 
  In this process it will be important to sensibly 
distribute powers between central and local organs of power and 
administration. 
  Since the two organs of power -- parliament and government 
-- 
combine all the original features of a multinational state in 
the persons of deputies and members of the government, they 
would appear to personify to a large extent the components of 
the Federation and their peoples, and then the center's 
authoritarianism within the limit of its powers would be 
accepted with understanding. 
  On the other hand, authoritarianism in the form of a 
presidential republic in Russia's specific conditions could 
spark off conflicts which would be diffitul to overcome and, in 
the event of the adoption of decisions which may be 
disadvantageous for some of its components, it may even prompt 
national agitation and protest. 
  Nonetheless, experience shows that, at critical 
moments in history, authoritarianism as a temporary 
measure may be necessary and, furthermore, justified. 
  The formation of a genuinely federal Russian state will 
offer 
an opportunity to revive the largely lost ties with nearby 
foreign countries. The timing and extent of this new 
rapprochement of peoples from the former USSR will depend 
primarily on Russia's stability and prosperity. This will 
happen sooner or later and, when it does, the Eurasian continent 
will see the emergence of a new community of free peoples and 
states, qualitatively different from all others in the past, 
mainly due to the genuine federal principle underpinning its 
building. 
  If oblasts, even enlarged ones (Ural Republic, Far East 
Republic, and so on), were to be given the right to have their 
own parliaments, constitutions, embassies, and so on, this would 
run contrary to both international experience and common sense. 
Any sovereignization of administrative oblasts in today's 
conditions will lead to the Federation's transformation into a 
confederation. In light of the current weakening of power, this 
would be the quickest way to the state's collapse with all the 
ensuing economic and social consequences which would be 
extremely serious for all. Evidence of this can be seen in 
the consequences of the Soviet Union's collapse. 
  A strengthening of separatism is also possible even if 
components do not formally secede from the Federation, something 
which can already be noticed today. 
  What attitude should be taken toward the striving of the 
leaderships of some sovereign republics to take advantage of the 
federal state's weakening so as to expand their rights still 
further and acquire a special status in the Federation, 
something like "associate" members? 
  Practice has convincingly confirmed that any excessive 
expansion of components' rights leads to a weakening, and 
even the collapse, of the federation. Cases of secession 
from the federation by joint accord of all interested sides are 
isolated (the State of Singapore from Malaysia). Other 
attempted secessions have usually been put down by force (the 
Sonderbund in Switzerland, the southern states in the United 
States, Biafra in Nigeria, and so on) and, even if they did 
succeed on occasion, this was the result of military operations 
against the federation (the separation of Bangladesh from 
Pakistan in 1970). Naturally, this way to preserve the state's 
unity is unacceptable to us. 
  The states, laender, or provinces comprising federations 
abroad usually exercise only the rights which have been 
either vested in them by the central power or enshrined in the 
constitution on the basis of agreement between the 
components. There is a tendency toward curtailing the 
scope of these rights. They do not enjoy independence in 
international affairs. There are numerous instances when 
decisions by the supreme courts of such federations directly 
indicate that their components are not sovereign (Canada, 
Australia). In Nigeria, and with a view to blocking any ethnic 
separatism, the states' territory has been reshaped in such a 
way as to give them a nationally heterogeneous population mix. 
  Neither the Constitution nor the Federation Treaty of the 
Russian Federation makes provision for the components' right to 
secede from the Federation, and self-determination is exercised 
within the framework of a federal state which is not bound to 
unconditionally grant to a republic's population the right to 
separate, even if such a demand has been backed by the majority 
of the population in a referendum. Any such referendum is 
unlawful, and its results can have only a political, not a legal 
significance. 
  The threats to secede from the Federation which can be heard 
every now and again run contrary to both the Constitution and 
the Federation Treaty, therefore they have no legal effect, and 
-- in our view -- ought to be resolutely cut short. 
  Bearing in mind the vast advantages which the republics have 
already gained thanks to their membership of the Russian 
Federation, their leaders ought to abandon their attempts 
to further expand their rights to the point which is tantamount 
to secession, while the legitimate rights of republics and 
oblasts ought to be covered by additional treaties with the 
Federation. The force of law is better than the law of force -- 
the law enabling its use. 
  The extent of Federation components' rights is determined 
not through barter or some sort of deal resulting in their 
curtailment or expansion. It is clearly predetermined by 
the demands stemming from the principle of self-determination: 
It is impermissible to expand the rights of components at the 
expense of the interests of other nations and all peoples of the 
Federation, which also enjoy these rights. 
  The principle of self-determination protects the interests 
of 
all peoples and curbs national egotism. This is precisely why 
it remains the basis of nationality policy both in the Russian 
Federation and in the world community. 
  Life has proved that any rejection of the Federation on a 
national basis is, in our country at least, impossible today. 
Further advance toward the Federation can take the form of 
more effective protection of individuals' national rights, 
education of people in a spirit of cooperation and solidarity, 
use of two or even three official languages, the strengthening 
of legality, and so on. 
<H6>  3. Elimination of the Seats of Interethnic Conflicts </H6>
  The present status of interethnic relations in the Russian 
Federation and throughout the former Soviet Union's territory 
can be described as a zone of ethnic calamity 
undergoing a complex crisis, where domestic and geopolitical 
factors are intertwined. The economy's normal structure is being 
destroyed (irreversibly in some places) and, from the strategic 
viewpoint, this is more dangerous than the simple slump in 
production to which attention is primarily drawn. State 
institutions are being denigrated, and there is a decline of 
confidence in them and in their authority, which underpins the 
legitimacy of any democratic power. This applies not just to 
any single branch of power but to state power as such, 
without any distinction being drawn between "progressive," 
"democratic," "conservative," legislative, executive, or 
judiciary. Their fruitless confrontation only aggravates 
the discrediting of the state and of power as such. 
  It appears that the collapse of the USSR was neither 
predestined nor inevitable, despite claims by the "architects" 
of the collapse. 
  The selfsame processes of disintegration are today gathering 
pace also in the Russian Federation. In addition to the most 
complex knots of interethnic contradictions we have inherited 
from the past, equally acute problems develop as consequences of 
the current state of the economy, social life, politics, and the 
law. These conflicts are reproduced with growing acuteness and 
on an expanding scale. 
  A most important role here is played by political and 
ideological factors. The shoots of democracy and of 
civilized economics and politics, together with the people's 
hopes for national rebirth, have in many instances become 
hostages of extremist forces, sundry political 
adventurers, and criminal and corrupt structures. Many 
national movements, which emerged as forces pursuing the goal of 
preserving and reviving their people's spiritual originality and 
ensuring their social, cultural, and linguistic survival, have 
now descended to political radicalism and extremism. 
Anarchy and squabbles at federal level lead to the emergence of 
would-be local dictators playing the card of separatism, which 
often conceals nothing but a yearning for absolute power. 
  The ideologists of national "revival" go to extremes in 
their 
relentless battle for power and for access to assets being 
privatized or key positions. They are trying to assert the 
freedoms and rights of one people by trampling the 
freedoms and elementary human rights of other peoples and of 
people from other nationalities living next door to them. 
The leaders of national-democrats, who until only yesterday 
accused the Union center -- and at times even the whole Russian 
people -- of colonizing them and trampling their national 
rights, are today cynically taking actions which transform 
people of other nationalities and primarily the Russian-speaking 
population into second-class people, into outcasts. 
  Experience shows that unless the nationality problems, with 
which the extremists speculate, are resolved "from above" in 
relatively civilized forms, they will be resolved "from below" 
in distorted forms. 
  Despite all the criticism of the Federation Treaty, it is a 
compromise, an attempt to consolidate the balance of interests. 
On the one hand, it is intended to guarantee the process of 
self-government by peoples living in Federation components 
against unjustified administrative-bureaucratic interference by 
the center while, on the other hand, it is intended to prevent 
any national or religious diktat on the state and offer a 
guarantee against any actions ultimately leading to Russia's 
destruction as an integral unified state. Encroachments against 
the Federation Treaty continue to this day. Its destruction 
will pave the way to a new round of political 
confrontation and fruitless struggle. 
  Russia's traditions, even under the toughest regimes, have 
always included the preservation of diversity in the 
self-government of peoples and territories. 
  This political diversity is attainable only if the nations' 
interests are painstakingly taken into consideration and 
coordinated, and if their democratic cohabitation within the 
Federation's framework is guaranteed. At the same time, 
consideration for this originality should not become a cover for 
infringement of the interests of ethnic minorities and of human 
and civil rights and freedoms. The coordination of interests 
and the achievement of agreement presuppose mutual 
responsibility by all parties -- the federal power and the 
organs of power in republics and regions. A real obstacle to 
agreement is created not by the preservation of diversity but by 
the interests of narrow political and national elites pursuing 
goals which are far removed from their officially proclaimed 
ones. 
  On the geopolitical plane, interethnic strife only goes to 
promote the country's transformation into a raw-materials 
appendage of the world economy, a cesspool for the waste of mass 
culture, and a test site for ecologically dirty and dangerous 
technologies, and lead to loss of identity and of Russia's role 
in world politics. Integration in the world's culture 
must not have an obverse -- scorn for one's own history 
and the national dignity of one's own peoples. 
  It would appear that people who determine policy in the mass 
media are deliberately implanting the idea of despondency and 
hopelessness, trying to convince their audience that we are 
living in an uncultured state and only thanks to the 
West's humanitarian aid. 
  A scornful attitude toward history and disregard for the 
traditions, forms of economic management, ways of life, and 
rights of peoples and individuals can be discerned in numerous 
constitutional and political innovations. The ongoing 
destruction of the single constitutional area is alarming. 
Whereas politicians find it easy to adapt to any conditions, 
ordinary citizens are falling victim to constitutional arguments 
and political disturbances, and the price they are paying takes 
the form of loss of jobs, of property, and at times even of life 
itself. 
  The citizens' real participation in political decisionmaking 
is a most important political problem, on which the country's 
future democratic development depends. It is necessary to 
expand the opportunities enabling representatives of different 
peoples to publicize their own interests and their vision of the 
way out of the prevailing crisis. The representation of 
regions and republics as Federation components is not a proper 
substitute for the representation of peoples, be it at a 
constitutional conference or at some other forum. Suffice it to 
ask: How many peoples and how many Federation components do we 
have? After all, the interests of small peoples, divided 
peoples, and other communities must also be reflected in the 
constitutional and political processes. 
  There is a pressing need for a special forum of 
Russia's peoples to examine strategic, political, and legal 
questions from the angle of interethnic relations. Of 
course, this means not the restoration of totalitarianism but 
the restoration of the traditional, tried and tested values of 
the friendship of peoples, of values capable of rallying the 
representatives of all nationalities. 
  At present it is necessary to take advantage of any 
opportunity to halt the processes of disintegration and rally 
the representatives of various nationalities and political 
forces, parties, and movements around positive and constructive 
tasks. There can be no simple solutions to highly complex 
tasks although, unfortunately, illusions to this effect are 
still being nurtured at high levels of power. The solution of 
the nationalities question is one such super-complex task, 
demanding the mobilization of intellectual and political energy. 
Tomorrow the quest for acceptable solutions will be more 
complex, the price will be higher, and the costs will be great. 
  The actual transplanting of the philosophy of "national" 
state ("Russian," "Tatar," "Chechen," and so on) on Russian soil 
is potentially dangerous for interethnic peace in Russia. 
  The causes of conflicts vary: 
  -- historical specific features of the formation of 
territories which have today proclaimed themselves independent 
republics (the sources of conflicts in the Dniester Region, in 
Ossetia-Ingushetia); 
  -- the "automatic" recognition of state border status for 
administrative borders within the USSR is fraught with conflicts 
for all former republics; 
  -- acute confrontation between lay and religious components 
in the new political elites and in former and new political 
groupings (Tajikistan); 
  -- historically aggravated ethnopolitical problems (the 
Baltic countries); 
  -- revival of historical territorial disputes (the Karabakh 
and Crimea problem) 
  -- struggle around the problem of state languages (Ukraine, 
Kazakhstan, a number of now independent republics); 
  -- disputes over the division of Union property, including 
Army property (Russia-Ukraine); 
  -- ethnoconfessional disputes and trends toward the 
formation 
of theocratic states. 
  The cumulative outburst of national feelings 
following the release of communist "clamps" and the uncontrolled 
liberal democracy leading to extreme manifestations of militant 
nationalism underpin the growing national conflicts and clashes 
in the geopolitical area of the former Soviet Union. 
  It is possible to forecast three models for the 
development of potential meganational conflict in the future. 
  The first is associated with the exacerbation and 
growth of ethnic conflicts with differing typology. The lowest 
common denominator comprises violent armed attempts to reshape 
the existing ethnopolitical area. It is obvious that this 
development leads to disintegration of all political, social, 
and technological ties (contemporary Yugoslavia is an example). 
  The second model is associated with the 
reintegration of totalitarianism. This violent way of dealing 
with the nationality problem can take the form of 
military-nationalist regimes ("ethnojuntas"). The most negative 
consequences would stem from the establishment in Russia 
of a nationalist regime with the ensuing restoration of a 
neo-imperial system throughout the geopolitical area. 
  The third model is the sole peaceful alternative, 
presupposing a democratic development. Ethnic tension is eased 
through the building of federal states in a series of former 
Union republics on a democratic rather than a national basis. 
In this process, ties between the independent republics could 
be built according to the model of "permeable" and tolerant 
sovereignty. The desire to prevent an economic collapse in 
post-Soviet states and a complete break of technological ties 
between them and to ease pressure by the "Russian factor" in 
former Union republics will intensify in the face of the threat 
that nationalist regimes may be established. 
  It would be possible, within the third model's framework, to 
halt the catastrophic disintegration of the "Union" economic 
area and to prevent the violent armed dismemberment of the 
single ethnic area on the territory of the former USSR. 
  In our view, it is from these positions that the 
Russian state position on the question of the "Russian diaspora" 
in nearby foreign countries must be elaborated. The USSR's 
disintegration has shifted the Russian nationality problem onto 
a new plane. In the "imperial" Union, the Russians played the 
role of the ethnic integrational components of Union statehood. 
At the same time, an "expansion" of the Russian ethnic habitat 
occurred within that state's framework (more than 50 percent of 
migration flows in the USSR involved the movement of persons of 
Russian nationality). 
  For the first time ever in Russia's entire history we have 
witnessed a breakdown of the Russian ethnic area on a massive 
scale, which in itself is fraught with potential conflicts. In 
several instances the currently independent states are 
forming not democratic but purely national states. This 
inevitably leads to large-scale discrimination against the 
Russian population. We see a "Russian problem" emerging before 
our very eyes, a problem which involves: 
  -- artificial dismemberment of the formerly common Russian 
ethnic area; 
  -- transformation of a considerable mass of Russian 
population in nearby foreign countries into either 
"second-class" citizens (this began everywhere with the laws on 
state languages) or altogether stateless persons; 
  -- the squeezing out of Russians from a series of newly 
formed states; 
  -- potential nationality conflicts in these states and 
intensification of Russophobia; 
  -- inevitable emergence of Russian national movements in 
these states; 
  -- fusion of these movements with a Russian national (or 
nationalist) movement in Russia itself; 
  -- transformation of the "Russian problem" into a decisive 
factor of domestic political struggle in Russia. 
  Two extreme opposites are possible in the development of 
this 
process: 
  a) large-scale interethnic conflict (a series of 
national wars) across part of the former USSR's territory with 
the ultimate establishment of a nationalist neo-imperial Russian 
domination; 
  b) further disintegration of Russia itself along 
nationality lines, which would render the future of 
Russians as a single people extremely uncertain. 
  A third option would be desirable and would result 
in the minimum possible conflicts. It presupposes: 
  -- establishing in the post-Union geopolitical area not a 
national but a multinational statehood taking the form of 
democratic federations (wherever conditions for it exist); 
  -- abandoning the absolute form of asserting the sovereignty 
of the "indigenous nation" and switching to positions of 
tolerant sovereignty of the whole people and all ethnic 
groups; 
  -- squeezing out of power any extremist nationalist 
groups (which has partly happened in Lithuania, for 
example); 
  -- forming an active Russian democratic political 
factor in all post-Union states; 
  -- pursuing a purposeful and thoroughly considered 
Russian policy on these questions. 
  The following guidelines for Russian policy are possible: 
  1. Introduction of state bilingualism in all newly 
formed states (primarily in Ukraine, Kazakhstan, Belarus, 
Moldova, Latvia, and Estonia). 
  2. Active support for the creation and consolidation 
of Russian-speaking communities including, in several cases, 
their cultural and national autonomy. 
  3. The granting by nearby foreign countries of dual 
citizenship on request to all persons who are citizens of Russia 
by birth, as well as to Cossack representatives. 
  4. Support of initiatives to form local national 
organs of administration and create Russian national local 
"communal administration" in places densely populated by 
Russians. 
  5. Appropriation of funds to support Russian culture 
and education (creation of Russian and Slavic universities, 
schools, newspapers, and so on). 
  6. Pursuit of a tough policy, even including economic 
sanctions, toward former Soviet states where civil rights are 
violated; adoption of a standard "package" of guaranteed rights 
and freedoms for all citizens of the republics, including the 
Russian population, with provision for the granting of 
preferential economic treatment (especially in relations 
with Latvia and Estonia). 
  7. A stepping up of Russian foreign policy efforts in 
support of justified demands for the obesrvation of human rights 
and freedoms in nearby foreign countries. 
  8. Immediate signing of agreements with former Union 
republics on questions concerning citizenship, protection of 
national minority rights, migration, legal aid, pension 
provision, reciprocal recognition of educational diplomas, 
opening of consulates. 
  9. Regular monitoring of positions taken by leading 
political forces in the republics on the "Russian problem. 
  10. Elaboration of short-, medium-, and long-term 
programs for the solution of the "Russian problem" throughout 
the post-Soviet geopolitical area. 
  These are just a few reflections on the conflict-free 
resolution of the "Russian problem." It is obvious that the 
Russian leadership will have to be prepared for counterdemands 
in connection with ethnic problems on Russian territory. 
<H6>  4. Russia Within the System of Newly Independent States </H6>
  Following the Union's disintegration into 15 so-called Newly 
Independent States [NIS], the words written by political 
scientist D. Simes (NEWSDAY) are still valid today: "...the 
`evil empire,' where power was based on violence and compulsion, 
has been replaced by several evils: the emergence of 
interethnic hatred and the clashing ambitions of different 
political elites. Millions of people have suddenly been deprived 
of a community. In these conditions, they have come up against 
intolerance and extremism. Bloody wars, accompanied by 
thousands of victims, are raging in different parts of the 
former Soviet Union." 
  It can hardly be expected that peace, prosperity, and 
tranquility will come to Russia or the other NIS in 1994. 
  Thus, according to data of the U.S. Department of Defense 
Defense Intelligence Service, there are forecasts of 12 
potential armed conflicts on the territory of the former USSR. 
It is estimated that 523,000 persons may be killed in military 
operations during these conflicts, 4.24 million may die of 
diseases, 88 million may be hit by famine, and the number of 
refugees may reach 21.67 million. 
  Ensuring their own safety and that of their families and 
friends is becoming an increasingly topical problem for 
Russians. Whereas this problem worried 31 percent of Muscovites 
in May 1993, this figure had already risen to 42 percent in 
September. 
  The economy is aggravating the situation, and it is still 
hard to expect any swift and major changes for the better here. 
Indeed, according to IMF data, virtually all basic indicators 
in the NIS had declined by an average of one-fourth in 
comparison with 1989-1990, while consumer prices increased 
1,284.6 percent in 1992; in 1993 the volume of GDP will decline 
by 13.7 percent and prices will increase by 940.6 percent. 
In Russia: GDP declined by 12.9 percent in 1991, by 18.5 
percent in 1992, and by 14.9 percent in 1993; monthly inflation 
in the Russian Federation stood at 18 percent in 1993. 
  Unemployment in Russia will affect 3.5-6 million persons 
according to government data and 10-11 million persons according 
to International Labor Organization data; the number of people 
employed in material production in Russia will be reduced by 26 
million in 1991-1995, according to forecasts by the Russian 
Academy of Sciences National Economic Forecasts Institute. 
  The restoration of the protective and reproductive 
functions for Russians is the sovereign state's basic task. 
  In what forms should these functions be restored on a new 
basis? On the basis of democracy and market relations. 
  However, commitment to democracy and market relations by 
itself is not a state idea which can unite multinational Russia 
in a unified state. The birth of specific methods of 
transformation, just like of a state idea, is painful nowadays, 
having to fight through the complexes of the past and the 
contradictions of the present. 
  The basic criteria in this process could be the minimization 
of social losses; the spiritual, humanistic, and moral 
orientation of transformations; and the balancing of the 
interests of the world community and of the Russian Federation's 
peoples. 
  Today, just like in 1991, Russia is facing the task of how 
to 
really become sovereign. An analysis of the past two years 
shows increasingly clearly that not a single one of the NIS, 
including Russia, was prepared either politically, or 
economically, or psychologically for sovereign existence. 
  The end of 1991 saw the formation of 15 protostates without 
borders, armies, monetary systems, infrastructures, state or 
national interests, full-blooded economies, and so on. It ought 
to be concluded that, even today, not a single one of these 
states is "full-blooded" in this sense. Consequently, in 1994 
just as in the two preceding years, their development will be 
determined by the following blocks of problems: 
  a) completing the formation of sovereign states with all 
state attributes; 
  b) creating an effective system of mutual relations between 
the NIS; 
  c) joining the political, military, economic, and other 
systems existing in the world. 
  "Openness" presupposes meeting the other states halfway, 
establishing new mutual relations with them, and expanding the 
sphere of these relations. Conversely, sovereignization of each 
NIS and its separation from the Union would mean drawing away 
from its former neighbors in the "communal state," a certain 
stepping up of autarky, breakdown of existing ties, and 
alienation. 
  This contradiction determined the logic of mutual relations 
between the NIS, which developed in two opposite directions. 
  First, there was an increasingly noticeable 
manifestation of interstate relations: establishment of customs 
regimes and borders. Most republics -- the Baltic countries, 
Ukraine, Kyrgyzstan, Moldova, Georgia, Azerbaijan, Belarus, 
Kazakhstan -- are introducing either national currencies or 
ersatz money on the basis of autonomous emission. The financial 
system is being structuralized. Balances of payments and trade 
are being determined, the former USSR's foreign debt assets and 
liabilities are being divided, debt accounting is being 
established, and so on. 
  Second, integrational feelings are growing, or at 
least the desire for an early break is weakening, in most former 
republics (except Latvia and Estonia, and partly Lithuania and 
Turkmenistan). 
  Nonetheless, today it is still premature to talk of 
integration or disintegration. What we are observing for the 
time being is the coexistence not of the NIS but of real 
authorities at different levels in these NIS. For example, how 
is it possible to treat as part of Russian-Kazakhstani relations 
the tripartite political-economic "union" of Kazakhstan, 
Tatarstan, and Bashkortostan, which was signed in August 1992 
and under which Bashkortostan ceased delivering oil products to 
Russian departments? 
  In 1994 it will be necessary either to make efforts to place 
Russia's relations with the NIS on the firm basis of 
international law, or to create "suprastate" structures with 
powers of authority. 
  It is more than likely that both forms will develop. In the 
immediate future, the formation of civilized relations between 
the NIS will be influenced by the following factors: 
  -- the incomplete disintegration of the USSR, as a result of 
which the subjects of interstate relations have not been finally 
defined. It is possible that their number may be either 
increased (if separatism intensifies in Russia, Moldova, 
Georgia, Ukraine, and so on) or reduced (if the processes of 
integration are intensified). Two fundamentally different 
principles are clearly manifest: the national-territorial 
(separation into autonomous republics and national-territorial 
formations) and the regional (separation into purely Russian 
regions). 
  Analysis shows that the Russian Federation's disintegration 
will hardly end up as a "sovereignty bandwagon" of autonomous 
formations. The "indigenous" etnnic groups represent even a 
relative majority in only 11 out of the 31 national-territorial 
formations. 
  Separatist moods are intensifying in proper Russian regions: 
in the Far East, the Urals, Kuban, Siberia. This has not been 
observed either in the NIS or in East European countries. 
  The following forecasts can be made for 1994: 
  -- retention of an economy with a price structure out 
of kilter with world prices. In 1993 Russia supplied 
products to the NIS at prices equivalent to 30-40 percent of 
world prices while purchasing from them at prices equivalent to 
70 percent of world prices, and consequently Russia had a 
positive balance of about 750 billion rubles in trade with the 
NIS in the first six months; 
  -- deterioration of the situation of etnnic Russians in 
the NIS, having become an ethnic minority there. The 
situation is being aggravated by the fact that virtually all the 
NIS, being multinational, have opted for the nationalist idea in 
strengthening the state. 
  -- "lukewarm" attitudes of the world community, 
primarily of the G-7 countries, toward individual NIS and 
the structure of mutual relations prevailing in the post-Soviet 
area. It ought to be noted in this context that, first, in 
1992-1993 the majority of NIS lost their illusions about Western 
aid but certain hopes remained that some would be integrated 
within the EC while others would draw closer to Asian countries 
and would enjoy their support; second, there is a steadily 
growing economic dependence on the West; and third, there is an 
increasingly clearly manifest tendency by the West to pursue 
mainly its own interests in relations with the NIS (for example, 
squeezing Russia out of the arms market and other technology 
markets, increasing purchases of energy sources from Russia at 
the expense of deliveries to nearby foreign countries, and so 
on). 
  Several systems of collaboration between the NIS will be 
formed in 1994. In one way or another, priority is being 
given to the problem of structuralizing the geopolitical area 
with the aim of boosting stability in the region and the 
management of political processes. 

<H6>    5. Ways to Form a Civil Society </H6>
  Terms like "civil society" and "citizens" have been 
increasingly actively used in our vocabulary recently, whereas 
in the past these terms were virtually unencountered in the mass 
media. And the word "citizen" was used primarily by law 
enforcement organs. At best it was taken to mean the juridical 
unit of the state system. 
  Civil society became the topic of study back in the late 
17th 
and early 18th centuries, in the works of Hobbes, Locke, and 
Hegel. These thinkers perceived the possibility of a relatively 
autonomous social life existing outside state control. 
  There are two approaches toward the civil society in world 
science today: 
  1. As a package of social relations counterposed to the 
state, in other words everything that cannot properly be 
described as state, power, politics, and bureaucracy. 
  2. As a form of existence for a bourgeois 
(market-democratic) society. 
  We support the first approach. 
  Civil society is a systemic element of a single metasystem 
(socium). It is that part of society which stands outside 
political authority, upholds primarily private interests, and 
guarantees the inviolability of private life. 
  Civil society and the state are two sides of one and 
the same coin. They complement one another. 
  Civil society includes: 
  -- voluntarily and spontaneously formed primary 
self-governing communities of people (family, cooperatives, 
associations, economic corporations, public organizations, and 
professional, creative, sports, ethnic, confessional, and other 
associations); 
  -- the totality of nonstate (nonpolitical) economic, social, 
spiritual, moral, and other public relations; 
  -- the productive and private lives of people, their 
customs, 
traditions, and morals; 
  -- the sphere of self-government of free individuals and 
their organizations, protected by the law against direct 
interference therein by state power and politics. 
  It is the civil society that destroys the statesmen's 
monopoly on power and balances state power with the power of 
private individuals and independent organizations. 
  A highly developed civil society in many advanced 
countries has ensured considerable protection of the 
private spheres of man's life against rigid regulation by the 
state. For this purpose, powerful protective associations 
have been formed within its structure (societies for the 
protection of human rights, societies for the protection of 
consumers, and so on). 
  Citizens of countries where a civil society has formed very 
rarely come in contact with their state. In the rest of the 
world, the population is forced into constant contact with it: 
The state constantly regulates something, it allows or bans 
things, even including people's place of residence and work, 
travel for leisure or education purposes, the acquisition of 
goods, and so on. 
  Following the October Revolution and the first steps in the 
implementation of the New Economic Policy [in 1921], our society 
adopted a line toward affirming geunine social protection for 
our working people. Generally speaking, despite all the 
complexities and deformities of subsequent development, these 
principles had a beneficial effect on our life. But left-wing 
orientations prevailed soon afterwards; a military-bureaucratic 
state was established in practice and the upper hand was gained 
by administrative power methods of government, bringing forth a 
series of phenomena alien to a civil society: global 
statization of economic and social life, mass repressions, and 
working people's alienation from ownership, the results of their 
labor, and political power. Virtually all citizens' association 
which were not approved by the top were destroyed, banned, and 
driven underground already by the late 1920's. This resulted in 
undermining the economic and social foundation of the civil 
society's vital activity and in destroying its social sphere, 
thus leading to serious stagnation. But totalitarianism failed 
to completely destroy all the institutions of civil society. 
Some of its structures proved amazingly durable and adaptable. 
  We have to form a civil society as a ramified network 
of social relations and institutions independent of the 
state, expressing the will and protecting the interests of 
citizens. Bearing in mind the population's low standard of civil 
culture and the bureaucracy's resistance, this process will be 
extremely protracted and very painful. 
  These are the conditions of a civil society's vital 
activity: 
  -- all its members must own specific property and 
the right to utilize it and dispose of it as they see fit. 
Thus, the foundation could be provided by privatization, which 
will lead to the creation of self-organizing structures of small 
and medium businesses independent of the state; 
  -- the existence of a developed and rich social 
structure, reflecting the diversity of the interests of 
different groups and strata. Life has confirmed that 
poverty and an undeveloped social structure have always provided 
a breeding ground for dictatorial regimes. 
  The social base of a civil society is the so-called middle 
stratum (middle class). It includes scientific, 
engineering-technical, management, and administrative personnel 
(not holding top administrative positions); salaried 
intelligentsia; urban and rural small owners (farmers); highly 
skilled workers; and some workers from the services sphere. The 
middle stratum in developed countries comprises 60-70 percent of 
the population. It is the middle stratum which not only ensures 
scientific and technical progress but also imparts economic and 
political stability to society; 
  -- sufficiently high level of development of 
individuals themselves, their inner freedom, and the ability to 
participate in the civil society's institutions. 
  Civil society is a self-organizing and self-developing 
system. Society itself will, to a large extent, create favorable 
conditions for it either through the state or despite 
it. Through the state -- via the adoption of necessary 
laws, the formation of democratic state structures, and the 
strict observance of universally accepted democratic norms and 
procedures by the state. This requires a strong state power. 
In the majority of European countries, civil society 
emerged in the conditions of authoritarian regimes actively 
supporting the institutions of civil society. 
  Its development can also occur despite the state -- through 
the formation of counterweights within the Constitution's 
framework, taking the form of independent associations and mass 
media and of oppositionist public democratic movements. By 
creating institutions of self-government, civil society also 
takes on a series of state functions, which could promote 
stabilization in our country. 
  The building of a democratic society presupposes the 
narrowing of the sphere of state regulation of citizens' vital 
activity, rather than the opposite. 
  Civil society is the supreme stage and most modern form of 
human community. Progress is associated with the withering away 
of the state, with its being absorbed within a civil society. 
<H6>  6. The Status of Crime and Russia's Security </H6>
  It is no accident that these two ideas have been juxtaposed. 
For a long time the concept of the struggle against crime in the 
country was officially built upon the "withering away" of 
criminal phenomena during the process of socialist and communist 
building. The struggle against it was assigned mainly to law 
enforcement organs, in other words it was based on repressive 
criminal law methods. The prevention of crime, which was 
discussed at such length, was never properly launched. This 
soft approach toward crime as a phenomenon without any deep 
economic and sociopolitical roots only drove the problem deeper. 
  The law enforcement organs were forced to manipulate 
statistics by artificially inflating or deflating the real 
indicators. 
  Crime in Russia reached an unprecedent scale in 1992. About 
2.8 million crimes were committed, and this figure included a 
more than 40-percent rise in the number of premeditated murders 
and an increase in the number of assaults and robberies by a 
factor of 1.6. The number of crimes per 100,000 members of the 
population increased from 1,467 to 1,857, in other words an 
increase by virtually one-third. 
  This trend persisted also in 1993, but the number of 
recorded crimes hardly reflects the true picture. 
According to some experts' estimates, recently there have been 
some 10-12 million crimes committed in Russia each year. The 
statistics do not include 80 percent of embezzlement cases, 90 
percent of fraud cases, and the overwhelming number of rape 
cases. 
  Some 352,000 persons have been killed or maimed by criminals 
during the last four years. More than 172,000 persons have been 
killed in road traffic accidents and fires. These figures 
are comparable only with war casualties. 
  The criminal world is becoming more professional and is 
acquiring modern technology and weapons. 
  The rising crime poses a real threat to national 
security and the policy of implementation of reforms. 
  It is perfectly obvious that crime, like a mirror, reflects 
the general condition of our society and primarily of its 
foundation -- the economy. Organized crime is 
becoming a special danger for society in the period of political 
and economic changes in the country. The Russian mafia is 
becoming more cruel and more brazen than its counterpart abroad. 
  More than 4,000 origanized criminal communities have been 
exposed in Russia, including over 1,000 with international and 
interregional links. One out of every four groups is protected 
by corrupt functionaries in different structures. According to 
experts' estimates, these relations involve up to 40 percent of 
entrrepreneurs and two-thirds of all commercial structures. So 
far the efforts to combat this growing threat have failed to 
produce any tangible results. 
  This threat has not even been legislatively defined. 
Therefore, we feel that the best possible definition is 
contained in the UN secretary general's report: 
  a) organized crime is the activity of associations or 
criminal individuals or groupings united on an economic basis. 
These groupings are highly reminiscent of gangs during the 
feudal era, which existed in medieval Europe prior to the 
emergence of the state. Economic benefits are gained by the 
supply of illegal services and goods, or of legal services and 
goods using illegal methods; 
  b) organized crime presupposes conspiratorial criminal 
activity, an hierarchy of structures, and coordination of the 
planning and execution of illegal acts; 
  c) organized criminal groupings strive to establish a 
monopoly or an almost complete monopoly on the supply of illegal 
goods and services to consumers; 
  d) organized crime is not limited just to pursuit of 
obviously illegal activity or the supply of illegal services. 
It also includes sophisticated types of activity like money 
laundering via legitimate economic structures and manipulations 
effected with the help of electronic means. Illegal criminal 
groupings infiltrate many profitable legitimate types of 
activity; 
  e) the criminals organized within groupings use cruel 
methods 
like threats, violence, and corruption. These methods can be 
either sophisticated and refined or, conversely, gross, direct, 
and blatant. They are used to gain economic benefit through the 
establishment of monopoly on the supply of illegal goods and 
services or by infiltrating legitimate types of activity and 
corrupting officials. Thus, whenever persons involved in 
organized criminal activity start engaging in legitimate 
commercial activity, they normally bring into it the methods of 
violence and intimidation. 
  There is an expansion of criminal organizations in Russia, 
and this is preconditioned primarily by the growth of 
sociopolitical instability and the weakening of state structures 
in the country at a time when the new democratic institutions 
are still weak. 
  The new categories of criminal activity include: 
  -- the illegal sale of weapons in conditions of instability 
both in Russia and in nearby foreign countries. The volume of 
illegal weapons sales has increased also as a result of ethnic 
and nationalist outbursts (Northern Caucasus, Georgia, 
Azerbaijan, Tajikistan); 
  -- the theft of and trade in stolen cars; 
  -- the theft of cargoes carried by railroad and motor 
vehicle transport; 
  -- the embezzlement and illegal exportation of historical 
and cultural valuables; 
  -- crimes committed with the help of electronic means; 
  -- fraud associated with credit cards and other financial 
documents; 
  -- the illegal disposal of dangerous waste; 
  -- the trade in human organs; 
  -- the "laundering" of illegally earned money; 
  -- the embezzlement and illegal exportation of raw 
materials, energy sources, and rare-earth and nonferrous metals; 
  -- the large-scale production of and trade in drugs; 
  -- insurance frauds; 
  -- money forgery; 
  -- smuggling; 
  -- fraudulent bankruptcies. 
  According to experts' estimates, the illegal circulation of 
drugs in the country amounts to 50-60 billion rubles a year, 
while more than 1.5 million Russian citizens regularly use drugs 
for nonmedical purposes. 
  An intensive process of fusing general criminal activity and 
economic crimes, drugs trafficking, and corruption is under way 
in the country. 
  There is no doubt that the negative effect of organized 
crime 
on our society is growing and affecting all its 
structures at individual, collective, and state levels, being a 
cynical form of lawlessness which maliciously violates citizens' 
rights and constitutional guarantees. 
  In this context, a special danger is posed by corruption and 
its consequences. The taking of illegal advantage of state 
office to gain personal benefit is a "breeding ground" for 
criminal groupings whose leaders consider the payment of sundry 
bribes to officials as one form of investing their funds. 
  We have at present a fine-tuned system of bribery in the 
credit-finance sphere, the trade network, transportation, and 
the organs engaged in foreign economic activity, licensing, and 
privatization. Going bribery rates have been established for 
allocation of land parcels, reregistration of enterprises, 
evasion of military service, assistance in concealing revenue 
from taxation, avoidance of customs regulations with impunity, 
and other illegal operations. Therefore, the corruption of 
officials from law enforcement organs and other state 
institutions engenders among the public profound mistrust 
in the authorities and undermines people's faith in the laws and 
the state. 
  Organized crime is manifesting a growing desire to 
infiltrate 
the country's economy. Arguments have been heard recently 
claiming that the investment of illegally earned funds in the 
legitimate economy would help its stabilization. But this is 
nothing but a myth. World experience shows that organized 
criminal activity destabilizes all economic spheres and disrupts 
the natural effect of market forces. The revenues of organized 
criminal groupings are suffuciently high, but these funds are 
withdrawn from normal circulation. All this gives urgency to 
the elaboration of specific long-term measures to combat 
organized crime. 
  Criminal groupings continue to actively penetrate society's 
social and political life. While pursuing their objectives, 
they are now influencing both election campaigns and the 
legislative processes by corrupting politicians and officials. 
Organized criminal groupings are also trying to extend their 
influence on the mass media. Thus, a process of organized 
crime's evolution into an antisocial system claiming leadership 
in the economy and in politics is now under way in Russia. 
<H6>  Some Conclusions </H6>
  The unchecked spread of crime in our country is a 
consequence of the overall weakening of the state and its power 
structures. The solution of this problem is a 
statewide task, whereby the actual plan of struggle against 
crime must become part of a program for strengthening and 
developing the Russian state, based on nationwide accord. 
  Of course, the specific activity to curb and uproot crime 
must be conducted and improved in parallel with all measures to 
strengthen Russian statehood, but must be implemented much 
faster and more efficiently. 
  There must be no delay in elaborating and implementing this 
plan. The present conditions in Russia and the CIS countries 
are creating a situation which is unique in human history and 
typical only of the former USSR republics in the light of the 
specific economic and political aspects of their history, the 
contemporary period of transition, and the future prospects. 
Organized crime and corruption are most dangerous by dint of 
their destructive long-term consequences for the individual, 
society, and the state. 
  The accumulation of vast wealth by individuals and clans in 
the world of organized crime inevitably leads to the need to 
politically protect their interests. Hence the 
desire to control power in the state, bribe 
high-ranking officials, and promote the recipients of bribes to 
higher positions. 
  Russia and the CIS countries are experiencing a 
multiplication of established criminal communities which either 
have, or are in the process of establishing, a financial base 
for the attainment of their goals, major arsenals of weapons, 
hierarchical structures, far-reaching conspiracy, and rigid 
discipline with vertical subordination and the use of terror, 
even including the physical elmination of people. 
  Organized crime, relying on general criminal activity and 
corruption, is beginning to permeate all cells of society and 
the state organism, extending to vitally important centers and 
spheres: the economy, finance, science and technology, culture, 
the Armed Forces, and so on. Therefore, the plan for struggle 
against crime must be specifically geared without 
overlooking a single one of these spheres. 
  Organized crime recognizes no borders. It is increasingly 
becoming not only interregional but also transnational, and 
therefore the struggle against it requires the pooling of the 
world community's efforts. 
  The primary task is to create a firm legislative basis, 
enforce respect for the law, and ensure the law's implementation 
by all citizens, social associations, and state structures -- 
primarily by the law enforcement organs themselves. For 
this purpose it is necessary to adopt the most radical 
measures, even though they may be unpopular. Russians will 
support them if they perceive that this is not just another 
campaign but a state policy which really ensures the 
security of the individual and society. 
<H3>  Section II: II. Formation of Genuine Spiritual Principles 
and Values of the Russian People </H3>
<H6>  1. Need for a National Idea </H6>
  During the most critical periods of our fatherland's 
history, 
the nation has been saved thanks to the vast reserves of the 
Russian people's spiritual strength. A most important role here 
is played by the Russian idea. 
  The Russian idea comprises primarily Orthodox spirituality 
which is distinguished by its refusal to rationalize faith and 
its acceptance of God with the soul, with love, and with a 
selfless perception of beauty. It is underpinned by the concept 
of conciliarism [sobornost] as the unification of 
people for the sake of the Orthodox faith's revival and the 
fatherland's prosperity. 
  The Russian people's commitment to the idea of 
statehood is historically established. Only the moral 
authority of state power is capable of containing the anarchic 
quests for the kingdom of truth within the confines of the 
evolutionary path. 
  Another key aspect of the Russian idea is the 
universality of the Russian national character, in other 
words its tolerance for and acceptance of other ideas and 
traditions, its ability to coexist with neighboring peoples. In 
all probability, this quality is exploited, more than any other, 
by those who would like to dilute the universal love for one's 
neighbor into abstract universal human values. 
  There has been a long pressing need to start talking about 
statehood on a state level. By dint of its unique 
geopolitical situation, Russia has an opportunity to take its 
proper position in the community of the 21st century and turn 
into a really highly developed world power. One of the mistakes 
of our government, the president, and his entourage is the fact 
that they hardly ever discuss this with the people. The 
nation must regain its dignity, clearly perceive its 
historic prospects, and acquire confidence in its future and its 
own strength. 
  It is necessary for the idea of statehood to become state 
ideology and political practice and, ultimately, state policy. 
All citizens, state institutions, and branches of power 
must support the idea of statehood by all possible means. 
  The great Russian philosopher Vl. Solovyev emphasized: 
"Individual human beings and entire nations alike face the task 
of complementing each other without losing their originality 
but, on the contrary, expressing it to the utmost. The true 
unity of peoples is not homogeneity but pannational spirit, in 
other words interaction and solidarity by all for autonomous and 
full life by all." 
  These are truly sacred words, calling for unity. Everything 
that has happened over the last few years is at times 
reminiscent of the flight of troops, abandoning behind them to 
the vagaries of fate 25 million captives -- Russians and 
Russian-speaking compatriots who have suddenly found themselves 
in alien countries nowadays dubbed nearby foreign countries. 
  Now, drawing parallels with the USSR, Russia itself is 
already "at breaking point." The question of its integrity and 
its future faces us with utmost urgency. 
  There are quite a few "time bombs" along the path which 
Russia has taken. The unequal status of peoples without their 
own statehood, and primarily the Russian people. The 
centrifugal tendencies stemming from the national-economic 
separatism of some Federation components. The growth of 
religious-nationalist separatism. Administrative borders are 
being reshaped at the will of irresponsible politicians and are 
acquiring the status of state borders, which history and the 
peoples will hardly accept. 
  Scientists and politicians pondering these problems today 
single out several paths and several models of development. 
They include dictatorship on an imperial scale, the emergence 
of numerous "ethnojuntas" and enclaves, spontaneous or 
artificially provoked outburst of Russian nationalism leading to 
the revival of unity by force and uprooting all separatist 
tendencies, military intervention by other states, artificial 
creation of a separate "Russian Republic," and enforced 
colonization of the etnnic groups and nations inhabiting the 
country's territory. And yet, some time ago, the Russian 
thinker I. Ilin warned: "Those who would dismember 
Russia...dream that, after the bolsheviks' fall, the citizens of 
united Russia will again slide into chaos and anarchy, will 
decompose their state with impunity...and, with total disregard 
for everything, will set up as many new `statelets' as they 
fancy, each one of these new formations having its own army, 
currency, and diplomacy.... This is why they want to see the 
`Russian national groups' discarding the existence of a single 
Russian people and state and, taking advantage of the 
postbolshevik chaos, bringing about universal arbitrariness and 
collapse..., they dream of turning Russia into a multiplicity of 
pitiful and strategically impotent pigmies -- thus leaving it 
open to conquest and enslavement by western and southeastern 
states." 
  The guiding idea of "pannational spirit" -- unifying, 
reconciling extremes along Russian lines, and creating 
conditions for peaceful democratic development -- can lead to 
Russia's deliverance, revival, and future prosperity. 
  One of the main obstacles, in our view, is the fact that 
today's national-state structure of the Russian Federation does 
not guarantee the rights of different nationalities and does not 
promote the preservation of the state's integrity. Not all 
Federation components enjoy equal state-legal status. Some 100 
nationalities living in Russia still have an undefined status. 
  Both national experience -- the Russian Empire and the 
Soviet 
Union (despite all past mistakes and shortcomings of 
nationalities policy, this historical experience contains much 
that is positive), and international experience -- China, the 
United States, and Switzerland, offer much that is of interest 
in matter of state building. "All men are born free and equal 
in status and rights," according to the Universal Declaration of 
Human Rights. Each person must enjoy all rights and freedoms 
regardless of race, color, sex, language, religion, political or 
other beliefs, national or social origin, and class or other 
status. This should be the basis when forming the structures of 
a state system guaranteeing equality for all Russians. 
  A breakup of the Russian ethnos is now under way, or rather 
its violent split, with the formation in former Union and 
autonomous republics of Russian national minorities, at times 
accounting for up to 50 percent of the population, and this in 
itself is already fraught with catastroiphic conflicts. Any 
attempts to concentrate in Russian communities the millions of 
people who have ended up as refugees in their own country or as 
the hostages of ambitious politicians, would have virtually the 
same result. Abandoned homes and hearths, migration of the work 
force which would be fatal for the national economies, grief and 
death for people. The years of labor by tens of millions of 
people are being erased as a result of the repartition of ethnic 
habitats. 
  Russian people, regardless of where they live and provided 
their national awareness is maintained, are the driving force of 
Russia's revival. The state strategy of the Russian great 
power must be based on the historical and spiritual heritage of 
its people. Russia will never be revived unless the world 
outlook and national awareness typical of our people are 
recreated. 
<H6>  2. The Role of Science. Russia's Scientific and Technical 
Priorities </H6>
  The strategy of national security must take into account, as 
some of its most important priorities, the development of 
culture, science, and education as the foundations of the 
nation's development and spirituality. 
  History has proved that, thanks to scientific and technical 
progress, efficient socioeconomic growth has been graphically 
achieved by states with the most diverse social systems, 
territorial size, and reserves of natural and labor resources. 
  Virtually all industrial countries actively finance the 
institutions of national science, whether administered by state 
ministries and departments or the private sector. They 
create powerful centers for the gathering, processing, analysis, 
and dissemination of scientific information. They participate 
in capital construction and the outfitting of research centers 
and laboratories with modern equipment, reagents, and 
instruments. In the United States, for example, the 
federal government finances about 50 percent of the national 
total of expenditure on all scientific research and development 
and about 80 percent of the national total of fundamental 
scientific research. 
  The most important factor is the desire to enhance the 
science-intensiveness of the national product. The dynamics of 
prices in the civilized world market unambiguously proves the 
advantages of marketing the products of science-intensive 
sectors. 
  The state is aware of the priority of scientific and 
technical progress also as regards the fast pace of development 
of the "military branch" of the global scientific and technical 
revolution. Both today and in the future the state's defense 
capability will be determined by the qualitative parameters of 
arms and military equipment. 
  Today's world is on the verge of a new stage of the 
scientific and technical revolution, which will be distinguished 
by an even greater wealth of information. As competition forces 
the economies of advanced countries into an accelerated 
development of science-intensive sectors, the latter will 
increasingly supplant sectors based on the utilization of 
unskilled labor and energy- and materials-intensive production 
units. They require vast quantities of raw materials to ensure 
that their plants do not shut down -- iron, steel, cement, 
timber, oil products, and so on. They are the main sources of 
pollution and other ecological problems on the planet. 
Furthermore, they need markets for the export of mass 
production output. 
  The economies of "third generation" countries will depend to 
an incalculable degree on the availability of territory suitable 
for agricultural production. In contrast with the 
"industrialized countries," they will not be so strongly 
dependent on their own sources of energy and foodstuffs. What 
they will need first and foremost will be knowledge -- the 
actual "hard currency" of the era of the scientific and 
technical revolution. These countries will need access to and 
control of data banks and telecommunications networks. They 
need markets for commodities and services, management 
consultancies, computer programs, and financial and economic 
statistics. There will also be a need for reliable protection 
against piracy of intellectual property. 
  The main objective of Russia's scientific and technical 
policy is to ensure conditions, commensurate with the country's 
geopolitical and economic status, which would guarantee the 
fullest possible utilization of already accumulated scientific 
potential and its further growth in the interests of the 
development of the country's economy, its foreign policy 
positions, and its defense capability. 
  Social calamities have not bypassed the sphere of science, 
either. This is indicated primarily by the decline of its 
national-state prestige and the sharp cutbacks in finance for 
it. Expenditure on science has been reduced from 5.1 percent of 
national income in 1991 to 3.1 percent in 1993. 
  Is this accidental? 
  Its development has been mainly determined by the state's 
political stipulations. Science in the USSR has not always been 
a direct productive force, but it did remain a factor of 
national prestige until just a few years ago. It was not 
customary in this sphere to consider expenses and take account 
of losses when performing state tasks, such as creating a 
powerful research and experimental base for nuclear physics, 
developing ICBM's, and exploring space. 
  Financial cutbacks in 1990 showed that the state was no 
longer capable of playing the role of a generous patron. There 
is a real danger of ruin for many famous scientific schools, 
creative collectives, and important scientific avenues which are 
a matter of national and worldwide pride. 
  At the same time, there has been a sharp deterioration in 
the 
already inadequate provision of material and technical backup 
for science. In this regard we have always lagged behind 
industrially developed countries and, while science in the West 
was retooling, the lag from which we suffered has turned into a 
gap which is difficult to close. By the late 1980's the 
fixed assets of science represented less than 2 percent of the 
national economy's fixed assets. The gap between the level 
of the material, technical, and information base and the tasks 
of modern science is one of the most substantial factors of the 
general crisis in Russia's science. 
  The economic decline in 1991-1993 has virtually 
eliminated our country's instrument making -- it has proved 
to be unprofitable. There is no foreign currency to purchase 
imported instruments. The information backup for science can be 
said to be at almost zero-level, and Russia's scientists appear 
to be cut off from the world's data banks. More than 
two-thirds of polled leaders and associates of leading academic 
institutes in Moscow believe that the situation in this sphere 
is catastrophic. The mothballing of the existing material and 
technical base cannot be ruled out in the immediate future. 
Here we have reached a "lag threshold" beyond which any 
realistic activity within the framework of the world's 
scientific system would become problematic and even impossible 
along many avenues. 
  The numerical strength of specialists engaged in research 
work in the sectors of science and scientific services declined 
by approximately 12 percent in 1991 alone. The scientists' 
labor has been devalued. By the end of 1992, for example, their 
salaries were 30 percent less than the average in the national 
economy. According to Goskomstat [State Committee for 
Statistics] data, the "Science and Scientific Services" sector 
ranks only 11th out of the 13 basic national economic 
sectors. The situation has changed somewhat recently, but 
is far from stable. 
  Public opinion did not shift in the scientists' favor, 
either. The bulk of the population has always perceived them as 
social parasites. The situation was aggravated by the wholesale 
recruitment of scientific workers by the government apparatus 
and sundry commissions and committees. 
  All this prompted scientists to leave the confines of their 
laboratories and even the state's borders. The average monthly 
number of cadres leaving the sectors of science and scientific 
services in 1991-1992 was double the number of new recruits. 
Postgraduate study has lost its prestige. 
  According to Russian MVD Visas and Registrations 
Administration data, taking into account only people who have 
emigrated on a permanent basis, 4,572 persons engaged in science 
and national education emigrated from the country in 1992 (7.8 
percent of the total number of emigrating ablebodied adults). 
The ones who are leaving are, as a rule, either already 
established persons or the young and most promising ones. The 
youngest generation in Russian science will soon end up being a 
generation of 40-year olds. Using UN methodology, it has been 
calculated that the losses which Russia will incur as a result 
of the brain drain will amount to $60-70 billion a year. 
  The development of Russia's statehood, economy, and 
society is inseparably linked with and, moreover, unimaginable 
without, the development of science. Given a sensible 
utilization of its potential, it is capable of enriching society 
and the state. But: Science in Russia, having taken the path of 
re-forming, was from the very beginning excluded from the number 
of spheres on which the top leadership and authorities at all 
levels focused their attention. The situation has also changed 
in the military-political sphere: The authorities' interest in 
the defense sector, including its fundamental basis -- defense 
science which is nurturing many fields of knowledge -- has 
significantly declined. 
  International experts recently drew the following 
conclusion: 
Russia's scientific potential represents its 
second-largest national asset after its natural resources. 
  The scientific prestige and creative potential of academic 
colectives engaged in fundamental reesearch were created by many 
generations. We have no right to squander this capital. 
  Its is clear that a natural integration is needed in the new 
economic conditions. We ought to concentrate on the 
assimilation of academic elaborations in the applied science 
sphere and provide various work and services of a scientific and 
scientific-technical nature helping the implementation of major 
projects. There is demand for highly professional expert 
evaluation of projects and elaborations, as well as for the 
development and utilization of training and information centers 
for the training and retraining of scientific cadres. Life has 
proved that many research workers are only vaguely aware of the 
key problems of the market -- its requirements, the conditions 
of competitive struggle, questions of profitability, and so on. 
  Sectoral science, covering almost 70 percent of Russia's 
entire research infrastructure, has firmly embarked on market 
relations. But it has also suffered serious blows inflicted by 
market elements. The USSR Law on the State Enterprise, which 
also extended to sectoral scientific and technical 
organizations, failed to take into account the fundamental 
differences between the process of creating scientific-technical 
output and the process of creating industrial output. 
Unfortunately, Russian legislation extended this tradition. 
  OECD experts offer radical methods: It is necessary to cut 
the number of persons employed in science and scientific 
services in Russia by two-thirds, to the level of 300,000, at 
the expense of sectoral science. Is this not a mechanistic 
approach? 
  There is also the inarguable conclusion that sectoral 
science 
is overweighted in favor of the defense, space, nuclear, and 
machine building complexes. The conversion now under way will 
actually solve this problem by gearing science in the defense 
sectors to civilian needs. Of course, there is a far from 
inarguable claim that the output of this complex is currently 
unsuitable for market conditions. On the contrary, we are 
obviously unwillingly -- due to fear from competition -- allowed 
to take advanced technologies to the world market where there is 
considerable demand for them. This is the essence of the Western 
"recommendations." 
  It is well known that the most significant discoveries in 
science occur at the juncture of its different sectors. It 
seems that the quest for the best possible organizational 
structures in science during its transition to a market economy 
must also be nurtured by ideas from both flanks -- science and 
production. Any unilateral organizational and economic 
transformations are fraught with the loss of scientific 
potential. 
  Privatization in science is also necessary. But, as 
specialists assume, it must be regulated by the provisions of a 
special program based on general principles but also taking into 
account the specific features of scientific activity and geared 
to the efficient reorganization of the sphere of research work. 
  At present more than 45 percent of the network of 
organizations engaged in scientific research and development in 
Russia are situated on the territory of nine regions. These are 
the city of Moscow and Moscow Oblast; the city of St. Petersburg 
and Leningrad Oblast; Novosibirsk, Sverdlovsk, Rostov, and 
Nizhniy Novgorod Oblasts; and the Republic of Bashkortostan. 
  Unfortunately, until the last few years, Russia lacked a 
regional scientific policy. The main point here is to avoid 
going to extremes: Shifting all responsibilities for its 
implementation either to the center or to local authorities, 
either of which will lead to undesirable consequences in the 
development of both science and the regions. 
  It is necessary to show concern for the future of closed 
science cities like Arzamas-16. Having a unique scientific and 
technical potential at their disposal, science cities could 
become centers for the development of new knowledge, 
technologies, and modern education, conduits for technical 
innovations in all spheres of the national economy, and the 
basis for the development of state scientific centers and the 
conversion of industrial production units. 
  The draft working program of the Russian Federation Council 
of Ministers-Government for 1993-1995 "Development of Reforms 
and Stabilization of Russia's Economy" contains numerous 
provisions addressing science. This is promising. It is, of 
course, important to ensure that plans do not remain just good 
intentions. Much will depend on the Russian Federation Ministry 
of Science and Technology Policy, which has been given extensive 
powers. 
  In accordance with strategic objectives, Russia's 
scientific and technical policy ought to be formulated by the 
legislative organs and adopted as an unconditional priority by 
the country's government. 
  This will require: 
  -- That specialized committees (commissions) for problems of 
the country's scientific and technical development be created in 
the legislative chambers of Russia's future parliament, 
assigning to them, among other tasks, the preparation of regular 
analytical reviews for the elaboration of appropriate 
legislative acts. 
  -- That the government's statistical records organs are 
obliged by appropriate decisions by the chambers of Russia's 
parliament to publish statistical material on the country's 
economy, including the collection and analysis of statistical 
data on the numerical strength of the contingents of scientific 
cadres, the amounts of state budget financing and other sources 
of finance for our country's science for the practical 
attainment of the strategic goals of scientific and technical 
development. 
  -- That Russia's government eliminates the prevailing 
imbalances in the remuneration of scientific and other workers 
in the country. 
  -- That funds are ensured for the financing of state 
budget-financed scientific research organizations at the level 
necessary to maintain their productivity. 
  -- That in 1994 the country's organs of legislative and 
executive power find methods and means to prevent any 
further decline of the science-intensiveness potential of 
Russia's national product and ensure preferential development 
for our country's science. 
  -- That Russia's government ensures state budget financing 
for the country's science in 1994 at a level of at least 
2.3-2.5 percent of the country's GNP and ensures conditions for 
further raising this indicator in the next few years. That 
the decline of the proportion of scientific associates among the 
other categories of hired workers employed by state organization 
be halted. 
  -- Without excessively diminishing the importance of broad 
international cooperation, it is necessary to create all 
conditions (salaries, equipment, libraries) to ensure that 
our scientists work effectively in their own country. 
<H6>  3. Guidelines for Politicians in the Education Sphere </H6>
  The Russian mathematician Nikolay Ivanovich Lobachevskiy, 
while holding the post of rector of Kazan University, frequently 
addressed students with speeches about man's purpose and his 
creative potential. Man, he emphasized, "was born to be master, 
conqueror, and king of nature. But the wisdom with which he 
ought to rule from the throne he has inherited is not given to 
him by birth; it is acquired by study." Lobachevskiy was a 
confirmed advocate of the development of all gifts of the 
individual in the process of training and education. Only thus 
will man develop as an individual and will expand the horizons 
of his intellectual might. 
  The scientific and technical progress influences not only 
equipment and technology. It promotes the headlong progress of 
productive forces as a whole and man's development, it demands 
comprehensive and complete utilization of man's abilities which 
is impossible to achieve without improving education. 
  Spiritual and intellectual perfection are not automatically 
acquired. Britain has the Open University with 250 branches, 
Germany has the Westphalian Correspondence University, Japan has 
the Radio University, Israel has the Everyman University, and so 
on. It is time for Russia to seriously tackle the radical 
renewal of the entire reserve of knowledge and intellectual 
potential. 
  Our society's reform must presuppose a fundamental reform of 
the education system, beginning with the objectives of 
education, its economic foundation, and the management of the 
education system, and ending with the system for training and 
retraining of specialists, the schools structure, and the 
content and technology of training. 
  The development of modern society is determined mainly by 
the 
scientific and technical revolution. This takes the form of the 
vast flow of information, the rapidly changing production 
technologies, and the equally rapid obsolescence of the 
knowledge and habits of specialists at almost all levels. Any 
country's position in the world community is directly associated 
with its achievements in the elaboration of qualitatively new 
technologies and activity systems. Autonomous thought and 
the ability to make decisions are irreversibly demanded of each 
member of society. Today's mass schooling is in principle 
not geared to the cultivation of these qualities in individuals. 
  The utilitarianism which dominates society has resulted in a 
considerable dehumanization of culture and has destroyed many 
spiritual values, offering almost nothing in exchange. The 
traditions underlying the formation of previous generations' 
spiritual world and the ability to reproduce the people's 
culture have been either largely broken or altogether lost. 
  Today, following the loss of the time link and the world's 
integrity as necessary conditions for culture's reproduction and 
development, the school's most important task is to 
restore continuity between generations and implant in the school 
pupils' minds the historical roots linking them with the past 
history of their own people and the whole of mankind. 
  Unfortunately, over the last few years the prestige of 
secondary education has fallen to its lowest level ever in 20th 
century history. Polls in 1993 showed that only 20 percent are 
fully satisfied with the standards of education, 70 percent of 
teachers and parents believe that schools are in the deepest of 
crises, 50 percent of teachers are not satisfied with their own 
training and work, and 85 percent of young specialists believe 
that the education they have acquired is not in line with the 
latest achievements of science. The following are identified as 
some of the causes of the crisis in schools: the surplus 
principle for finance and material backup, the declining value 
of education, the weakening of discipline and law and order in 
the country, bureaucracy in the management of education, and the 
low standing of teaching as a profession. 
  The situation in higher education is equally 
complex, even though selfless and knowledgeable 
professionals are working there. Thanks to their heroic efforts, 
the decline has been halted to some degree. The edict "On 
Measures To Support State VUZ's [higher educational 
institutions]" has been signed, giving them land for indefinite 
free use. 
  Nonetheless, Russia's VUZ's are losing young lecturers, the 
prestige of this profession is declining, and the socioeconomic 
situation of scientific, pedagogical, and research cadres has 
deteriorated. 
  The depth of the crisis in education is determined not by 
the 
state's poverty but by the inability to match the citizens' 
requirements, demands, and wishes with the potential of the 
country's teachers corps and the standards of programs. 
Adequate funding and the replacement of fundamentally old 
schools will not produce quality education. It can be produced 
only by the appropriate content of education, the technology of 
training, and the professional standards of teacher trainers. 
  There is a need for a state strategy for the 
development of education, elaborated in detail. A very 
important step has been taken -- the Law on Education has been 
adopted. This law has emancipated and deideologized the 
schools. But it is still in our schools that we are less 
prepared for freedom and creativity than in any other sector of 
production, science, and culture. 
  Work must be done along two avenues: scientific 
substantiation of all fundamental provisions of reform and 
elaboration of appropriate legislation. 
  The centralized financing of schools from the state budget 
has become an objective hindrance to their development. Of 
course, even now part of the expenditure should be borne by the 
state budget. This applies primarily to capital construction. 
The other part should be covered by municipal funds. Russia 
does have such experience. It ought to be revived in the law on 
local self-government. A great role in the financing of schools 
can be played by local education funds and school supervisory 
councils, provided a sensible system of tax benefits is 
elaborated. 
  Fundamental changes are also necessary in the management of 
the education system. Many relevant provisions have been made 
in the Law on Education. There is a need to considerably 
reduce the management apparatus and to fundamentally change its 
functions. 
  Hitherto all changes in the management system have been 
implemented by management officials themselves and in their own 
interests. The total number of managers per pupil has been 
steadily growing. The new management system must be structured 
for the children's benefit, with a view to their more 
comfortable life and best possible development. 
  Schools must become fully autonomous in all regards and must 
be fully responsible for the quality of children's training and 
education. The quality of training could be monitored by 
supervisory councils using tests which determine whether 
knowledge and habits are in line with state standards. This 
will enable schools to become a self-regulating system, with 
self-development providing the basis for the mechanism of their 
functioning. In these conditions, schools will begin to 
actively form the best possible infrastructure and educational 
environment for their pupils. 
  Without putting matters off until the more distant future, 
resolute steps ought to be taken already in 1994-1995 toward a 
more efficient utilization of higher education's educational and 
scientific potential and an expansion of already existing forms 
of integration between science and higher education. This means 
fundamentally new forms of mutual relations between science and 
VUZ's -- the creation of scientific education complexes, the 
preparation of joint scientific programs and projects, and the 
training of pupils for schools and VUZ's. 
  Transformations in schools -- both general educational 
and higher educational -- must be geared to the awakening of 
cognitive activity in each individual and to teaching him how to 
acquire knowledge autonomously. 
<H6>  4. Culture in Russia </H6>
  It can be said that Russia's cultural figures now enjoy more 
creative freedom and political independence than ever before in 
its thousand-year long history. And yet, these figures 
increasingly often proclaim that the last few years have become 
the era of "the country's deculturization," "the denigration of 
talent," and the impoverishment of writers, painters, humanists, 
and museum workers to a level already approaching that of the 
Civil War and Great Patriotic War years. 
  On the other hand, Minister of Culture Ye. Sidorov shocks 
the 
country by announcing that about 80 percent of icons in Russia 
have been exported in the last few years. If truth be said, it 
is hard to imagine who has calculated this, and how, seeing that 
records of cultural assets in the country have always been badly 
kept and nowadays are in a state of total disarray. Book 
publishing statistics in our country are also deceptive, but 
specialists claim -- not altogether groundlessly -- that the 
works of Pushkin, Blok, L. Tolstoy, and Gogol are today 
published in smaller print runs than during the years of 
postrevolutionary devastation or after World War II. Never 
before have so many cultural monuments been destroyed in Russia, 
and it is impossible to imagine that the state budget was "not 
in a position" to appropriate a few million rubles to restore 
the monument on Chekhov's grave at Novodevichye Cemetery, which 
is today badly in need of repair. 
  A multitude of people -- from the president down to the 
merchants specializing in the marketing of folk art and craft 
products -- assure Russia of respect for the originality of 
national culture. But television's weekly popular education 
programs abound exclusively with foreign titles. 
  A "top level" decision has been made in Russia to elaborate 
a 
program for the privatization of culture and art institutions 
(theaters, museums, buildings, country estates), taking into 
account the interests of the legitimate heirs of their former 
owners. And yet that selfsame document "decrees" a ban on any 
privatization whatsoever in the cultural sphere. The president 
has prescribed a policy of returning to the church all buildings 
and other valuables originally intended for religious purposes. 
He has also promulgated an edict granting the status of 
national cultural monument to a series of especially outstanding 
cultural institutions, which would render inviolable the 
collection of, for example, the Tretyakov Gallery which owns a 
huge collection of icons, or the Russian State Library with its 
unique collection of religious books and manuscripts.... 
  There is a vast multitude of similar contradictions in plans 
and actions, and it is increasingly difficult to answer the 
question: What has happened and what is happening to Russia's 
cultural policy, and is there any cultural policy at 
all? 
  Our country has already crossed the line marking the start 
of 
an era of historical ruin, comparable in scale with the 
Tatar-Mongol invasion. The "culture problem" is far broader 
than the problem of the present political power, of economic 
reform, and of state reorganization: The nation must find the 
strength and methods to comprehend and resolve it regardless of 
what the authorities might do. Especially since culture is more 
viable than all political regimes, ideologies, and states. It 
is a question only of the price and methods of culture's 
self-preservation as a condition for the nation's survival. 
  The questions of preserving the monuments of the Soviet era 
and the cultural heritage of those years as a whole are being 
raised especially urgently (maybe deliberately?) today. But 
no matter what political, economic, social, and any other 
renewal may be yearned for by any country, its desire can be 
satisfied only by reliance on the past. It was said a 
long, long time ago: "They fire at the past and kill the 
future." But the process of "overcoming the past" and "bringing 
the fatherland's culture back to the mainstream of world 
development" soon enough took a "special path" again. This has 
proved to be the path of leveling the fatherland's culture. 
Politics has once again, stealthily and "on the quiet," 
assumed the functions of culture, deciding once again on 
the latter's behalf what from the past is suitable for the 
"civilized society" model and what has to be excised, 
cauterized, and ridiculed. 
  The stormy changes which occurred in our society in the last 
few years did not result in any noticeable creative 
productivity. Spiritual life is flooded with nothing but 
the monotonous flow of previously "forbidden fruit." Literary 
journals are slowly sinking into oblivion. It is not so much 
that viewers are deserting the theater, but that the theater is 
deserting viewers: It has nothing to say. National 
cinematography is in a state of coma. The humanities and social 
sciences are ravaged. Philosophers have been squeezed out by 
chiromancers and sundry other charlatans. 
  The "former Soviet intelligentsia" is increasingly often 
sighing: It was better in the past, they dictated to us but at 
least we got paid. Until quite recently Federico Fellini's 
reflection was considered a bad joke, but now people seem to 
comprehend its meaning: "I fancy the order which caused 
suffering to artists in the past: A pope, a duke, or a viceroy 
commissioned a work and did not feed the artist if the work was 
not completed. Had it not been for those tyrants, we would not 
have enjoyed the hundreds of great works." In actual 
fact, freedom as such does not in any way guarantee the 
flourishing of creativity. Nowadays many people repeat the 
old truism: Poverty is the worst form of slavery. Creative 
people are becoming hostages of commercialism; the naive 
political faith of many intellectuals in politicians has proved 
fatal: How many notable figures are now silent, having been 
traumatized by the fact that they perceived as beacons some 
politicians who proved to be nothing but deceptive 
will-o'-the-wisps. 
  At the same time, in a situation whereby we are more than 
likely not only to experience a buildup of catastrophic tension 
in all spheres of society's life but also to see the people 
driven into apathy and listlessness, right up to the point where 
the desire and actual will to live are dulled and society is 
paralyzed because nothing is sacred and mandatory for people -- 
in this situation we are beginning to see the emergence of a 
stratum of people with the qualities and functions of a new 
intelligentsia. 
  The intelligentsia is not affiliated to any political 
stream, 
it does not serve either the state, or the parties, or the 
church, or even the people. Intelligence as a human 
quality does not speak on anyone's behalf but its own, based on 
the theoretical principles of knowledge. 
  The theoretical nature of the new intelligentsia's judgments 
does not at all mean that it is aloof from the realities of 
life. Now, for example, it cannot adopt an indifferent attitude 
toward the Russian Government. In this regard, the 
intelligentsia does not fit anywhere within the range of 
viewpoints held by various political groups and various social 
strata of the population. From a sounder point of view it can 
be seen that a change of government and of authority in general 
will inevitably result in replacing the immature, inconsistent, 
at times simply foolish and clumsy democracy -- but democracy 
nonetheless -- with a quasi-democracy. This is the ground on 
which intellectuals determine their attitude toward the 
government today. But from the fundamental position, the 
present situation calls more for understanding rather than for 
approval or condemnation. To comprehend and to announce 
its conclusions to society -- this is the function of the new 
intelligentsia. Politicians, intellectuals, parties, and 
movements want success, a member of the intelligentsia wants the 
truth. By its very nature the new intelligentsia needs, more 
than anything else, the fullest possible democracy, and it is 
the one that can utilize it best of all. This means that it is 
capable of being a kind of regulator of the degree and form of 
democracy. 
  The new intelligentsia is also the "bearer" of optimism in a 
society of skepticism and cynicism, of gloom and pessimism. Its 
optimism is based on its ability to perceive the contemporary 
social processes in the context of world problems and their 
history. Any "party approach" evaluates events and their 
consequences in terms of years or decades, while the new 
intelligentsia's supraparty and apolitical approach enables it 
to think in terms of the world and of centuries. The new kind 
of intelligentsia presupposes an independent morality. It 
scorns moral prejudices and the dominant spirit of the time. In 
the conditions of "generally accepted" deceipt and camouflage, 
it is capable of sincerity, of the salutary self-restriction to 
nothing but implacably pointing out any manifestation of 
immorality to others and, in all other instances, imputes to 
dissidents nothing but intellectual confusion. 
  The intelligentsia's morality rules out the most permanent 
disease of intellectuals -- egotism, and it preaches the 
principle: Love not me but mine. 
  At a time when malicious intent, selfishness, and deception 
in actions are becoming an everyday occurrence, the morality of 
a member of the intelligentsia calls for inaction as the last 
means of demonstrating disagreement. 
  This very intelligentsia will become the "third force" 
which, 
in conditions of mass hostility to all parties, programs, and 
everything else that divides and embitters, will mediate in 
relations between the people and the authorities, will 
comprehend and explain their role and limits, and will bring 
about a mutual sensible moderation. We see the role of 
prosecutor being played even by many "generals" of literature, 
the arts, the humanities, and the social sciences who, until 
quite recently, strove to grab a seat on honorary presidiums as 
close as possible to Politburo members, glorified "socialist 
realism," and headed creative unions, scientific research 
institutes, and newspapers and journals. We see such a great 
multitude of cultural figures who had always been "against" not 
only "mentally" but also openly, that it is already hard to 
imagine who was ever "in favor" and who produced the thousands 
of novels, poems, movies, and monographs comprising "the world's 
most advanced socialist culture." 
  For the time being, many of our intellectuals are living 
just 
for the day, carried away by an exaggerated impression of their 
own importance in the fatherland's spiritual ruin. This is what 
the authorities value. But time is passing, and they need 
more and more people capable of building rather than 
destroying. There are very few of them and they, made 
wiser by experience, are trying to keep their distance from the 
authorities. This offers that much more scope for those who are 
diligent in seeking the blessings of the powers that be. But 
any authority's "special treatment" of the "masters of the word" 
has always and everywhere been like a royal court's relations 
with jesters. 
  Russia's geopolitical position is such that it enables it to 
occupy a most befitting niche in the planet's community in the 
21st century -- befitting its people, its culture, and its 
history; it can turn into a really first-rate power. This is 
important for all, because it will guarantee people's stability 
of existence, prosperous life, and opportunity to effectively 
exercise their own intellectual and moral potential. This goal 
is attainable. The nation must be aware of its own dignity, it 
must be confident that it is capable of achieving a lot, that it 
has not been cast on history's scrap heap as some people try to 
imply. This applies to all spheres of human activity, but 
especially to sophisticated instruments of manifesting national 
self-awareness like science, education, and culture. 
<H6>  5. The Growing Role of the Orthodox Church </H6>
  Russian statehood is just one century older than the Russian 
Orthodox Church, if we take as our starting point the date when 
Christianity was adopted as the state religion of Rus by Kievan 
Grand Prince Vladimir in A.D. 988. Nonetheless, it was this 
step that largely promoted the cause of Russian state building. 
  Simultaneously with Christianity, Rus also adopted Byzantine 
Law which had incorporated all the best points of Roman Law 
which had been further fecundated by the Church's conciliarist 
experience over the centuries. The state importance of the 
Church for Rus during the Kievan period of its history was 
largely determined by the fact that, to a considerable extent, 
the Church was also the judiciary. As a matter of fact, right 
until the Conciliar Code was compiled in 1649, church rules 
often filled in the gaps in state laws comprising the princely 
jurisdiction. 
  It is understandable that this great importance of the 
episcopate's judicial power was based primarily on its 
moral authority. During the pre-Mongol period, the 
metropolitan and bishops often had to reconcile princes at times 
of civil strife. Essentially, the Orthodox Church at the 
time played the role of a most important factor of 
national unity. 
  Let us recall that during the sad days of the October (1993) 
crisis, it was the Orthodox Church that again took on this 
historical role. And it is not to blame for the fact that the 
voice of reason was not heeded. 
  It is necessary to dwell on the following fact. Grand Prince 
Ivan Danilovich Kalita of Muscovy invited Metropolitan Petr of 
Kiev and All Rus to settle in his capital. The foundations of 
the Cathedral of the Assumption of the Holy Mother of God were 
laid in the Kremlin. This made Moscow the permanent center of 
the Russian Orthodox Church, giving it at the time the 
significance of a nationwide center. 
  The 25 years during which the Russian Church was ruled by 
Prelate Aleksiy (1354-1378) were the time of Russia's 
unification [sobiraniye]. During the minority of Grand 
Prince Dmitriy Ivanovich, the head of the Russian Church was de 
facto ruler of the Grand Principality of Muscovy. His missions 
to the Golden Horde produced a lengthy respite from devastating 
raids. And when in 1380 the Tatar warlord Mamay moved against 
Rus, it was Grand Prince Dmitriy of Muscovy who, having been 
blessed by the Venerable Sergiy Radonezhskiy, succeeded in 
bringing together a united Russian host to deliver the Land of 
Russia from destruction. 
  Russia's history offers numerous instructive examples of 
state organization. In parallel with the monarchical nature of 
power in the majority of Russian lands during the period 
preceding the formation of the unified Moscow State, we can also 
see the experience of the lengthy existence of the Novgorod 
Republic, where the three branches of power -- governor 
[posadnik] (the administration), archbishop (spiritual 
leadership and a large proportion of judicial procedures), and 
prince (protection from external danger) -- had their origins in 
the expression of the people's will. 
  G.P. Fedotov, the remarkable Russian thinker from our 
century, perceived Novgorod -- the "Republic of Holy Sophia" as 
he described it -- as the prototype of Russia's future 
democratic structure, underpinned by the primacy of Christian 
values. 
  But no matter what attitude we may adopt toward Russia's 
history following the unification of Rus under the authority of 
the grand prince of Muscovy, it is necessary to admit that 
the Orthodox Church continued to play an important role in 
the consolidation of Russian statehood. 
  The 17th century proved to be especially important. The Time 
of Troubles immediately following the reign of Boris Godunov, 
which was marked by a series of disasters and mainly a 
devastating famine, again brought forth the Orthodox Church as 
the most important factor of national self-awareness, without 
which it would have been impossible to pursue state 
building in Russia. Thus, the Church's blessing of the 
Nizhniy Novgorod resistance made it possible to preserve Russian 
statehood in 1612. 
  In 1613 the Holy Synod, in other words the episcopate of the 
Russian Church and leading representatives of its clergy, 
launched the initiative of convening an Assembly of the Land 
to elect a head of the Russian state. This assembly, 
at which the estates of the Russian Land were represented, was 
an original form of representation of the people, unknown 
in the rest of Europe. After all, the representatives of 
the estates gathered at the Assembly of the Land not to play 
political games or exact privileges from the supreme authority, 
but to answer the question of how the Russian state should be 
structured. At that time the election of Mikhail, the first 
czar from the Romanov dynasty, was conditioned by the fact that 
his father, the prestigious boyar Fedor Romanov, who had been 
forced to become a monk by Boris Godunov and later became 
Metropolitan Filaret of Rostov and Yaroslavl (patriarch of all 
Rus in 1619-1633), was an oustanding spiritual leader of the 
building of the emerging Russian statehood. It is no accident 
that thereafter, and throughout the reign of Mikhail Fedorovich, 
Assemblies of the Land were convened by the supreme authority 
virtually every year to ensure that its initiatives could be 
backed by the Church's authority and become an expression of the 
people's aspirations. 
  A special importance in the cause of state building attaches 
to the 1649 Assembly of the Land, which compiled the Conciliary 
Code which laid the foundation for the codification of Russian 
laws. 
  When Peter the Great started implementing the transformation 
of Russian statehood on the principles of enlightened 
absolutism, he assigned a special role to the church 
administration. Having abolished the patriarchate and halted 
the convening of Holy Synods as the supreme organs of church 
power, he showed concern for forming a permanent supreme 
administration of spiritual forces which was named the Holy 
Governing Synod. In parallel with the Governing Senate, which 
promulgated imperial laws on behalf of the supreme power and was 
also the supreme judicial organ in the country, the Synod -- if 
the monarch was unable to exercise his rights and duties -- 
exercised supreme power in the country until such time as the 
legitimate claimant to the throne was sworn in as head of the 
Russian state. It must be especially noted that the Russian 
[Church] hierarchy played an extremely fruitful role in 
lawmaking activity, in which it was brought by the supreme state 
power, also in the 18th century. 
  Later on, when a representative organs of the people -- the 
State Duma -- emerged in Russia in 1905, it was no rare 
occurrence to see among its deputies bishops and clergy of the 
Russian Orthodox Church, elected mainly by the peasant strata 
which had entrusted them with the protection of their interests 
and the expression of their aspirations. 
  The 1917-1918 Local Assembly became an important landmark in 
the history of the Russian Orthodox Church, restoring the 
Patriarchate of All Russia and the principle of conciliarism in 
church life. Its opening coincided with preparations for the 
Constituent Assembly, which was intended to establish new 
principles of Russian statehood. In this context, the [Local] 
Assembly had a working section on "The Legal Status of the 
Orthodox Church in the Russian State," which based the documents 
it elaborated on the fact that "the Orthodox Church is a most 
sacred object for the vast majority of the Russian people" and 
therefore the state must give it legal protection and patronage. 
  The country's historical fate during the postrevolution 
decades developed in such a way that the Orthodox Church was not 
only deprived of its traditional historical role but, under the 
slogan of its "separation from the state," was also subjected to 
the most blatant persecution; that was a time when its paramount 
concern was the problem of survival in an atmosphere of 
artificially implanted militant atheism. But, despite 
everything, the Russian Church managed to survive and, with the 
passage of time, even to accumulate a certain amount of social 
potential. 
  The word "crisis" is nowadays one of the most frequently 
used 
words in the mass media. But let us ask ourselves: What sort 
of crisis is Russia experiencing now? Economic? It would be 
strange that a country with such natural and industrial 
potential would be incapable of swiftly dealing with it. 
Political? The multiparty system, which is capable of 
producing a serious struggle for power, is still at its 
embryonic stage, as it were, in our country. Nonetheless, we are 
indeed at a stage of crisis at present. And this crisis 
is moral. 
  The main question facing Russia now is: What should be 
the moral guidelines of its future state building? This 
question has to be answered by the people themselves. It would 
be appropriate to recall the traditional form of dialogue 
between the supreme power and the people by convening an 
Assembly of the Land which could comprise authoritative 
representatives of all social and professional groups and the 
traditional religious confessions in Russia. This Assembly 
would not claim state power and would not compete with the 
existing representative organ. It will not adopt any acts for 
mandatory execution. But it will be able to identify the 
sore spots in our people's life today, on which those who have 
been tasked with state building in Russia should focus attention 
in the first place. 
  As regards the participation of the Russian Orthodox Church 
in this Assembly, this will not mean that it is regaining any 
state functions or privileges. But, being an authoritative 
social institution in the country today, it will thus fulfill 
its purpose and will help the Russian people to preserve 
their identity and create their state. 
  The government and the new Federal Assembly are called upon, 
in the very near future and jointly with the Russian Orthodox 
Church, to compile a program for the restoration and 
refurbishing of cathedrals, churches, and monasteries. 
  An end should be put to all attempts at religious invasion 
from outside, no matter how plausible their motivations might 
appear. Missionary activity by foreign citizens in Russia must 
be legislatively regulated. 
<H3>  Section III: III. Stabilization of the Socioeconomic 
Situation in the Country </H3>
  An analysis of the socioeconomic situation in the 14 former 
Union republics of the USSR by international organizations 
indicates that these countries are on the threshold of "a 
large-scale social explosion." 
  The incomes of workers and employees have declined by 21-27 
percent in Turkmenistan and Uzbekistan, and by 59-60 percent in 
Kyryzstan and Tajikistan. The rural population's incomes have 
declined still further: by 33-35 percent in Turkmenistan and 
Uzbekistan, and by 64-70 percent in Russia, Kyrgyzstan, Moldova, 
and Tajikistan. 
  Wage increases cannot keep up with the steady growth of 
consumer goods prices. (Footnote) (According to EEC data, the 
increase of the population's incomes in the CIS is lagging 
behind inflation, and consequently real wages have dropped by 
30-50 percent.) 
  The situation on the market for foodstuffs is especially 
alarming. Even the high prices have failed to solve the problem 
of normal supplies of meat, vegetable oil, and sugar for the 
population. Consequently, "a sizeable proportion of the 
population in the CIS is threatened by famine. Millions of 
people eat irregularly and there is excessive consumption of 
bread and potatoes. The situation is fast deteriorating," 
UNICEF emphasizes, "and three-fourths of the population in many 
regions are living in poverty." 
  The production of consumer goods has significantly declined 
in the CIS countries, including foodstuffs by 22 percent, light 
industry goods by 17 percent, and articles for cultural and 
everyday life use by 14 percent. 
  The commissioning of housing in the CIS as a whole has 
declined by 27 percent, of general educational schools by 33 
percent, of preschool institutions by 32 percent, and of 
hospitals by 37 percent. 
  There has been an acute deterioration in the health care 
system: The appropriated funds are sufficient to cover just 
one-third of requirements. 
  A "new" phenomenon, long-forgotten by generations of 
Russians, has emerged -- unemployment. It is expected 
that the army of spare labor in the CIS will have reached 12 
million persons in the first quarter of 1994. 
  The number of recorded crimes has also increased sharply in 
the Community states -- by 30 percent on average. The highest 
increase is in Tajikistan and Kyrgyzstan by 50 percent, in 
Azerbaijan and Armenia by 33 percent, and in Russia by 28 
percent. 
  Thus, not a single one of the new sovereign states on 
the USSR's territory has been able to guarantee the life and 
safety of the majority of its population. 
  The absence of guarantees creates a fundamentally new 
sociopolitical situation in the CIS countries, where residents 
in the past felt that they were citizens of a great state. 
  These new conditions will dominate the development of 
sociopolitical events in the CIS also in 1994. 
  It is not only the population but also the authorities that 
feel uneasy in the face of new realities. The problem of 
consolidating power, which is in a state of unstable equilibrium 
in the overwhelming majority of states, will be the main problem 
in 1994. 
  The reforms being implemented by the authorities of the 
sovereign states are inadequately backed by the population, as 
can be seen from the Eurostat data (see Table 1). 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 1. Question: What will market economics bring to your country?         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Country                  |Benefit                  |Or Harm [see footnote]   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Russia                   |37                       |44                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Moldova                  |41                       |50                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Latvia                   |48                       |36                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ukraine                  |34                       |46                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Belarus                  |32                       |56                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Armenia                  |31                       |56                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Footnote) (These data correspond fully with the results of the All-Russia r-| 
|eferendum, when only 34.9 percent of the total population approved the socia-| 
|l policy implemented by the Russian Federation president and government.)    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Thus, almost everywhere (with the exception of Georgia and 
Estonia) the majority of the population expect "harm" rather 
than "benefit" from market economics. In actual fact we can see 
that, first, society is split as regards the essence of reforms 
and, second, there is a low level of approval for them. 
  Western political scientists are seeking the causes of this 
phenomenon. Will Hutton (THE GUARDIAN), for example, having 
analyzed the processes in the former Union, draws the following 
conclusion: "Hardly ever have economists been so involved in 
the sphere of politics with an opportunity to compile plans and 
programs which are far removed from the cultural, social, and 
political context in which they exist. The process of reforms 
has evolved into a technical problem and its success depends on 
the existence of political `will.' It is hard to imagine a more 
simplistic concept." 
  This view is not altogether groundless. 
  The question is: How can sociopolitical processes in the 
CIS countries develop further with today's situation as a 
starting point? There is no doubt that they will have their 
specific aspects everywhere. But there are also common trends. 
The complexities of the problems of authority are largely 
conditioned by the following contradiction. The political 
forces (Footnote) (Meaning the Democratic Congress [Democratic 
Russia, Rukh, Berlin, and so on] and the People's Fronts) which 
brought the incumbent leaders of sovereign states to the summits 
of power, proved capable of destroying the former one-party 
political system, but have so far been unable to create a new 
pluralistic system. As destroying parties, they did not enjoy a 
mighty social base. The current need of all CIS leaders for 
such a social base clashes with the course of reforms being 
implemented, which harm the vital interests of a large 
proportion of the population. 
  The consolidation of democratic power is hindered by the 
marginalization of society and the disintegration of its social 
structure. The "crystallization" of the social structure can 
have a different base in different countries: nationalism, 
religious fundamentalism, patriotism, corporate principles, and 
so on. 
  UNICEF and WHO have forecast massive social explosions on 
the 
ground of dissatisfaction with reforms. The socioeconomic 
tension in Armenia, Georgia, Moldova, Azerbaijan, and Tajikistan 
has shifted to the level of territorial-ethnic conflicts. Such 
conflicts could intensify in Russia and Ukraine. In the Baltic 
countries these conflicts have been moved to the plane of 
relations with Russia and turned into the problem of the 
Russian-speaking population. 
  Similar scenarios in the same or different forms are 
possible 
in virtually any one of the 14 former Union republics. 
<H6>  1. Stabilization and Recovery of the Economy </H6>
  Do we have a chance to revive the economy in the majority's 
interests? Yes, we do. The only problem is to switch on the 
mechanism for rational utilization of Russia's national wealth: 
its intellectual potential and its natural resources. 
  Privatization or nationalization, plan or market -- these 
cannot be examined as the ends of the new economic 
policy. They are only the means. 
  It is necessary not only to simply proclaim the value of 
man, 
his dignity, and his inalienable rights and freedom, but also to 
guarantee them economically for the overwheleming majority of 
citizens. We cannot allow ourselves to "consume" the heritage 
of our grandchildren and ruin our country by selling off the raw 
materials, land, and intellectual property, reducing the level 
of production and the standards of morality, education, health 
care, and ecological safety, and allowing crime to rise. 
  Therefore, the following are suggested as end objectives of 
the new economic course: 
  1. To ensure not just Russia's survival as a unified 
autonomous state, but also its rebirth. 
  2. To occupy a leading position in the group of the world 
community's leader-countries. 
  3. To ensure a befitting quality of life according to world 
standards. 
  Such an effective economic course would require a 
substantial 
revision of federal priorities, a sharp increase 
in the proportion of production investment, enhancement of 
their efficiency, and implementation of state regulation of 
structural changes in production. 
  The distribution of labor, material, and financial resources 
between the civilian and military spheres is one of the most 
important national economic proportions. In view of all the 
peculiarities of Russia's geopolitical situation, it is 
important to bear in mind that military expenditures in 
developed countries account for less than 5 percent of GNP. A 
desire to reach approximately the same degree of nonproductive 
utilization of resources in Russia by the end of this century 
would reduce to a minimum the negative economic consequences of 
military expenditures. 
  The short-term plans should be to ensure the 
economy's stabilization with priority development for the 
sectors geared to satisfying primary vital needs. At the same 
time, investment opportunities for the retooling of production 
should be boosted. 
  The medium-term plans should aim for structural 
changes and renewal of the base resource-saving technologies, 
which will be largely geared to the consumer market. 
  The long-term plans should be to implement a 
transition to an innovation economy, when acceptable losses in 
the rate of economic growth should be the price to paid for the 
pursuit of a policy aimed at social progress and ecological 
safety. 
  A program for the economy's revival must provide guidance 
for actions. Its coordinated principles and guidelines should 
provide the foundation for the authorities' legislative 
activity. Only then will the economy, "working" within a 
legislative framework which promotes its development in the 
interests of the majority of citizens, become really free. 
  In order to gain the people's trust, the government is bound 
to publicize its plans and the progress in their 
fulfillment. Its activity should be judged not only by the 
improved quality of life but also by the protection of the 
interests of all of society's citizens, which should become the 
norm. 
  The question of the optimal pace of transformations remains 
as acute as ever. This pace must not be arbitrarily set, it 
ought to correspond with society's real potential rather than 
with the wishes of the initiators of reforms. The experience of 
Russia and other countries testifies that it is impossible to 
effect privatization and introduce the market at a stroke, or to 
create within a year or two a quantity of private farms which 
could succeed in solving the food problem. At least 10 years 
will be needed to modernize indistry, transportation, and 
agriculture. 
  Any delay in the implementation of pressing transformations 
is equally impermissible. 
  There is no need to conceal from the people the full gravity 
of the situation prevailing in the country. The best possible 
way for extrication from the crisis can be found only by facing 
up to the truth, otherwise we will once more end up with 
numerous promises followed by explanations why they were not 
honored. 
  So far there has been no success in halting or even slowing 
down the slump in production which has been going on for 
three years now. It is approaching 50 percent in industry 
(in other words, production is being almost halved, which would 
bring it down to the level of the 1960's). December 1993 alone 
saw a 12-percent slump. The opposition's claims that the 
country is being deindustrialized reflect not only the 
sharply contested election campaign but also the real 
"development" trends. The situation is equally alarming 
in agriculture and especially in breeding 
stock, where production has declined by 42 percent. 
  The main harbinger of disaster is the fact that the 
foundations of growth have been undermined, since capital 
investments in the national economy have undergone such sharp 
and manyfold reduction, and the renewal of equipment and 
technology has been halted. 
  The slump in production also leads to a decline of the 
population's living standards and a sharp deterioration of the 
population's physical conditions of existence. According to 
data from Russia's Sanitation and Epidemiology Service, 20 
percent of the population suffer from energy famine due to 
inadequate nutrition. It is not in vain that people are already 
talking about the problem of physical survival. 
  A reduction of capital investments and defense expenditures 
will only partly soften the blow on living standards, but it is 
fraught, first with accelerated slump of production and, second, 
with a decline of the country's defense capability and security. 
  The sharp exacerbation of the foodstuffs crisis in the last 
two-three years was conditioned not only by the decline of the 
production of agricultural output. Former and existing 
kolkhozes and sovkhozes and their transformed production 
structures are in a most serious financial situation; they are 
overstocked with output which either fails to reach the consumer 
or, having made its way to him, its price has increased manyfold. 
  It would appear that the following causes have led to the 
sector's stagnation: 

  -  The sharp and sizeable reduction of all types of state 
support for the agro-industrial complex and the elimination of 
the state system for material and technical supplies. 
  -  The disruption of the equivalence of agriculture's 
intesectoral 
and interregional relations with resource-supplying and 
servicing sectors. 
  -  The collapse of organizational structures with organized 
production and the attempts to replace them with new structures 
without the necessary conditions for their effective operations. 
  -  The decline of scientific and technical standards in the 
agro-industrial sector and the degradation of science through 
inadequate funding, which deprives the agro-industrial complex 
of any development prospects. 

    Energetic measures of state protectionism will be 
required in the next few years so as to develop and economically 
consolidate the agro-industrial complex. 
  The sociopolitical situation. Although a 
sizeable proportion of the population remains politically 
indifferent, the last few years have seen an intensive political 
polarization of forces in the country, which has brought 
forth the growing threat of civil war. The events in 
October 1993 most graphically demonstrated this danger. When 
analyzing the causes, it is impossible to allow simplistic 
interpretations and reduce everything to just the activity of 
extremist elements. A considerable role in the 3-4 October 
events was played by the calamitous situation and despair of 
many people, whose living standards have sharply declined and 
whose life's aspirations have collapsed. 
  The causes also include instances of insults against the 
national and patriotic feelings of Russia's population, which 
are frequently encountered in the mass media. If the word 
"patriot" becomes an insult, if Russia's history is grossly 
discredited, if the national culture's world-standard 
achievements are denigrated as being third-rate, and if the idea 
of the people's inadequacy is openly proclaimed, this will 
provoke racial and national enmity. An end must be put to 
this by using the force of the law. 
  The Federal Assembly can serve society's sociopolitical 
consolidation and the pooling of efforts by different political 
forces. There are great opportunities here, since the current 
polarization stems not so much from objective processes but from 
subjective efforts by different political parties and movements. 
<H6>  2. Structural Reorganization of Russia's Economy </H6>
  The crisis in the socioeconomic system is directly reflected 
in the structural and investment crises. 
<H5>  Need for and Problems of Structural Transformations </H5>
  Structural imbalances are the consequence of the economic 
development strategy geared mainly toward maxium growth of the 
state's resources potential and its defense capability. 
  But a noticeable sectoral differentiation is occurring 
against the general background of the slump in production in the 
Russian Federation in 1992-1993. Specifically, there are 
substantial reductions of the volumes of output in the light and 
food industries -- the basis of the consumer complex. 
  The long-term task is to radically renew technologies and 
switch to the science-intensive and ecologically safe variety of 
economic growth. The saving and the more rational and more 
efficient utilization of investment resources are highly 
important for the structural restructuring. This presupposes a 
"revision" of the resource potential of the investment complex. 
  Savings of investment resources are practicable, for 
example: 

  -  in the machine bulding complex via reliance on end 
products and consumer goods; 
  -  in the metallurgy complex via sharp reduction of demand for 
series-produced metal output and the switching of metal from the 
defense complex to civilian machine building; 
  -  in the fuel and energy complex via more rational selection of 
projects for the extraction, transportation, and thoroughness of 
refining oil, gas, and coal. 

    The policy of state regulation of investments could yield a 
positive effect subject to "offensive" and "defensive" measures 
embracing all sectors of the economy and maintaining its 
structural and technological integrity. State support must 
encourage the development of high-tech, science-intensive, and 
competitive production. 
  The strategic line of the sectoral structure's restructuring 
must be the consistent renewal of sectoral technology. 
Priorities must be determined accordingly. It is primarily 
necessary: 

  -  to modernize the production, technical, and scientific 
base in the primary sectors of the fuel and energy complex, 
machine building, agriculture, and transportation via the 
utilization of state and foreign investments, including those 
from nearby foreign countries; 
  -  to create export-oriented production in machine building, 
primarily on the basis of leading military enterprises, and to 
ensure the development of machine tool and instruments 
production, instrument making, electronics, and electrical 
engineering; 
  -  to create import-replacing production in the light industry 
and 
reorientate (replace) the weakened production-sharing links; 
  -  to ensure a reduction of the losses of energy and timber 
resources and agricultural raw materials via high-tech 
processing. 

    In the process of structural reorientation, the state 
cannot be allowed to retreat from the management of economic 
development. It is called upon to elaborate the strategy of 
the conversion of military production and the preservation and 
efficient utilization of the military-industrial potential; to 
pursue a regional policy coupled with the structural 
restructuring of industry; to accumulate material, technical, 
and financial resources for the development of the economy's 
social and cultural sectors (ensuring the social orientation of 
reforms). It is necessary to take stock of industry's 
production, resource, and technology base. 
  The transition to the system of market relations has 
created the most complex survival conditions for virtually all 
industrial production. The prolonged absence of 
formulated priorities in sectoral policy and of a considered 
regional policy has also aggravated the difficulties in the 
modernization of Russia's industrial structure. In the 
conditions of market relations, certain advantages have been 
gained by those who have managed to achieve the narrowest 
possible specialization in production and have then brought 
their output up to modern standards. Of course, in this case we 
are talking about a rational perception of the problems of 
narrow specialization in production, which is not tantamount to 
monopolism. For example, no other country in the world 
practices the utilization of basic production waste by raising 
such waste to the level of consumer goods. It is only in our 
country that the production of consumer goods as a way to 
utilize basic production waste from the country's industrial 
giants has become dominant. 
  The future production of consumer goods by base and defense 
sectors would appear especially problematic in the light of the 
lifting of restrictions on the importation of foreign-made 
consumer goods and of the planned commodity 
"intervention." It is easy to forecast a crash in the 
event of nonspecialized production of consumer goods: A crisis 
of overproduction will occur. In these conditions it is worth 
noting the possibility of manufacturing "dual purpose" articles. 
This will enable the national industry and science to actively 
compete for consumers at the products market and, at the same 
time, will encourage the utilization and improvement of our own 
technological potential. 
  In addition to the fact that industrial enterprises in the 
base sectors will become suppliers of material and social 
consumer goods for the domestic market, they are also mass 
consumers of these goods in the conditions of exacerbating 
economic crisis in the country. What we mean is the adverse 
trend toward the barter of their output for consumer goods, in 
other words the withdrawal of sizeable consignments of goods 
from the market. 
  Unfortunately, the curtailment of supply is gathering pace. 
Consumer goods are at present actively bought for 
intradepartmental distribution. The economy's 
liberalization by the methods of "shock therapy" has resulted in 
major economic and political errors and massive decline of the 
population's living standards. A catastrophic distortion 
has been allowed to occur in the consumer sphere: As a result 
of the reduction of effective demand, noawadays only one person 
out of 1,000 can allow himself, subject to rigid savings from 
the family budget, to buy the cheapest of refrigerators or 
television sets. This imposes restrictive bounds on the 
progressive structure of demand and supply (production). 
  Some people think that there has been and there is no 
alternative to the chosen course. Of course, initially the 
situation was extremely depressing and precluded any swift and 
serious progress. But the weakening of the economy, the 
disintegration of traditional economic ties, and the growing 
inflation -- all this actually generated the need for radical 
measures to restore the manageability of the national economy 
and the utilization of all levers of state influence compatible 
with the process of transition to the market. 
<H5>  Conversion in the System of Structural Changes </H5>
  In the conditions in Russia, which has inherited from the 
USSR a hypertrophied military industry, conversion emerges as a 
major reserve for the country's economic development and for 
substantially boosting the manufacture of civilian commodities 
for consumption and investment purposes. 
  But the switching of military enterprises to civilian tracks 
will require considerable time and major funds. Essentially, 
conversion is an investment process requiring short-term 
expenditure for the sake of long-term benefits. Investment 
decisions affecting the conversion of production, new 
construction, and the organization of supply and marketing have 
always involved risk. The risk associated with the 
implementation of large-scale conversion projects can be reduced 
by in-depth technical and economic studies of the transition to 
the manufacture of new output. 
  The country is profoundly concerned about the progress and 
prospects of conversion activity. In many instances it has 
hardly produced any results, having traversed the path from 
"conversion by edict" to "free-for-all conversion." 
  It would seem expedient to conduct a state inspection 
of major conversion projects in 1994 involving independent 
experts in the analysis of financial and other problems. A 
special government decree could be adopted on the basis of a 
summation of the inspection's results. This is also 
necessitated by the ratification of the Russian Federation's 
military doctrine, whose provisions make it possible to 
determine the scale and pace of the release of resources from 
the military sphere and, correspondingly, of conversion activity 
in the coming years. 
<H5>  The Modern Course of Industrial Policy </H5>
  The objective of the state's selective structural 
policy, in line with the 12 April 1993 decree of the 
Russian Federation Council of Ministers-Government, is to 
ensure the enhanced efficiency of social production via targeted 
changes of its structure, technological standards, and lists of 
items produced, and the stabilization and growth of the 
financial and economic interest of enterprises and 
entrepreneurs. With a view to financial stabilization, the 
government has planned a series of measures regulating the 
federal budget's relations with territorial budgets and so on. 
Credits for industry play a special role in this process. On 
the one hand, the mass provision of credit for enterprises has 
slowed down the accelerating slump in production but, on the 
other hand, it has intensified inflation and has led to the 
stabilization of the flawed structure of production with which 
we are living today. 
  The government took the path of detailing a selective 
structural policy which presupposes choice from options which 
have not lived up to expectations. But our country's 
inefficient economy makes it very difficult to pick a sector 
which can be painlessly abandoned. 
  The selectiveness of structural policy is also based on 
financial levers. The unconditional and efficient utilization 
of limited financial resources presupposes their targeted 
utilization and rigid choice of priorities. At the same time, 
the proclaimed priorities essentially extend to all sectors of 
the national economy. "Capital investments in priority sectors" 
(the fuel and energy complex, the chemical industry, the 
agro-industrial complex, transport and communications, the 
military-industrial complex, and science) account for 70 percent 
of capital investments. If we add to this the investments in 
housing construction, the government intends to control about 90 
percent of all capital investments. The implementation of this 
program will lead not to any enhancement of the state's role, 
but to preservation of its monopoly status in the sphere of 
investments and state control of the formation and distribution 
of financial resources. 
  The state's selective structural program says nothing about 
the economic criteria for assessing the efficiency of investment 
programs and projects. 
  The proposed criterion for sectoral affiliation will lead to 
wholesale provision of credits for sectors regardless of their 
technical standards and production efficiency. The program does 
not reveal the organizational plan of structural policy. In the 
past this was done during the elaboration of state plans which 
included resource indicators, end results, and efficiency levels. 
  In our opinion, the structural investment policy must be 
built on the basis of directive and indicative plans. Moreover, 
the sole criterion of efficiency must be the technical standards 
and competitivenss of production and the extent to which output 
meets world standards. Budget appropriations and credits could 
be allocated for the implementation of such projects. 
  It is well known that a leading position among the 
priorities 
of structural policy is assigned to the development of the fuel 
and energy complex, on which the provision of vital services for 
the economy and the development of export potential depend. 
Here it is necessary to be aware of the danger of hypertrophy 
and the possible transformation of an economy, which may not be 
efficient but is nonetheless industrially developed, into an 
energy and raw materials appendage of the world economy. In 
this context it would appear expedient to elaborate a 
concept of Russia's economic security and its participation in 
the system of international division of labor -- taking 
into account the entire complex of national-state interests, 
including strategic interests. 
  Despite the numerous attempts to stabilize the ruble, 
Russia is in a financial blind alley today. The 
government's anti-inflation measures produce the diametrically 
opposite results. According to our forecasts, the Goznak [Main 
Administration for Production of State Bank Notes, Coins, and 
Medals] printing presses will inevitably work harder in 1994. 
There is a view that an extrication from the crisis is possible 
through the creation of a new ruble. 
  Drawing parallels with the two hyperinflations in Germany, 
for example, we will be unable to cope with this problem without 
international assistance. A Russian international bank ought to 
be set up in Switzerland by decision of the Russian Federation 
Government and the IMF. The IMF could provide the promised $6 
billion as a foreign currency backup for the new ruble. 
  Over a period of 6-12 months Russia will earn a similar 
amount, including earnings from exports, payments for which will 
be paid directly into this bank's account. Having accumulated 
$12 billion, the bank will embark on the launch of a new ruble 
and will begin using the new currency for partial settlement 
with exporting enterprises. The new Russian currency will be 
gradually transferred to the Central Bank of the Russian 
Federation. It will be converted into dollars at the rate of 
1:1. The old and new rubles could circulate in parallel. 
  At the same time, the Russian Federation Government ought to 
launch a large-scale program to combat unemployment. 
The labor force being released could be channeled into the 
building of highways, railroads, and airports. The new rubles 
will be initially concentrated around exporting enterprises, 
enabling them to recruit the most skilled personnel. This will 
serve as an incentive for other enterprises holding foreign 
currency to repatriate it and convert it into new rubles. 
Consequently, the circulation of the new Russian currency will 
be stepped up and this will lead to economic recovery. Once 
Russia has repaid the $6 billion to the IMF, the Russian 
international bank can be moved to Moscow. 
<H6>  3. Agrarian Reform </H6>
  For the fourth year running the economy's agrarian 
sector is experiencing the growing effect of the irreversible 
processes of breakdown of production and its material and 
technical base, impoverishment of the peasantry itself, and 
degradation of the countryside. 
  The socioeconomic situation in the agro-industrial complex 
testifies that the economic reforms being implemented in the 
country have led to a slump in production and have disrupted the 
economic parity prevailing in the early 1990's between rural 
commodity producers and industrial enterprises, and this in turn 
has led to the countryside's devastation, accumulation of debts 
owed by all farms, and protracted crisis. 
  This extremely dangerous situation stems from reforms which 
have not been properly thought out, the price disparity between 
industry and agriculture, and the constantly rising prices of 
all means of production, fuel, and construction and other 
materials used in the countryside. 
  We are seeing primarily the ruin of large-scale specialized 
production which, for the most part, has been up to world 
standards in terms of its efficiency. In stockbreeding, for 
example, these powerful production units are working at just 
one-third of even less of their capacity through the lack of 
feeds. Losses in the stockbreeding sector could be recouped by 
at least 12-15 years of extremely intensive work. 
  The intensification of long-term negative trends, primarily 
the decline of the agrarian sector's production potential, is 
especially alarming. There is a catastrophic decline of soil 
fertility, and virtually all social programs for the 
reorganization of the Russian countryside have been cut back. 
  The rural population's mortality rate in Russia as a 
whole is 32 percent higher than the urban population's. 
Not a single state has ever suffered such losses. 
  Passions have been raging in society over the last few years 
about the right to privately own land and turn it into a 
commodity to be sold and purchased. This most complex 
question ought to be seriously examined. The mass media are 
using the terms "private ownership" and "personal ownership" as 
interchangeable. Nobody objects to the right to privately own 
land in the form of peasants' yards or land parcels for use as 
gardens or kitchen gardens by urban dwellers. On the whole, 
however, land for the commodity production of agricultural 
produce can belong only to those who cultivate it with their own 
labor. P.A. Stolypin, in his 9 November 1909 manifesto, 
allocated a vast quantity of new lands for peasants but did not 
once use the words "private ownership" but spoke of personal 
ownership, in other words possession and utilization, but not 
disposal. 
  Profitability levels should not fall below 75 percent in 
order to ensure the normal functioning of all forms of economic 
management in the countryside. If there is no success in 
establishing control over the formation of prices for the 
countryside's means of production, it will be necessary to 
immediately release the prices of agricultural produce. After 
all, the freedom of some commodity producers should not turn 
into economic bondage for others. 
  Unfortunately, the cancellation of all forms of subsidies 
will only step up the degradation of the countryside and of 
agricultural production. 
  Such irreparable damage must not be allowed to occur. It is 
necessary to use all available and sensible means to prevent the 
collapse of Russia's agro-industrial complex, to radically 
change the financial and credit relations between the state and 
the farms producing agricultural produce, and to put an end to 
government support for the commercial banks' predatory policy. 
Financial and credit policy ought to be in the state's hands. 
  The following must be inalienable components of the 
program for boosting the agro-industrial complex: 


    -  Forming on a voluntary basis a mixed economy in the 
agro-industrial sector and providing state support for 
agricultural enterprises under all forms of ownership and 
management. 
  -  Ensuring price parity in agriculture's intersectoral 
exchange with other sectors of the national economy, and 
establishing stable incomes for agricultural commodity producers 
making it possible to conduct expanded reproduction. 
  -  Ensuring fulfillment of the Law on Grain as regards support 
for grain producers. 
  -  Ensuring transition to a standard land tax for agricultural 
commodity producers, state protectionism in financial policy for 
the agrarian sector, and preferential credits. 
  -  Creating a state food fund. Produce for it could be 
acquired in exchange for resource materials at agreed prices. 
  -  Ensuring in January-February 1994 resources for rural 
commodity producers for the spring sowing campaign: seeds, 
equipment, spare parts, fuel, and lubricants. A decision must 
be adopted on preferential state credits, to be repaid by 
agricultural produce. 
  -  Accelerating the creation of an extra-budget fund for 
financial support for the agro-industrial complex. Special 
attention must be given to the countryside's social development, 
the enhancement of soil fertility, the development of land 
reclamation, machine building, and the processing and food 
industries, and the production of mineral fertilizers and plant 
and animal protection agents. 
  -  Ensuring state support for agrarian science and the 
assimilation of its elaborations in production, and for cadre 
training. 
  -  Reviewing the state's export and import policy as regards 
purchases abroad of agricultural produce produced in the Russian 
Federation. 
  -  Putting a stop to the export of mineral fertilizers needed 
to satisfy domestic demand. 

<H6>    4. The Stabilization of Finances </H6>
  The financial and banking system is in a state of crisis. 
The current problems are largely and historically rooted in 
problems existing earlier in the USSR. The collapse of the 
USSR, together with other political, social, military, and other 
factors not directly associated with finances, has aggravated 
this package of problems severalfold. There is no doubt 
that all these negative factors and their impact on the 
financial system will persist also in 1994. 
  At the same time, there are also the mistakes and errors 
committed recently, which call for special mention. 
  The last two years have shown that the overcoming of the 
slump in production and the acceleration of structural changes 
in Russia's national economy cannot be guaranteed exclusively by 
the means of monetary and credit policy. Furthermore, such an 
approach is flawed in its very foundations. 
  In the conditions of inflation, the capitals of enterprises 
and banks are being swiftly devalued while credit operations are 
being essentially curtailed, even though the indicators -- 
without any adjustment for inflation -- speak of an apparent 
growth of credit operations and foreign currency on balance 
sheets. If they were to be adjusted for inflation, they would 
be sharply reduced. 
  The main causes of inflation are the sharp decline of 
production, the arbitrary prices set by enterprises in 
conditions of monopolism and commodity shortages, the budget 
deficit, the breakdown of economic ties with enterprises in 
former Union republics and CEMA countries, and the exportation 
of Russian commodities at dumping prices. These are the 
factors that lead to an imbalance between the money in 
circulation and the commodities avilable for purchase. 
  Errors in the implementation of economic reforms and the 
super-rigid monetarist credit policy, together with confusion in 
calculations, have intensified the slump in production and 
fueled inflation. The main lever for holding inflation back 
ought to be the credit support for viable enterprises. If 
enterprises do not receive credits to meet production costs and 
cover deferred payments, they would be altogether unable to 
function and, due to mass production stoppages, inflation would 
be many times greater. 
  In conditions that encourage incessant price 
increases and decline of the ruble's purchasing power, it is 
impossible to achieve normal commodity-money circulation, 
including the maintenance of balance between the total price of 
commodities in circulation and the total amount of money 
released into circulation. What should be the specific measures 
that would make it possible to satisfy the commodity market at 
prices acceptable by the majority of the population? 
  One of the strategic solutions is to restrict the amount of 
money in circulation. Last year, this resulted in a huge total 
of reciprocal nonpayments. Prices went up and the enterprises' 
money evaporated. But credit emission is still being curtailed 
by whipping up interest rates. The ruble's purchasing power is 
falling uncontrollably because prices are rising without 
restraint. The imbalance between the value of commodities in 
circulation and the total amount of money in circulation is 
widening. In a normal economic process, money serves as a 
technical means of payment when exchanged for commodities. If 
there is no money, commodity-money circulation is slowed down 
and disrupted, since commodity production is curtailed. 
Although everyone cites the need for credit emission to be held 
back by the Central Bank, commodity producing enterprises are in 
debt. This is confirmed by the correlation of the growth of 
prices and of money in circulation: Over a two-year period the 
former increased by a factor of between 100 and 1,000, while the 
total amount of money increased only by a factor of 10 to 15. 
  While commodity producers are cutting back and curtailing 
production, the budget deficit is growing at a mad pace each 
year. But how are the state's inordinately rising expenses to be 
covered if the enterprises' revenues are falling and, 
consequently, budget revenues from taxation are reduced? The 
difference (approximately 20 trillion rubles) will have to be 
covered by money emission. This reveals the main cause of 
inflation -- budget expenditures are beginning to exceed the 
total value of commodities produced for circulation. 
  But we cannot avoid deliberate and controlled 
inflationary expenditure on investments and the production of 
commodity produce. Even five years ago, the country would 
have needed trillions of rubles to replace worn out equipment 
and thus ensure simple reproduction. This accounts for 50 to 60 
percent of all fixed assets in production. At today's prices, 
the amount of money needed would be 1,000 times greater. 
Without restoring the fixed assets, we will be unable to build 
a market economy and solve social problems. Meanwhile, 
investments in the last two years have been scanty. 
Furthermore, a sizeable proportion has been devalued because 
the investment period spans several years. Investments in 
production have been reduced by a factor of about five compared 
with the minimum that is necessary. Enterprises are 
consuming their depreciation reserves, let alone their profits. 
This is yet another consequence of irresponsibility and the 
false perception of economic freedom. 
  Evidently, we should not count on the foreign credits that 
have been promised. Therefore, in order to revive the 
economy, we will be unable to manage without inflationary credit 
emission, but a credit emission that is accurately verified 
and controlled. It must be noted that in a healthy economic 
system, high interest rates are set in order to reduce 
inflation. In our own conditions today, high interest rates 
prompt a faster pace of price increases and further devaluation 
of money. Fast growth of commodity production can be 
achieved by lowering interest rates while accelerating the 
turnover of funds and providing targeted credits for the 
economy. This means an economic effect for both creditor 
and commodity producer. This is the way to extricate ourselves 
more swiftly from the grip of inflation. 
  But we will change nothing in our life today without solving 
the general questions of financial and economic policy, without 
establishing firm rules of the game. It is, after all, no 
secret: Many people are in favor of a market without rules. 
Primarily middlemen, traders, and dealers. As well as some 
commercial banks with their high interest rates for credits 
funded by their borrowing from the Central Bank, which itself 
sets the tone in this sphere. 
  The rules of the game in the market today can be established 
only by general agreement between all sides. This is normal 
behavior in developed countries. The destruction of what has 
already been created will continue without such an agreement, 
without any organized principles. 
<H5>  The Monetary-Credit System </H5>
  The disparity between the banking system models in Russia 
and 
other countries is the main cause hindering their 
integration in a single financial area. The models applied 
in Russia are substantially different from the models of the 
world's banking business and encourage the 
speculative-commercial accumulation of capital rather than its 
investment in production supplying commodities to the market. 
  The second important reason hindering the 
integration of the Russian and the world's monetary-credit 
systems is the underdevelopment of modern long-term forms of 
settlement in Russia. 
  In these conditions, the attempt to elaborate the best 
possible course in credit policy and reform the system of 
settlements in the national economy is perceived by the Central 
Bank of Russia as a priority task. 
  The objectives of the Bank of Russia's monetary-credit 
policy 
are enshrined in the Basic Guidelines of Monetary-Credit 
Regulation in 1993, ratified by the Supreme Soviet, and in the 
24 May 1993 Economic Policy Statement by the Government and the 
Central Bank. Both documents set the main task of slowing down 
inflation which devalues the population's money incomes and 
savings, deforms production and trade, and distorts economic 
guidelines for participants in economic relations. 
  Proceeding from the premise that the rate of inflation 
depends on the rate of money supply, it ought to be expected 
that, after a certain time lag, credit restrictions should 
result in a slowing down of price increases. But inflation 
stood at 20 percent in June, 22 percent in July, 26 percent in 
August, and 23 percent in September. During the first nine 
months of 1993, wholesale and consumer prices increased by a 
factor of 7.3 and 6.3 respectively. Thus, the basic approach 
toward the curbing of inflation has proved useless. 
  The rising prices of energy sources (of gas in February and 
of coal in July) remained the main factor of inflation. 
  The monopoly status of individual groups of producers 
provided the main cause of the accelerated increase of wholesale 
prices and, after a brief interval, of consumer prices as well. 
Inflation in Russia is expected to reach 900 to 1,000 percent 
in 1993 as a whole. 
  The state of the monetary-credit sphere remains very 
complex. 
It is not only instability in the economy but also uncertainty 
as regards the state budget that hinder any forecast of the 
future dynamics of growth of the money in circulation and, 
consequently, any effective regulation of its level. 
  In order to ensure a stable reduction of the rate of 
inflation, the Central Bank's actions ought to be backed by an 
appropriate budgetary and taxation policy. The inefficient 
distribution of centralized credits is fraught with the danger 
that a new crisis of nonpayments might develop; large-scale 
financial injections might be required in order to avoid it and 
this, in its turn, will lead to an expansion of unsatisfied 
effective demand and higher rates of inflation. The gravity of 
this threat is proved even more graphically by the fact that 40 
percent of centralized credits received by enterprises are used 
by them to cover current debts. 
  It is necessary to enhance the efficiency of 
supervision and control of the activity of commercial banks. 
  When financing regional programs, it is necessary to utilize 
the potential of credit partnerships and the advantages of 
mortgage credit, and to create municipal banks. As regards 
targeted state credits, these funds ought to be primarily 
channeled into the implementation of specific projects 
associated with the development of market infrastructure at 
regional level. 
  The most important prerequisite for an efficient credit 
policy and the improvement of the payments and settlements 
system is to preserve the common economic area and the unified 
monetary-credit and banking system within Russia's framework. 
<H5>  Settlements Between CIS States </H5>
  One of the most complex problems concerns settlements with 
the CIS states, many of which have either switched, or are in 
the process of switching, to their own monetary systems. The 
regulation of interstate settlements is hindered by the ruble's 
uncertain status and by the difficulties standing in the way of 
coordinating the monetary-credit policy of central or national 
banks in the former USSR republics. 
  Russia must build its relations with former USSR republics 
with due consideration for their policy aimed either at 
preserving the single economic and currency area or at 
withdrawing from it. 
  The agreement between Russia and Belarus on the unification 
of their banking systems could serve as a prototype of new 
financial relations in the CIS. 
<H5>  Taxes, Credits, Banks </H5>
  Taxes, credits, consumption funds, and wages remain the main 
levers for state regulation of market relations. Taxation 
policy must limit the volume and size of these taxes and must 
encourage and stimulate coomodity producers not in words but by 
lowering the tax liability of those who boost production and by 
giving preferential credits, while the banks should amend the 
normatives for the formation and utilization of these funds. 
The banks must stimulate and encourage them to boost the volume 
of investments in production. 
  If we were to admit today that commodity producers must be 
supported, these specific amendments must be enacted in current 
legislation and any additional laws that might be needed must be 
adopted. 
  A major mistake is being committed today: Attempts are made 
to restrain inflation by virtually nothing but monetarist 
methods -- by raising the base rate and rigidly limiting the 
credits for enterprises. And yet the ruble's strength depends 
mainly on the status of material production and the balance of 
the state budget. So far, the economy in Russia has not been 
functioning as a self-tuning mechanism. Therefore, it is of 
course a mistake to apply all the methods which operate in a 
developed market economy. In these conditions, a moderately 
tough credit policy would be the most appropriate. It must be 
tough but, nonetheless, we have no right to deprive the healthy 
nucleus of the country's economy of credit overnight. 
  There is the especially urgent question of the 
concept of the further development and building of our 
national banking system. Russia has approximately 1,800 
commercial banks, 88 percent of which are small and medium banks 
with a registration capital of up to 100 million rubles. Their 
interests must also be taken into account. After all, there is 
no uncommitted money in Russia, no such money is held by the 
enterprises and organizations which are the main founders of 
banks. 
  The Economic Market Conditions Center under the Russian 
Federation Council of Ministers-Government conducted a study of 
the business activity of Russia's commercial banks. There were 
173 banks taking part in the poll: 79 small, 46 medium, and 48 
large ones. An analysis of the replies showed that the majority 
of bankers believe in an opportunity to improve the situation of 
both their own banks and of the banking system as a whole. 
Higher profits are anticipated by 92 percent of them. Nine out 
of every 10 banks expect to boost their reserves. None of the 
banks has any intention of reducing its staff numbers, while 
some even expect to increase their staff. 
  Nonetheless, about 40 percent of bankers report 
possible cutbacks in their services for state enterprises: 72 
percent believe that the financial-economic situation of their 
clients in the state sector will deteriorate; more than 
one-third of banks do not expect their deposit base to be 
boosted by state enterprises. 
  Almost all banks reported that they do not plan any 
cutbacks in credits for commercial structures in 1994. In this 
process, they will give preference to short-term credits. 
  The commercial banks are striving to expand the sphere of 
their operations. But the investment of the banks' own funds in 
commercial enterprises is a high-risk operation that could lead 
to a reduction of their capital availability and the emergence 
of difficulties with liquidity and solvency. Furthermore, in 
individual cases, the banks use for such purposes not only their 
own funds but also funds attracted from their clients, thus 
exposing not only themselves but also their depositors to 
additional risks. 
  In this context, the Bank of Russia plans to submit a 
proposal on amendments to banking legislation as regards 
limiting the proportion of the bank's own capital being utilized 
and the formation of registered capital by other nonbanking 
legal entities. 
  We need to work on a law on banks and banking operations and 
the central bank and, in all likelihood, it will serve a dual 
purpose. 
  Many of the administrative measures today are essentially 
antimarket, antientrepreneurial, and antistate. There is 
a trend toward transforming the Russian economy into an economy 
dependent on the world market and the developed countries. 
  It is necessary to change the course of economic policy and 
the strategy and tactics of economic reforms; we should bring to 
the foreground the priorities of our own country's 
industrialists, entrepreneurs, agrarians, private farmers, and 
workers. This means amending all the components of 
financial-credit policy, including taxation, budget, foreign 
economic activity, and privatization. 
  Destatization and privatization must be 
conducted on legitimate grounds and in the interests of the 
widest possible social strata. But the means and methods of 
privatization being applied today are a retreat from Russian 
laws and a disregard for the interests of our country's 
industrialists and entrrpreneurs. Controlling blocks of shares 
in many privatized plants and highly profitable Russian 
enterprises are often acquired by foreign capital through 
proxies. 
  The strengthening and stabilization of the Russian 
ruble is the most important condition for the national 
economy's revival. The policy being pursued today certainly 
needs amendment, because it is making the Russian national 
currency dependent on the demand for and supply of foreign 
currencies, on the dollarization of the Russian market. 
  The strengthening of the ruble will also be served by the 
imposition of order in foreign economic activity, 
which incurs major losses of foreign currency. But even here 
the government still retains unjustified import subsidies and 
increases duties and taxes which raise prices still higher and 
fuel inflation. 
  Now it is already perfectly clear that the period of 
transition to the new economy will take years. Bearing this 
fact in mind, the government and the Central Bank must elaborate 
a long-term economic and credit-monetary policy, in which 
a central position should be assigned to the state regulation of 
the economy and the creation of favorable conditions for 
the development of productive and entrepreneurial activity. 
  In the long term, financial stabilization lays the 
foundations for growth of investments, but for the short term it 
can be confidently forecast that there will be a further 
reduction of investments in the national economy which, in the 
conditions of high degree of wear and tear or obsolescence of a 
sizeable proportion of fixed assets, could lead to a decline of 
technological discipline, accidents, substandard output, and 
breakage of technological links. 
  Among the questions of foreign currency-financial 
policy the main problem is not the choice of a rate of 
exchange system but the creation of economic prerequisites for 
its stabilization. We deem it expedient to aim for a 
breakthrough in the movement of the ruble's rate of exchange 
exclusively through official foreign currency investments. The 
use of intervention could be aimed at smooting out any excessive 
short-term fluctuations of the rate of exchange. 
  It is necessary to adopt substantial measures to impose 
effective foreign currency control in the Russian 
Federation, specifically to set up a Russian Federal Foreign 
Currency Control Service. 
  The Bank of Russia must organize more effective control over 
the movement of funds to correspondents' accounts held by 
Russian commercial banks for foreign banks. Legislative 
provision must also be made ruling out the transfer of foreign 
currency by natural persons to banks abroad and stepping up 
liability for breaches of foreign currency and customs 
legislation. 
  There is another important problem. Russia lacks funds for 
financing capital investments and the elaboration of 
innovations, which have a vast potential. This question must be 
solved in a largely decentralized manner. The banks 
participating in venture operations can earn sound returns, but 
their efforts must be channeled toward the coordination of 
resources. 
  We believe that the funds of commercial banks held in the 
Central Bank's reserves must be utilized for investments rather 
than for refinancing or for covering the budget deficit. This 
is yet another source of inflation. 
  Information about the status of finances, money circulation, 
and the credit market is highly important for the successful 
development of the new credit system and the stabilization of 
finances. 
<H6>  5. Social Policy </H6>
  Last fall a session of Russia's Ministry of the Economy 
Collegium examined the question "On the Draft Balance of the 
Population's Money Incomes and Expenditures in 1994." It 
analyzed the dynamics and structure of the formation and 
utilization of the population's money incomes in the past and 
the prospects for any possible changes in the future. 
  The liberalization of prices and the restraints on increases 
of wages and social benefits have resulted in a sharp decline of 
the real value of the population's money incomes. The 
earnings of Russia's population fell short by about 900 billion 
rubles [R] while the losses incurred by depositors, according to 
data of Russia's Goskomstat, amounted to R460 billion. 
  According to experts' estimates, the population's 
money incomes in 1994 will reach R68,300 billion. Bearing in 
mind that consumer prices are estimated to increase more than 
10-fold, the real value of money incomes will be significantly 
reduced. 
  A further growth of the population's nominal money incomes 
is 
planned for 1994. The average monthly wage in material 
production sectors will reach R350,000 (it is estimated that the 
average wage of workers in Russia was about R80,000 in September 
1993). Thus, there will be no success in slowing down the 
decline of the population's living standards. 
  Errors and mistakes in the elaboration and implementation of 
economic policy in the last few years have resulted in a 
catastrophic decline of living standards. Thus, compared with 
the end of 1991, the nominal increase of the population's money 
incomes managed to provide only 50-percent compensation for the 
increase of prices. In terms of the level of consumption of 
material goods. Russia has found itself (in terms of different 
categories of products and nonfood goods) thrust back by 10-20 
years. 
  There is also a deterioration of the structure of services 
rendered to the population, a structure which remains extremely 
defective. According to data of Russia's Goskomstat (based on 
results for the first nine months of 1993), dominant position 
was still held by passenger transport services, which currently 
account for 40 percent. The proportion of paid services by 
cultural institutions is declining due primarily to the reduced 
number of vistors. The high costs of travel and stay and the 
unstable situation in many of the traditional tourist resorts 
have curtailed the opportunities for meaningful rest by the 
population. Expenditure on payment for recreational services 
account for only 8.9 percent of the total expenditures by the 
population (against 9.7 percent in 1992). The housing and 
municipal services complex accounts for 12 percent of the total 
volume of services, 7 percent of which represents payment for 
housing. 
  One of the most negative results of the current economic 
policy is the sharp decline of the real value of the 
population's money savings. The GDP deflator increased by a 
factor of 430.8 between 1991 and mid-1993. As regards the 
population's financial deposits held by the Savings Bank, they 
have increased by a factor of only 6.5. Thus, taking into 
account the decline of the ruble's purchasing power, the 
population's money savings have been devalued by 98.5 percent. 
  According to Ministry of Labor calculations, Russia now 
has a stratum of superrich people -- about 3 million 
persons. They are mainly leaders of brokerage firms, 
commercial banks and exchanges, and individuals engaged in 
export-import operations. This group also includes criminals -- 
corrupt representatives of executive power and the bosses of 
organized crime who belong to the population group enjoying 
superhigh incomes. The main sources of the initial accumulation 
of capital are speculation, usury, appropriation of rent 
revenues formerly paid to the state, and criminal activity. 
Thus society is being rapidly stratified into a relatively 
small prospering stratum and the bulk of the poor mass of the 
population. According to Ministry of Labor data, "the poorest" 
comprise 40-50 percent, and the "simply poor" comprise 30-35 
percent of the population (see Table 2). 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2. Wealth Stratification of the Population, Poverty Lines, and Pover-| 
|ty Levels                                                                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Indicators        |1991              |Jun 1992          |Jun 1993          | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Incomes concentra-|0.256             |0.275             |0.325             | 
|tion index (Dzhin-|                  |                  |                  | 
|i [as translitera-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ted] coefficient)*|                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Correlation of th-|5.4               |7.2               |9.0               | 
|e level of averag-|                  |                  |                  | 
|e per capita inco-|                  |                  |                  | 
|me of the 10 perc-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ent richest and t-|                  |                  |                  | 
|he 10 percent poo-|                  |                  |                  | 
|rest members of t-|                  |                  |                  | 
|he population, fa-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ctor              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Subsistence wage (|200               |2,200             |18,000            | 
|upper threshold o-|                  |                  |                  | 
|f poverty), ruble-|                  |                  |                  | 
|s per person      |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Numbers of the po-|                  |                  |                  | 
|pulation with inc-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ome below the sub-|                  |                  |                  | 
|sistence minimum: |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|millions of perso-|17                |64                |44                | 
|ns                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|as percentage of  |11.7              |43.2              |29.5              | 
|total population  |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Minimum survival  |110               |1,200             |10,000            | 
|wage (lower thres-|                  |                  |                  | 
|hold of poverty), |                  |                  |                  | 
|rubles per person |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Numbers of the po-|                  |                  |                  | 
|pulation with inc-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ome               |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|below the minimum |                  |                  |                  | 
|survival wage:    |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|millions of perso-|1.4               |13                |11                | 
|ns                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|as percentage of  |1.0               |8.9               |6.2               | 
|total population  |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  *(Footnote) (The Dzhini coefficient shows the nature of the 
distribution of the population's total incomes among its 
individual groups. The higher the degree of society's 
polarization by level of income, the closer this coefficient is 
to 1. Conversely, in conditions of equal distribution of 
incomes in society, the Dzhini coefficient equals 0. 
[Rossiya-93, Ekonomicheskaya Konyunktura (Russia-93, Economic 
Market Conditions), Third Edition, Center of Economic Market 
Conditions under the Russian Council of 
Ministers-Government)] 
  The middle stratum of the population, which was numerically 
the largest in the past, now comprises only 10-15 percent. At 
the same time, it is undergoing a sharp deterioration of its 
professional and social structure. Formerly the middle class 
consisted mainly of skilled workers, the intelligentsia, and 
managers. Now all these strata have dropped to the social 
bottom. The growing difference in the sphere of material goods 
depends very little on personal effort. Some people are 
enriching themselves on a hitherto unprecedented scale at the 
cost of other people's impoverishment. 
  The level of the education and skills of the overwhelming 
part of workers and employees does not correspond with the level 
of their wages, since the ongoing social stratification -- in 
terms of scale and of orientation -- does not correspond with 
the changes in the economy and the employment of the population, 
whose parameters are comparable with those in the majority of 
developed countries. 
  1994 will see a continuation of the formation of a 
lower stratum of the population which is numerically large but 
lacks sufficient purchasing power, whose family members are 
forced to channel almost all of their money incomes into the 
satisfaction of primary needs rather than into the acquisition 
of consumer durables and savings, in other words the 
prerequisites for creating a firm base for stable long-term 
economic growth are being undermined. 
  The rising prices of the output of the fuel and energy and 
raw materials complexes have resulted in headlong increases of 
the prices of all other goods and services. This is the 
determining factor of the growth of both wholesale and consumer 
prices. 
  Thus, two years after the announcement and start of 
implementation of stabilization measures in Russia, there have 
been no positive changes in the race between consumer prices and 
the population's money incomes. 
<H6>  6. Toward Realism in Economic Policy </H6>
  Viktor Chernomyrdin, chairman of the Russian Federation 
Council of Ministers, and Viktor Gerashchenko, chairman of the 
Central Bank of Russia, adopted the joint "Statement on the 
Economic Policy of the Government and Central Bank of Russia." 
This document defines the basic guidelines which the government 
and the Bank of Russia intend to follow when pursuing the policy 
of financial stabilization and market development through the 
end of 1993 and in 1994. The official joint statement omits to 
appraise the economic policy being pursued. 
  In 1992-1993 state enterprises strove to compensate the 
growing shortage of means of payment primarily by raising the 
prices of their manufactured output. Furthermore, deliveries 
were effected despite the fast growth of reciprocal nonpayments. 
Essentially, the enterprises' indebtedness started playing 
the role of additional money in circulation, seriously weakening 
the financial restrictions of price increases. Thus, 
restrictive measures in the financial-budget and monetary-credit 
spheres of economic regulation proved ineffective. 
  The progressive decline of the volume of output of 
industrial 
production and the rash abolition of state controls over incomes 
and prices not only prevented a substantial reduction of 
effective demand but also encouraged the widening of the 
previously formed gap between total demand and supply. This gap 
acquired qualitatively new features, causing an inflationary 
growth of prices and a corresponding decline of the population's 
real incomes and living standards. 
  The snowballing destruction of economic ties, the decline of 
contractual discipline, and the substantial deterioration of the 
enterprises' financial positions have aggravated the situation. 
  The enterprises' mass indebtedness necessitated a choice 
between tough "monetarist" policy at any price, even including 
the closure of numerous production units, and support for 
investment and consumer demand and business activity. The 
development of events forced both the government and the Central 
Bank to urgently adopt measures and economic decisions along 
frankly proinflationary lines. There were reciprocal write-offs 
of nonpayments and enterprises were given financial 
"sustenance," which somewhat eased the nonpayments crisis. 
  But the reduction of inflation remains the fundamental 
objective of economic policy. Quantitative restrictions have 
been substantially eased. The plans were that the monthly rate 
of inflation would be brought down to below 10 percent by the 
end of 1993, and that price stabilization would be attained in 
1994. 
  The Statement does not contain any quantitative restrictions 
on the amount of budget deficit, and this is a clear retreat 
from previous intentions. 
  The Statement lays down that the total budget deficit will 
be 
limited by quarterly guidelines which, in their turn, ought to 
correspond with the Central Bank of Russia's quarterly limits on 
the total growth of credits. 
  Russia's government and Central Bank agreed with the 
proposal 
to gradually abandon the provision of all categories of targeted 
credits along Central Bank lines and to switch to the provision 
of subsidies only from the budget. With a view to implementing 
monetary-credit policy on a market basis, the Central Bank of 
Russia will substantially increase the proportion of credits it 
gives to commercial banks either through credit auctions or on 
market terms. The Central Bank also pledged to refrain from 
distributing targeted credits on a sectoral or regional basis 
and to give credits directly to specific enterprises. 
  In the sphere of currency exchange rates it was confirmed 
that the government perceives the creation of a standard market 
rate for the ruble as a key element of the transition to market 
economy. The Statement evades the question of the ruble's 
convertibility, noting that the transition to a stable exchange 
rate is a strategic task. 
  Thus, it appears that there is a gradual movement 
toward a strategic course whose objective is to enhance the 
manageability of the national economy and formulate a sober 
policy of state regulation of economic processes. The 
means are: selective support for production, moderately rigid 
monetary-credit policy, and manageable inflation even at the 
cost of budget deficit. Only then will it be possible to boost 
output, which ought to produce a stabilizing effect. 
  In order to change the overall socioeconomic situation in 
the 
country for the better and overcome the economic crisis of the 
last few years in 1994, it will be necessary to resolve 
the following key tasks: 
  1. To halt the slump in production which has been continuing 
for three years running. 
  Sectors of the fuel and raw materials complexes, sectors 
producing semimanufactured goods, and agriculture will find 
themselves in an especially difficult position. The reasons are 
the shortfall in investments in these sectors in previous years 
and the curtailment of effective demand. This negative trend 
can be overcome only if the state steps up its structural 
regulation of the economy. It is necessary to define 
macroeconomically effective investment projects and finance them 
from centralized sources. 
  2. It will also be necessary to elaborate effective 
measures to ensure that the population continues to keep savings 
in the banks, even in conditions of declining levels of real 
money incomes. 
  3. To formulate and consistently implement a policy of price 
control, combining the regulated and free sectors in price 
formation. 
  The implementation of the proposed measures will, to a 
certain extent, make it possible to ease the acuteness of 
unemployment, which will be the main problem in the social 
sphere next year. At present, despite the sizeable slump in 
production, the unemployed represent only 4-5 percent of the 
able-bodied population. The stepping up of investment activity 
will lead to a revival of production and, consequently, to the 
maintenance of employment. This could be the only method for 
compensating the further decline of living standards. Due to 
the shortage of resources, the state will be able to help only 
the most deprived strata of the population -- pensioners, the 
disabled, and young families with children -- and only at 
minimal levels. 
  Only the fulfillment of these conditions will make it 
possible in 1994 to ensure stabilization of the economy, satisfy 
the population's most important vital needs, and create 
prerequisites for further stable economic development. 
<H3>  Section IV: IV. Protection of the Interests of 
Russian-Speaking Population </H3>
<H6>  1. The Contemporary Status of Russians </H6>
  The status of Russians today could become the most 
probable cause of local civil wars. People in a 
series of new states have moved from words and slogans to actual 
deeds. Latvia and Estonia, for example, beneath the banner of 
protecting the "indigenous population," have started introducing 
restrictions on the rights of the nontitular population, 
primarily via legislation on citizenship. 
  Let us recall that about 40 percent of the population 
in Latvia and Estonia are Russian-speakers, with 10 percent in 
Lithuania, while the total number of Russian-speakers, mainly 
Russians, in the Baltic countries approaches 2.5 million. 
Now they all are an ethnic minority. 
  There are about 950,000 Estonians and at least 600,000 
"foreigners" living in Estonia at present. This separation was 
effected on the basis of a juridical act adopted by parliament 
-- the decree bringing into force the Law "On Citizenship" as it 
stood on 16 June 1940, in other words the day when the Red Army 
entered the republic. The residence qualification is two years, 
with another year before citizenship is acquired. 
  The law adopts a rigid approach toward representatives of 
the 
nonindigenous population who are already residents and 
have spent many years working for the benefit of Estonia. 
Now they have to undergo the two years' residence qualification 
period and a further year on probation, and must pass 
examinations in the language and their knowledge of the 
republic's history and culture. 
  Under the laws, more than 1.5 million people, who are 
automatically deprived of citizenship in the Baltic republics, 
could find themselves outside the political process. Their 
interests will not be represented by anyone. 
  Even the previous elections to Latvia's Supreme Soviet 
demonstrated the radical politicians' obvious desire to squeeze 
Russian-speakers out of the political process. By simply 
manipulating the organization of electoral districts, they 
ensured that the "indigenous" Lettish population 
representing just over 50 percent, won two-thirds of seats 
in the Supreme Soviet. 
  Under the new citizenship laws, the Russian-speaking 
population in Latvia and Estonia will not be represented 
at all in the organs of state power. 
  There is a sharp reduction of television and radio 
broadcasts 
from Russia. It is planned to legislatively deprive major 
Russian communities in the Baltic countries of the right to 
acquire higher education in their native language. A unilateral 
curtailment of the network of Russian secondary education is 
under way. 
  The offensive against Russian culture and the Russian 
language is one of the avenues of massive pressure on the 
Russian-speaking population of the Donbass, accounting for 50-75 
percent of the total population in different rayons. Moreover, 
the fact that this offensive is carried out on such a massive 
scale and with impunity makes it possible to describe it as 
Ukraine's state policy in a region with its own history, 
culture, and real bilingualism. The task of leveling the 
national-cultural situation in West Ukraine and the Donbass by 
force has been set at state level. 
  This is proved by numerous facts. All the educational 
establishments are sharply and groundlessly reducing the number 
of study periods for Russian language and literature, while the 
study of the Russian language is altogether ruled out at teacher 
training institutes' nonspecialized faculties. Thus, the 
Lugansk Teacher Training Institute's Russian Philology Faculty 
has been persistently instructed by ministerial circles to 
delete from its curriculum the practical training in folklore 
and dialectology (gathering examples of folk art and Russian 
dialects). The reason given is that there are no regions where 
Russian culture has developed in the Donbass, even though 
years-long expeditions prove something completely different: 
Russian folk songs, tales, poems, and so on are widespread in 
the region, and so are Russian dialects associated primarily 
with the historical proximity of the Don Host. 
  There is a noticeable trend toward the creation of unequal 
conditions for tuition: The number of pupils at classes taught 
in the Ukrainian language is lower than that of pupils in 
classes taught in the Russian language by a factor of between 
three and five, but the teaching of a foreign language from the 
first grade is introduced mainly in classes taught in the 
Ukrainian language, and so are the new and promising cirriculums 
in general. The new forms of educational establishment are also 
geared to instruction in the Ukrainian language -- in Lugansk's 
only high school, for example, classes studying language and 
literature in depth are geared almost exclusively to the 
Ukrainian language. 
  Psychological pressure is exerted on lecturers teaching 
their 
students in the Russian language, and incentives are offered to 
those who teach specialized subjects only in the Ukrainian 
language. This naturally produces a drain of skilled 
specialists. 
  At the same time, people are deliberately keeping silent 
about the fact that the Union republics, thanks to efforts by 
the entire former Union and the Russian Federation's decisive 
contribution, created modern sectors of the national 
economy using technology that was at times more advanced than in 
the Russian Federation itself. The best forces of the 
entire country were thrown in to ensure higher and faster 
development rates for the former Union republics' economies, 
thus creating more favorable prerequisites for the 
formation of production and social infrastructures actually 
there, rather than in the Russian Federation. 
  The national intelligentsia, actively influencing the 
self-awareness of the peoples, perceived the Russians as 
the most substantial obstacle to the republics' sovereignty 
and to the manifestation of nationalist ambitions. 
  The status of Russians in Kazakhstan is indicative in this 
regard. The introduction of a discriminatory law on languages 
in the republic prompted a huge wave of dissatisfaction among a 
large proportion of the population. Russians and 
Russian-speakers, deprived of any real opportunity to study the 
Kazakh language in the past, are unable to actively participate 
in the various spheres of society's life -- production, 
education, science, management, the services sphere, and so on. 
The present language tuition system falls short of the demands 
posed by life. Dissatisfaction with the law is also expressed 
by 40 percent of Kazakhs who are not fluent in their native 
language. 
  The discriminatory nature of the state program on the 
language is boosted by the policy of state publishing houses. 
Thus, under the subject-matter plan for literary publications, 
the republic's "Ana Tili" Publishing House should have published 
79 titles. The plans included the publication of nine books in 
the Russian language and nine in the Russian and Kazakh 
languages -- these are dictionaries. The remaining titles -- 61 
books in all -- are in the Kazakh language. The proportion is 
identical at other publishing houses. And yet it is emphasized 
that the republic is multinational and that Kazakhstan has 
signed the Human Rights Charter. 
  The situation prevailing in the education system is no 
better. Secondary schools are increasingly often converted and 
are switching to tuition exclusively in the Kazakh language. 
Furthermore, this is being done without augmenting the 
educational premises, thus overloading the schools where tuition 
is in the Russian language. No Russian, German, Ukrainian, or 
other schools are being opened at all. 
  Prospering enterprises are under attack by the nationalist 
mafia. Following several attacks, there are neither Russians 
nor Germans left any more at the "Pravda" Sovkhoz, the best in 
the republic. Here is a typical case: There was an explosion 
at the Ust-Kamenogorsk nuclear fuel plant's beryllium production 
unit, and 120,000 persons suffered as a result. A session of 
Kazakhstan's Supreme Soviet, taking into account the 
"separatism" of Ust-Kamengorosk's residents who demanded 
bilingualism, refused to proclaim the oblast an ecological 
disaster zone. 
  The galvanization of the Cossack movement is encountering 
sharp reaction. Kazakhstan contains the lands of four Cossack 
hosts -- the Ural, Orenburg, Siberian, and Semirechensk. 
Cossack organizations are not being registered by the 
Kazakhstani authorities at present, while local courts have 
firmly ruled that "there are and there will be no Cossacks in 
Kazakhstan" and they are not allowed to wear their uniforms. 
Cossack publications are banned and they are illegally imported 
from Samara and Orenburg. A draft law is being prepared, under 
which work in Cossack organizations will be punishable. 
  The results of inequality are obvious: More than 200 of the 
Kazakhstani parliament's 360 deputies are Kazakhs, and so are 23 
of the Presidential Council's 30 members, even though Kazakhs 
constitute significantly less than one-half of Kazakhstan's 
population. 
  Academician Sartayev, adviser to Kazakhstan's president, 
declares: "Kazakhstan's lands must belong to the Kazakhs," 
forgetting that, back in the 1920's, the Union leadership's 
decisions on the creation of the Republic of Kazakhstan spoke 
openly of transferring to it a series of Russian oblasts. 
  There have been numerous attempts to insult the Russian 
people's heritage: Names that have been Russian since time 
immemorial are dsiappearing from geographical maps, the church 
at the village of Kotelnikovskaya has been burned down, the 
monument to Yermak the Great has been barbarously destroyed, all 
Russian names are being systematically eliminated in 
Kazakhstan's Guryev and other oblasts, while Guryev itself has 
been renamed Atyrau. 
  The falsification of history is becoming increasingly 
blatant: "Russia conquered and enslaved Kazakhstan" and so on. 
S. Akatayev, leader of the "Azat" movement, would allow 
Russians, Germans, and Uygurs to live in Kazakhstan because "we 
need someone to milk the cows, till the soil, and cast the 
metal." He is backed by S. Yermekova, representative of the 
"Alash" party: "You are allowed only to work in Kazakhstan. 
Keep your noses out of management." 
  The question of citizenship ought to be resolved in early 
1994. The republic's Russian-speaking population will have to 
make a choice: Either to accept citizenship and legally lose 
any hope of help from Russia, or reject citizenship and be 
deprived of all political and economic rights. Therefore, a 
sizeable proportion of the Russian-speaking population is 
inclined toward the idea of migrating to Russia, especially 
since Russia has already adopted laws regulating the legal 
status of refugees. 
  A sizeable proportion of the Russian population living on 
the 
territory of former Union republics no longer comprises 
first-generation migrants and has, with perfect 
justification, considered these republics to be its 
motherland. Thus, more than one-half of Russians in the 
Baltic countries have been born there. Approximately two-thirds 
of them in Latvia either are natives of the republic or were 
brought there as children. The majority of the remaining 
one-third arrived in Latvia not of their own free will but 
were posted there on the republic's request as specialists in 
the national economy, or were ordered to go there as 
officers. They restored the war-torn towns and villages, 
rebuilt the plants and factories, or performed their military 
duty. Their children and grandchildren were born there. 
  Fear for their nearest and dearest and uncertainty about the 
future are forcing Russians to leave the Baltic countries and 
Moldova where the Declaration of Human Rights is crudely 
trampled and there is overt discrimination against the 
Russian-speaking population. Huge masses of people in these 
regions believe that they have been abandoned to the whims of 
fate and that Russia is incapable of upholding their 
interests. 
  Migration processes in the Central Asian and Transcaucasian 
republics depend on the overall status of interethnic problems, 
and any interethnic clash threatens to bring forth an exodus of 
the Russian population. 
  Thus, the protection of the rights and legitimate 
interests of the Russian diaspora in nearby foreign countries is 
the only farsighted long-term policy. The strategic task 
along this avenue is to achieve guaranteed living and working 
conditions for Russians outside the Russian Federation which not 
only would rule out any encouragement of their departure but 
also would really create prerequisites for the preservation of 
their national traditions, language, culture, and national 
self-awareness. We perceive this prospect as the development of 
economic, cultural, and political trends aimed against any 
attempts to establish reactionary ethnocratic regimes on the 
vast spaces of the former Union. 
  It is, of course hardly possible to rely on objective 
reintegrational tendencies for reviving that which has collapsed 
under the weight of accumulated contradictions and gross errors 
by shortsighted politicians. There is no subjunctive mood in 
history. 
  There is, however, an alternative to such a development of 
events. But it is lamentable. It is, first, the 
loss of economic independence by the newly formed states, 
including Russia, following the disintegration of the single 
economic area and the national economic complex which was 
unified until the recent past; their distinctive 
"Westernization" and their transformation into underdeveloped 
appendages of major Western countries with a mafia-criminal 
domestic economic and political structure. It is, 
second, the intentional or unintentional flare-up of 
inter-nation or interethnic conflicts either as a result of the 
exacerbation and deterioration of the socioeconomic situation 
and the impoverishment of broad strata of the population, or due 
to the insolubility of questions pertaining to national-state 
belonging of various territories, military property, and other 
categories of former Union property. 
  If the gravest of consequences for all our peoples are to 
be avoided, it is impossible to ignore in politics the 
thousand-years old trend toward ethnic and ethnocultural 
development and collaboration, as a result of which a 
special type of Eurasian civilization started developing a 
long time ago across the spaces of Russia and its associated 
territories. The preservation of one's own state identity today 
is a question not only of human dignity but also of political 
wisdom. 
  All these changes will inevitably have an impact on millions 
of Russians and their relatives in Russia. It is natural that 
such a turn of events will inevitably prompt a social explosion 
including -- and let us have no illusions on this account -- in 
Russia itself, and will become a powerful factor for the 
development of interstate conflicts. Pretending not to realize 
this means directly encouraging such a development of events. 
<H6>  2. Political Aspects </H6>
  A legitimate way out of the situation, from all points of 
view, could be provided only by restoration of the common 
economic, cultural, and legal area; unconditional removal of 
trade barriers; introduction of benefits for members of the new 
economic and defense union; adoption of common citizenship. 
  In the ninth year of "perestroyka" and after three years of 
"democratization," Russia lacks a clear foreign policy 
concept. There has been no definition of Russia's priorities or 
a concept of the new integrational cooperation across the former 
USSR. This is precisely why the sluggish activity of the 
CIS has produced no positive results. 
  Russia's national priorities must indeed be the 
interests of the peoples of the Russian Federation and of the 
largest among them, the Russian people, which has for centuries 
been Russia's unifying nucleus and has already proved its 
consolidating role. 
  Consequently, all diplomatic, foreign political, and foreign 
economic efforts must focus primarily on Russia's alliance 
with the former Union republics which have a large proportion of 
Russian and Russian-speaking population. They are 
primarily Ukraine, Kazakhstan, Belarus, Estonia, Latvia, 
Uzbekistan, Kyrgyzstan, and Moldova. This will make it possible 
to solve the problem of almost 90 percent of ethnic Russians and 
of many Russian citizens who are residents in these states. It 
is in Russia's national interests, and regardless of the Russian 
diaspora's size, to further strengthen the alliance with Central 
Asian republics which have proved their commitment to the idea 
of unity at the most critical times for Russia. 
<H6>  3. Toward Integration Via Coordination </H6>
  There is an impression that, out of the entire package of 
problems on whose solution the CIS ought to be working, 
attention today is focused only on two aspects: The 
supply of Russian raw materials and fuel to the NIS, and the 
combat involvement of Russian troops under CIS auspices in 
conflicts on the territory of the former USSR. 
  And yet the questions of paramount importance for the 
peaceful period of development -- settling the issue of 
citizens' rights -- are hardly ever on the agenda. The CIS 
today certainly needs an organ capable of coordinating 
humanitarian questions and easing the pressure of state borders 
on the collective and individual rights of citizens of any 
nationality. 
  The CIS collective organs could also coordinate the process 
of reforms. It is hard to revive our economic mechanism while 
different parts of the CIS implement divergent concepts of 
transition to market economy. Like, for example, when the 
Western republics adhere to the genuinely sensible limitations 
of initial privatization while Russia is engaged exclusively in 
"macroprivatization" -- the destatization of harbors and 
airports, oil and gold fields, and industrial giants. 
  The problems that could be resolved only within the 
framework 
of a single socioeconomic area are considerably more numerous 
than it might appear at first glance. The problem of 
refugees whose solution presupposes, specifically, a system 
of sanctions against republics whose 
"democratization-liberation" policy poses a threat to people's 
survival and to the guarantees of their elementary rights. As 
well as the provision of complete secondary and higher 
education in the native language, together with questions 
concerning the pension provision for people who worked in 
the USSR and are now living in CIS states. 
  No matter how sad this may be to admit, but the initially 
built-in disintegrational factor still dominates the concept of 
the CIS two years later. The reason is the lack of a 
concept of unification, of a backbone around which a real, as 
opposed to a nominal, "community" may be developed. 
Russian and European experience alike show that a real and 
dynamic foundation for the re-creation of a single humanitarian, 
economic, and defense area can be provided by the 
interests of ethnic minorities detached from their nucleus, 
including the largest among them -- the Russian. A concept 
capable of switching the CIS to the tracks of constructive 
collaboration will emerge only when we abandon the demagoguery 
abour Russian chauvinism and all the other tags recently 
attached to the nation which succeeded in really rallying the 
peoples on one-sixth of the Earth's surface. 
<H6>  4. Problems of Migration </H6>
  Without a forecast of the true extent of migration, it is 
difficult to determine what financial resources will be required 
to compensate refugees and forced migrants for the damage they 
have suffered and to provide facilities for new settlers, the 
number of jobs that will have to be created for them, the real 
burden that will be imposed on the social infrastructure at 
places where migrants will concentrate, and so on. 
  The return of Russians from former USSR republics and the 
migration of representatives of non-Russian peoples to Russia 
began long before interethnic tension reached the stage of 
open conflicts and became a bargaining chip in political 
struggle. Even back in 1979-1988, the positive balance of 
the migration to Russia by Russians who had formerly actively 
resettled in other republics was in excess of 300,000. 
  The growth of the scale of migration was also affected by 
the 
outflow of "nonindigenous" peoples from regions where 
non-Russian titular ethnic groups had concentrated in Russia 
itself -- the Northern Caucasus, the Volga Valley, the 
Siberian-Transbaykal region, and the northern belt of the 
Federation. 
  In essence, these regions showed the selfsame symptoms of 
discrimination against representatives of nontitular ethnic 
groups as in nearby foreign countries. 
  Among the adverse consequences of mass migration, really 
great importance attaches to the growth of social 
stress. There is a significant deterioration of the social 
awareness of migrants themselves, who have lost their former 
status and, quite often, the prospects of social success. There 
is also dissatisfaction among the residents of towns and 
villages where they live. 
  Unfortunately, the help given to forced migrants or refugees 
by the local organs of power and population is clearly 
inadequate. The attempts by migrants to acquire a social niche 
in the new localities come up against serious objective 
difficulties. The level of social tension has increased 
wherever refugees are concentrated as soon as they have 
appeared. This is noted both by the migrants themselves and by 
local residents. 
  The social and psychological atmosphere in which refugees 
find themselves is also indicated by the results of a poll of 
the population in 13 Russian Federation regions. When asked 
"What policy do you support?", the answers were distributed as 
follows (as percentage of the number polled): 
  Accept citizens of all former USSR republics regardless of 
their nationality -- 36 percent 
  Accept only Russians by descent -- 51 percent 
  Do not accept anyone -- 11 percent 
  Did not answer -- 2 percent 
  One out of every 10 persons polled is against the 
acceptance of migrants, while one-half of those polled are 
inclined toward dividing refugees and migrants into "our people" 
and "foreigners." These stereotypes of mass and individual 
awareness cannot be ignored. They were graphically demonstrated 
in practice in Saratov and Volgograd Oblasts during the 
discussion of the question of settling Germans there and 
re-creating a German autonomous formation in the Volga Valley. 
  The local population's unwelcoming attitudes toward migrants 
will intensify as the shortages of foodstuffs, housing, 
and so on worsen. This can already be seen at present. 
  Respondents of the all-Russia poll were asked: "What will be 
your attitude if refugees which may appear in your region are 
allocated housing out of turn, are given jobs, and are helped 
with money from the state budget?" The answers were as follows: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1. Attitude toward help with employme-|                                      | 
|nt:                                   |                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|positive                              |58 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|negative                              |15 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|difficult to answer                   |27 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|2. Attitude toward help with money:   |                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|positive                              |56 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|negative                              |19 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|difficult to answer                   |25 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|3. Attitude toward help with housing: |                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|positive                              |29 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|negative                              |33 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|difficult to answer                   |38 percent                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The acuteness of the housing problem in Russia, where the 
number of people waiting for housing is in excess of 9 million, 
was clearly manifested by the fact that less than one-third of 
those polled are inclined to support the policy of priority 
housing allocation for forced migrants. 
  This indicator of potential conflict rises 
sharply when the ethnic composition of migrants does not 
coincide with the titular ethnic group at their new place of 
settlement. In other words, mass migration is fraught 
with a "chain reaction" of interethnic conflicts, the symptoms 
of which can already be seen. Specifically, they take the 
form of growing nationalism and attempts to initiate pogroms 
against people of different nationality or religion in oblasts 
which have taken in large numbers of migrants. 
  There are different forecasts about the migration of 
Russians 
to Russia. The number of potential migrants could include 
virtually all 25 million Russians living in nearby 
foreign countries. Some 4-5 million people in the next 
5-10 years -- this is the maximum size of the migration flows 
which could be prompted either in the event of exacerbation of 
interethnic relations or as a result of the start of combat 
operations on the territories of former Union republics. 
  According to Federal Migration Service data, over the next 
12-18 months we can expect between 650,000 and 1.2 million 
people to arrive in Russia from nearby foreign 
countries: 300,000-400,000 from Ukraine and Belarus, 
250,000-550,000 from Central Asia and Kazakhstan, 40,000-100,000 
from the Transcaucasus, and 25,000-45,000 from the Baltic 
countries. 
  The mass migration of Russians from Ukraine and Belarus to 
Russia and of Ukrainians and Belarusians to Ukraine and Belarus 
can happen only in the event of military conflict between 
the republics. Although in Ukraine, for example, there are 
even now forces prepared to instigate this process. 
  The situation with Russians is even more complex 
in Kazakhstan, where there are about 6 million of them 
(one-fourth of all Russians living in former Union republics 
outside the Russian Federation). There is a large flow of 
Russian migrants from kazakhstan. This trend is growing. 
  It is possible to forecast three avenues and, 
consequently, three periods of the migration of Russians to 
Russia. An active migration of first- and 
second-generation Russians is expected from Turkmenistan, 
Kyrgyzstan, Tajikistan, Azerbaijan, Uzbekistan, and Kazakhstan. 
Between 30 and 50 percent of the Russian-speaking 
population intend to emigrate from there. 
  Some 18-20 percent of Russians intend to leave Latvia, 
Estonia, Lithuania, Moldova, Georgia, and Armenia. Up to 
11 percent of Russians express desire to leave Ukraine and 
Belarus. 
  According to poll results, about 2 million Russians 
intend to move to Russia today because they feel persecuted 
along national and linguistic lines. 
  Both now and in the future the forced migrants from Union 
republics are mainly engineers, technicians, skilled industrial 
workers, teachers, and physicians, in other words strictly urban 
people who will be unable to settle in the large cities because 
of residence permit problems. They cannot buy or build housing 
in towns because the law forbids it. This is why many of 
them perceive their situation as hopeless. There is hardly any 
need to comment on the political views of present and future 
migrants or their attitude toward the new political and economic 
realities which have turned them into outcasts. 
  There are six specialized and transit reception points for 
refugees open and functioning on Russia's territory. There is 
discussion of the possibility of setting up similar points and 
regional migration services in every oblast. 
  The Committee for Migration Affairs proceeds from the 
premise 
that this is not only a calamity but also, to a certain extent, 
a benefit for Russia. The government is beginning to realize 
that the reception and settlement of migrants will require large 
investments, but those returning to their historical motherland 
are almost the most enterprising, skilled, and industrious part 
of the nation. 
  A Public Committee for the Settlement of Forced Migrants is 
functioning. In just under one year it has "processed" about 1 
million persons and has helped 20,000. 
  But the work on migration problems is fragmented, there 
is no coordination at state level, and resources are being 
wasted. Many categories of migrants have found themselves 
altogether outside the sphere of state regulation. It is 
clear that the Federal Migration Service will not be able 
to cope with the swelling flood of migrants on its own. 
  The situation calls for immediate action. There is need for 
a package of interlinked measures and coordinated actions by 
state migration organs, the Foreign Ministry, the Committee for 
Emergency Situations, the State Committee for Nationalities 
Affairs, and the public organizations. In other words, there is 
need for a nationwide federal program for help to our 
compatriots. Furthermore, this program must be given 
top priority from the material-financial and the 
political-diplomatic points of view alike. 
  The state's policy toward migration needs more than just 
serious amendments. Bearing in mind the provisional qualitative 
and quantitative appraisals of migration and its sociopolitical 
consequences, we are talking about actually elaborating a 
new, all-embracing, and effective migration policy. Its 
main actions and principles would appear to be the following: 
Help for forced migrants must include not only the provision of 
compensation, land, credits, and employment information, but 
also the lifting of all restrictions on residence permits and 
the choice of place of residence. Migrants, together with all 
other Russians, must be given equal rights to buy and sell at 
Russia's housing and labor markets and not be made hostages of 
"supreme state interests." 
  The swelling or subsidence of migration processes will 
depend, at the very least, on political decisions by the 
leaderships of various republics about protecting the rights of 
ethnic minorities and the pace at which the "indigenization" of 
the republics' populations proceeds. 
  There must be no delay in elaborating more precise 
guidelines in mutual relations between former USSR republics and 
components of the Russian Federation. 
  It is obvious, without any additional research, that today 
we 
need: 
  -- to conclude between the sovereign states -- former USSR 
republcis -- a treaty on the rights of ethnic minorities 
to work, education, and cultural and national autonomy; 
  -- to do some additional work on the Federation Treaty 
between components of the Russian Federation. It is necessary 
to define and unconditionally ensure economic, social, and 
political guarantees for refugees, victims of interethnic 
conflicts, and forced migrants regardless of their nationality, 
religion, ideological beliefs, or the regions whence they have 
arrived; 
  -- to conclude between the Russian Federation components an 
agreement defining the amount, procedure, and mechanism of 
compensation for refugees and forced migrants and having the 
damage they have suffered compensated either by the responsible 
side or from the state budget; 
  -- to legislatively guarantee the representation of 
different ethnic groups in the Russian Federation at the organs 
of power, taking more effectively and more deeply into 
account the ethnic problems and interests of different peoples 
in economic, social, and cultural policy; 
  -- to constitutionally define the diverse national 
movements reflecting the interests of various ethnic groups, 
including those without their own national and ethnic formations 
on the Russian Federation's territory; 
  -- to proclaim a moratorium on the transformation of 
the territories of former autonomous formations whose objective 
is to reshape existing borders 
  -- to implement measures to equalize and raise living 
standards in different national-state formations; 
  -- to elaborate unified programs for the socioeconomic 
and cultural development of regions where different ethnic 
groups are concentrated (the Northern Caucasus, the Volga 
Valley, the Northwestern region, and others); 
  -- to define the geography of a better resettlement of 
repatriates and the amount of resources needed for providing the 
necessary facilities; 
  -- to prevent the excessive concentration of migrants 
in individual regions of the country like, for example, 
Stavropol and Krasnodar Krays and some others; 
  -- to promote an improvement of the psychological 
climate surrounding migrants and to define sanctions 
against organs of power and citizens fanning enmity between the 
local population and migrants; 
  -- to make much better use of the professional 
potential of workers and engineers from among forced migrants 
and refugees; 
  -- to organize the retraining of migrants with a view 
to reducing the army of forced unemployed; 
  -- to encourage entrepreneurial activity by 
migrants (temporary benefits in the taxation of small 
business); 
  -- to form special budget and extrabudget funds for the 
effective resolution of these and other emerging problems. 
  The republics' parliaments must revisit the problem of the 
Russian language's status. It must be given the status of state 
language wherever it is used by the majority of the population. 
This approach is in line with international norms and would 
obviously promote the further harmonization of interstate 
relations. 
  There also is a pressing need to conclude interstate 
agreements on human rights with all former Union republics. 
Monitoring of their fulfillment could be carried out at both 
state and public level. The status of economic relations with 
various states must depend on the observance of these 
international agreements and the principles of international law. 
  It is expedient to support the creation of trade and 
economic 
centers in Moscow and Russia for Russian communities abroad, to 
assist Russians in enrolling in higher and specialized 
educational establishments, and to sponsor and support Russian 
schools and the Russian language and culture. 
  All peoples of Russia are fraternal for the Russian people. 
Our people desire to live in peace and friendship with the 
peoples of all other countries. Our concern about the fate of 
Russian people is not aimed against other peoples and states. 
  Russia's path leads through peaceful solution of 
problems and mutual cooperation to universal and just peace. 
<H6>  5. Problems of Russia's Economic Mutual Relations with CIS 
Countries </H6>
  The rate of the slump in production and inflation 
continued to grow in CIS countries in 1993. The government of 
not a single CIS republic succeeded in halting the process of 
economic decline. On the whole, the total volume of industrial 
production in the Community was reduced by 20 percent in 
comparable prices over the year. 
  The "shared" slump was not affected to any large degree by 
the different nature and pace of economic reforms in different 
countries. In the conditions of "transparent" borders and 
unified money circulation within the ruble zone, the lack of 
coordination in economic activity hurts the finances of 
"neighbors." The imbalance in reciprocal deliveries has already 
evolved into an imbalance in the international settlements of 
CIS countries. 
  On the whole, it is possible to agree with the opinion of 
World Bank associates K. Mikhalopoulos and D. Tarr: "The 
situation as regards trade and payments in the former Soviet 
republics was distinguished by chaos, which reflected the 
existence of a series of problems. The disorganization of the 
credit, monetary, and payments system was at the heart of these 
problems. 
  "The main problem is that the reduction of interrepublic 
trade will promote the further decline of the volume of output 
and incomes. Therefore, political strategists will have to 
create mechanisms for the transition period which would 
help the new states to restore the effective flow of trade and 
avoid further serious breaches of this flow in the short term, 
supporting in the longer term the restructuring of their economy 
and its integration in the world economy." After all, the 
sharply increased dependence of each CIS state on the external 
markets becomes a condition for the functioning of their 
economies. As a matter of fact, these realities are only 
just being realized and taken into account in the economic 
practice of CIS countries. 
  On the whole, as 1993 has shown, the stepping up of the 
economies' "external" dependence will continue. This dependence 
will be most graphically demonstrated in the sphere of 
satisfying the CIS countries' energy needs. 
  "Sovereignization" has undermined Russia's potential as 
energy supplier. Let us add for objectivity's sake that 
cutbacks in the rate of oil extraction started four years ago. 
According to estimates by Russia's Ministry of Fuel and Energy, 
oil extraction dropped by a further 50 million tonnes in 1993, 
in other words will reach only 340 million tonnes. If this pace 
of reducing the extraction of black gold is maintained, then in 
the very near future the fuel and energy complex will be working 
to meet only Russia's own needs, which today stand at 240 
million tonnes. 
  Oil exports increased more than threefold, but 
this increase was accompanied by a reduction of deliveries to 
CIS countries by an average of 50 percent. In this context, 
Russia could be suspected of waging a "cold war" against Ukraine 
and the Baltic and Central Asian countries. But such an 
approach would be based on inertia of thought. Facts prove 
whether it is advantageous for Russia to deliver oil products to 
the former republics. Russia delivered its output (primarily 
raw materials which are competitive on the world markets) to 
nearby foreign countries at prices equivalent on average to 
30-40 percent of world prices, and acquired from nearby foreign 
countries output at prices equivalent to about 70 percent of 
world prices. Moreover, in many instances Russia often failed 
to receive any payment at all for its exports. For example, 
having delivered to nearby foreign countries about 50 million 
tonnes of oil to a total value of $6.5 billion, by way of 
payment it received machinery and equipment worth only $700 
million. 
  But Russia's external economic dependence was also 
increasing and has almost trebled, having reached 14-15 percent 
of GNP. This is more than in India and Japan, let alone the 
United States. External dependence demands additional foreign 
currency resources for the economy's functioning. Naturally, 
some of the sources are gas, oil, and oil products. 
  Coming back to the idea of "cold war" against Ukraine, it is 
appropriate to recall one contentious problem: Last year 
Ukraine sold abroad, at world prices of course, 8 million 
tonnes out of the 33.5 million tonnes of oil it had received 
from Russia. According to some estimates, the amount earned 
from this deal is equal to, for example, the costs of building a 
major international airport at, say, Novosibirsk, capable of 
earning an annual profit to the tune of $700-800 million. 
  Russia's economy today bears the heavy burden of additional 
export and import expenditures associated with transit charges 
for crossing the territory of neighboring states, but the safety 
of goods in transit is not guaranteed, not even by Ukraine. Of 
course, the press cites numerous facts about Russia's debt to 
other CIS republics, but the overall balance is this: 
Russia had a positive balance of about R750 billion. 
Similar trends will also persist next year, even though the 
government has taken a series of measures to put an end to 
nonpayments. 
  Appraising the situation in Russia's economic ties with 
nearby foreign countries, it can be said that 1993 saw the 
"start of sobering up from euphoria" in the CIS. It is, of 
course, premature to conclude that the balance of centrifugal 
and centripetal forces shows that the latter are stronger. But 
this awakening, coupled with disappointments and lost illusions, 
has also brought in a certain proportion of common sense. 
<H3>  Section V: V. The Creation of Favorable International 
Conditions for the Implementation of Reforms in Russia </H3>
<H6>  1. Existing Realities </H6>
  In order to elaborate Russia's strategy in the sphere of 
national and international security, it is necessary to analyze 
the position it occupies in the world and the essence of its 
international interests as determined by the profound 
changes of the last few years. There are four main factors 
making up the system of Russia's policy guidelines at least for 
the 1990's. 
  THE FIRST is the fact that the Soviet Union has 
disintegrated, thus putting an end to the world's bipolar 
structure. There has been a radical change in the 
geopolitical role played by Russia, which has become a component 
of the world community. Russia has inherited from the USSR 75 
percent of its territory, 51 percent of its population, 60 
percent of fixed production assets (in terms of value), and 76 
percent of enterprises producing means of production. It 
accounts for 90 percent of oil extraction, 73 percent of gas 
extraction, 63 percent of electricity generation, 80 percent of 
crude oil exports, and almost 100 percent of natural gas 
exports. It procuces more than one-half of the GNP produced in 
the USSR in 1990. 
  But Russia is not just smaller than the USSR in size -- it 
has found itself in a fundamentally new environment to the west 
and to the south, where the former Soviet republics lie. 
Furthermore, some of them have been profoundly hit by domestic 
instability, they are extremely susceptible to external 
influences, and are in conflict with one another. The paradox 
is that formally these are foreign countries as far as Russia is 
concerned. In fact, however, they remain inseparably linked 
with it both by their common historical past and by the 
multitude of living economic, cultural, social, and 
psychological bonds. 
  THE SECOND FACTOR. Russia is experiencing a most 
profound economic and sociopolitical crisis whose solution still 
lies far into the future. At the same time, by dint of its 
size and of the political and strategic legacy inherited from 
the USSR, Russia remains one of the world's leading countries. 
  It will not be at all simple for Russia to find its place in 
the international arena. 
  Russia's new leadership bears the burden of a difficult twin 
task: To create a new system of foreign and domestic policy, 
turing it into a catalyst of radical market reforms, and at the 
same time to overcome the burden of problems inherited from the 
past. 
  THE THIRD FACTOR. The Russian Federation as a 
genuinely democratic republic. Russia no longer has a 
planned economy, but it still has not acquired a market economy. 
The unitary state has collapsed, but the best possible balance 
between central and local power has yet to be found. 
Furthermore, the Federation today faces the threat of disunity 
and fragmentation into "separate principalities." 
  Finally, THE FOURTH FACTOR is associated with 
changes in the surrounding world. 
  We are witnessing the onset of a more traditional but 
also a much more complex time of multilateral diplomacy, 
intricacy of contradictions and coincidence of states' 
interests, shifting coalitions, and limited political 
goals. The threat of a universal war is declining, but 
there is a growing danger of local conflicts fraught with 
escalation of combat operations in various regions. 
  All this indicates that the maintenance of peace in the 
future will require active work by international and regional 
organizations to ensure collective security, as well as joint 
peacemaking actions by the powers. 
  Proceeding from what has been said above, what are our 
fatherland's main foreign policy priorities? 
  At present Russia has three interlinked supreme foreign 
policy priorities. 
  The first is to ensure political stability in the 
country, prevent war, and settle armed conflicts on the 
territory of the former USSR, both within and between individual 
republics, primarily by political means. 
  The second is to prevent the emergence of 
hegemonic powers in Europe, South Asia, and the Far East which 
would strive to extend their influence to regions in the former 
USSR where the situation is unstable. 
  The third is to preserve the status of a great 
power occupying a special position in the world's geostrategic 
structure. 
  The main point for Russia is to ensure political stability 
and to prevent and settle conflicts across the former USSR. 
Should instability and potential conflicts there grow further, 
this would threaten both Russia's territorial integrity and its 
economic and democratic reforms. The maximum (desirable) task 
is economic and political integration on the basis of equal 
rights, voluntariness, and mutual advantage for CIS countries, 
primarily Russia, Ukraine, Kazakhstan, and Belarus. If the 
desirable proves unattainable, then the vitally important 
minimum task for the Russian Federation is to prevent the 
creation of a hostile coalition. 
  Russia is proceeding from the premise that the Helsinki 
principle of the inviolability of borders must provide the 
foundation of mutual relations between the former USSR 
republics. Any revision of borders would be permissible 
only via peaceful talks. Sanctions, including the use of force, 
would be permissible only in the event that a country's 
leadership pursues a policy of genocide toward ethnic 
minorities, and this is recognized and defined as genocide under 
UN rules. 
  Germany, Turkey, Japan, China, and others are potentially 
capable of posing the threat of regional hegemony to Russia in 
the 1990's. Of course, nobody is accusing the aforementioned 
countries of currently acting along this avenue. But a sober 
forecast of the shifting balance of forces and of the 
geopolitical situation makes it mandatory to consider the 
possibility of changes in their policy which are not even 
contemplated at present. 
  The United States is Russia's most important partner in 
countering regional hegemony. The remaining centers of power 
are still not capable of really influencing the situation in hot 
spots, be they in the Near East, Angola or Yugoslavia, the 
Caucasus or Afghanistan. 
  Russia is planning to pursue this priority using different 
methods in different regions. In Europe, for example, the 
guarantee for preventing any military-political expansionism by 
leading states is perceived in the development of European 
integration and the stregnthening of the CSCE as an organ of 
collective security and collective response to any potential 
aggressor. 
  In the past, the USSR used to advocate the simultaneous 
disbandment of NATO and the Warsaw Pact Organization [WPO]. Not 
only has the NATO bloc not been disbanded, but is is actually 
building up its might. This organization cannot be smoothly 
transformed into a European security structure. We believe that 
a stabilization of the situation in the Russian Federation on 
the basis of market economy and the development of democracy 
will create the need for a fundamentally new international 
organization, possibly on the basis of utilizing and developing 
elements from the structures of the EC, the West European Union, 
NATO, and the CSCE and with participation by Russia, the United 
States, and Canada. 
  The Russian Federation's policy in Asia Minor [Malaya Aziya] 
and South Asia could take the form of direct, including 
military, resistance to outside interference by agreement with 
the republics under threat. The nature of the multipolar world 
adjoining the Transcaucasus is much more complex. Russia's 
partner here is objectively Iran, and Turkey in South Asia. The 
maintenance of a certain balance between them is in line with 
Russia's interests, despite the fact that the West would 
obviously give preference to Turkey as a member of NATO. 
  The maintenance of the U.S. military presence in Japan is 
in line with Russia's interests in the Far East. In the event 
of withdrawal by the United States and of China's headlong 
economic and military strengthening, Japan's reaction could only 
take the form of accelerated remilitarization. A clash between 
the two huge powers over Korea, Taiwan, Hong Kong, or Southeast 
Asia could also involve Russia in the conflict. 
  Any sharp change of the balance of forces in favor of China 
or Japan and the emergence of hegemonic aspirations in one of 
the two powers could pose a direct threat to Russia's Far East. 
  It is obvious that Russia needs to retain its positions as a 
great world power. This means Russia's participation in the UN 
Security Council as one of its permanent members and its role in 
other international structures. It also means participating, as 
far as possible, in the maintenance of peace and the repulsion 
of aggression, including along the lines of peacemaking forces 
within the framework of the Security Council, the CSCE, and 
others, and genocide-terminating operations sanctioned by the 
United Nations and regional international organizations. 
  Russia advocates active prevention of the proliferation of 
nuclear and other mass destruction weapons, a tougher regime to 
control the deliveries of missiles and missile technology, and 
the elaboration of agreed quotas and restructions on the arms 
trade as a whole. 
  The problem of Russia's military-strategic parity with the 
United States deserves special mention. It will be necessary to 
continue the mutual balanced reduction of Russian Federation and 
U.S. strategic nuclear forces on new terms. Here we need a 
transition from mutual deterrence through the ability to deliver 
a crushing counterstrike on the aggressor to joint management of 
strategic stability. This is why talks will constitute the 
sphere of special mutual relations and mutual interests between 
Russia and the United States. 
<H6>  2. National Interests </H6>
  Let us examine Russia's specific national 
interests from the viewpoint of international security. 
  Retaining the great-power status. This is 
Russia's natural right, vested in it thanks to its economic 
potential, the successes it has achieved in science, culture, 
military might, and so on. 
  Guaranteeing Eurasian stability. Whenever the 
Eurasian balance of forces has been disrupted, Russia has 
traditionally been the main victim. 
  Therefore the desire by any one state or coalition of 
states to dominate Eurasia will not be in Russia's fundamental 
national interests. 
  Nor can our interests be served by attempts to isolate 
Russia, squeeze it out of the Black Sea and the Baltic Sea, 
reduce foreign economic commodity turnover, change its 
structure, and so on. 
  Ensuring political and economic stability in states all 
along Russia's borders. This is a key interest for any 
power, but the problem of preventing the emergence of conflict 
zones along the borders is especially important for Russia, 
which has the world's longest land border, and with its complex 
relations with neighbors which are rooted in the past. 
  Parrying and preventing potential threats. The 
world in which we are living now is a world of power 
partnerships and power rivalry within the framework of rigid 
durable structures. 
  Despite the changes which have occurred in the last few 
years 
-- especially the end of the "Cold War," the improvement of 
relations between the United States and Russia, the 
rapprochement to a certain extent between East and West Europe, 
and so on -- more sophisticated principles of power balance and 
power collaboration still remain the foundation of contemporary 
international relations. Indicators like economic, scientific, 
and intellectual potential play a greater role in the system of 
state might. But the military component still 
dominates the structure of interstate power. 
  Real military nuclear-missile confrontation on a global 
level 
remains only between Russia and the United States for the time 
being. The continuation of nuclear confrontation between our 
countries is objective and inevitable in the foreseeable future. 
Furthermore, the growing nuclear-missile potential of the PRC 
and West Europe also poses a military threat for Russia in the 
1990's. 
  Finally, Russia's cultural security and its 
originality are threatened by the West's liberal individualistic 
ideology, to the exent that collectivism still dominates 
awareness and thinking and today's Russian reality. 
  At the regional level it is necessary to proceed from the 
fact that, in the event of exacerbation of the domestic crisis, 
virtually all of Russia's neighbors could potentially raise 
sundry territorial claims. Although the economic, cultural, and 
other categories of security are not obviously linked with 
military security, many armed conflicts have started with 
mistakes committed in nonmilitary spheres. Therefore the 
prevention of threats to Russia must be actively waged across 
the entire spectrum. This is Russia's main national interest. 
<H6>  3. Foreign Policy </H6>
  We deem it important to single out the following basic 
objectives and guidelines for defining the strategy of Russia's 
development and behavior in the world community of peoples. 
  The Russian Federation is constantly present in the arena of 
world political life. It is a different matter that Russia's 
domestic situation and its geopolitical environment at present 
do not favor the pursuit of an active global policy, and its 
regional interests will call for the greatest of efforts in the 
next few years. The possession of a mighty nuclear potential 
does not change the situation, either. For the first time in 
many years, our country is in a situation whereby it does not 
face any definite or in any way significant external military 
threat. 
  Territorial disputes involve countries which will certainly 
not resort to military force for their solution provided, of 
course, Russia remains a united state. All this is 
exceptionally advantageous for concentrating the country's 
efforts on the solution of the domestic tasks concerning radical 
transformations and the problems constantly emerging in mutual 
relations with CIS countries. 
  Relations with Germany, at least over the last two 
centuries, have occupied a central position among the 
priorities of Russia's foreign policy. But the experience 
of the 20th century, with its two world wars, the cruel battles 
without precedent in history, and the huge sacrifices and 
destruction suffered by both sides, would seem to indicate the 
irreconcilability of the two countries' interests. True enough, 
the period between the two wars produced a whole range of 
mutually advantageous economic -- and even military-technical -- 
cooperation. That was the period when the average German 
realized that the situation in Germany develops well whenever 
its relations with Russia are good. 
  Russia needs a new East Asian and Pacific policy. 
Its backbone must be provided by relations with China as its 
main partner not only in the region but also in the broader 
global context. The positive potential in the history of 
Russian-Chinese relations is much more powerful than the 
negative. Both countries' interest in the preservation of each 
other's integrity is a most important factor of Russian-Chinese 
collaboration. The complexity of the problem of the Korean 
state's unification also prompts China and Russia alike in the 
direction of a unified approach toward maintaining the 
immutability of World War II's results in the Far East. Both 
countries are reliable partners in the cause of unconditionally 
observing the Yalta Conference decisions on the Far East, in 
other words confirming Outer Mongolia's status and the fact that 
the Kuril Islands and South Sakhalin belong to Russia. 
  It is possible to define the following long-term 
interests of the security of the Russian Federation: 
  -- Preserving general stability in the world, capable of 
resisting local armed conflicts. 
  -- Eliminating the seats of tension close to the Russian 
Federation's territory and fraught with the explosion of armed 
conflicts. 
  -- Maintaining normal relations with all states, primarily 
with European and Asian states, and elevating these relations to 
the level of partnership. 
  -- Strengthening and developing the peacemaking potential of 
the United Nations, the CSCE, and others with a view to the 
earliest possible political settlement of conflicts threatening 
to evolve into armed clashes. 
  -- The further deepening of the process of disarmament 
offers 
an opportunity to reduce the Russian Armed Forces to the minimum 
level necessary to ensure external security and honor the 
Russian Federation's international commitments. 
  -- Restoring the Russian Federation's international prestige 
as the legitimate heir of the former Soviet Union and a great 
power recognized by the world community. 
  The fewer the forces being diverted externally, the faster 
will the establishment of Russian statehood proceed. In the 
conditions of the world's deepening interdependence, this can 
happen if the international situation remains stable for a 
number of years on end, without armed conflicts capable of 
shaking this stability. 
  At the same time, it is impossible to rule out the 
probability of local conflicts flaring in regions where there 
are confrontations along religious, nationalist, or other lines. 
Unfortunately, these regions lie along the former Soviet Union's 
southwestern and southern borders. 
  It is in Russia's interests to eliminate any local conflicts 
developing in the world by political means and as swiftly as 
possible. This is why the Russian Federation must support by 
all possible means the political peacemaking potential of the 
United Nations, the CSCE, and other international organizations. 
  It is in our interests to follow, jointly with the other 
powers, the path of deeper reductions of armaments and armed 
forces, guided by the principle of sufficiency for defense. 
Sensible reductions of Russia's Armed Forces and armaments will 
not only ease the economic burden but will also make it possible 
to utilize the high technological potential of defense 
enterprises for the Russian economy's recovery. When 
determining the size of the armed forces Russia needs, it is 
also necessary to consider its commitments for the maintenance 
of universal peace. 
  Russia's medium-term interests include normalizing 
and stabilizing both its domestic situation and the situation in 
its immediate environment -- the CIS countries, Yugoslavia, and 
Afghanistan. They include: 
  -- Normalizing and stabilizing relations with CIS countries, 
reaching agreement with them both on the coordination of common 
policy and on specific actions in the sphere of mutual security. 
  -- Elaborating and introducing a system of collaboration 
with 
NATO countries, strengthening ties between CIS countries in the 
defense sphere. 
  -- Achieving an accord, acceptable to Russia, on settling 
the 
question concerning the southern islands of the Kurils chain so 
as to lift the barrier to the development of relations of 
cooperation with Japan. 
  -- Agreement with the PRC, enshrining the fact that the 
sides 
have no reciprocal territorial claims. 
  -- Normalizing relations with the Afghanistan-Pakistan-Iran 
triangle with a view to elaborating an agreement on mutual 
recognition, inviolability of borders, and establishment of 
cooperation, including in the defense sphere, but without in any 
way infringing upon the close relations with India. 
  -- Establishing normal relations with all states which will 
emerge in the place of the former Yugoslav Federation. 
  Special attention must be given to conflicts flaring both 
within and between CIS countries, including armed conflicts. 
  There is no time to be lost, therefore the task of 
normalizing and stabilizing relations with the CIS countries 
cannot be put off and must be included among medium-term tasks. 
  Awareness of the community of interests in ensuring 
collective defense will be an important factor of the 
development of centripetal forces. 
  The next two to four years will be especially important 
for the Russian Federation's future. It will be virtually 
impossible to resolve the tasks of economic revival without 
eliminating conflicts and their potential sources. Proceeding 
from this premise, it is possible to define the following 
short-term interests of the Russian Federation's 
security: 
  -- Terminating interethnic conflicts in regions adjoining 
the 
Russian Federation's Caucasian border. 
  -- Reaching accord on an economic area within the framework 
of the former Soviet Union and the appropriate border regime 
between states. 
  -- Implementing the accord concerning the state border 
security regime along the entire perimeter of the former Soviet 
Union. 
  -- Reaching accord between the Russian Federation and other 
CIS states on questions of protection against nuclear attack and 
of strengthening the international regime for the 
nonproliferation of nuclear weapons. 
  The sobering up which is occurring in CIS states in the 
economic sphere and the growing awareness of the consequences of 
the breakdown of economic ties indicate that this avenue could 
successfully serve the solution of the tasks of ensuring 
Russia's general safety and security. It is obvious that, in 
order to organize a single economic area, it will become 
necessary to solve the questions of border regimes both between 
CIS states and along the former Soviet Union's perimeter. 
Unless this is done, it will be impossible to avoid economic 
sabotage, close the external borders (otherwise the Russian 
Federation's borders will also be penetrable), halt the rise of 
crime and especially of organized crime, and so on. 
  The most vulnerable sector of the Russian Federation's 
border lies in the regions of interethnic conflicts. It is 
therefore in our national interests to extinguish all 
interethnic conflicts along the Caucasian border and achieve the 
restoration of peace and tranquility there. 
  In today's conditions it is impossible to ensure the 
security 
of borders between CIS countries without help from the Armed 
Forces. From the political viewpoint it would be 
disadvantageous for Russia to become the first to introduce 
armed protection of borders with CIS countries. It would 
therefore be expedient to begin with a general accord on border 
regime: What will be the nature of borders, the extent to which 
Armed Forces will participate in their protection, and so on. 
  It would be expedient if the new states were to use their 
own 
forces to protect their borders. This applies especially to the 
southern borders. This section of the border has been closed in 
Russia's interests, but it is unfair for Russia alone to bear 
the responsibility and costs. 
  It is in the CIS states' national interests to receive 
guarantees against nuclear attack, the likelihood of which 
has to be taken into consideration in today's world. The 
Russian Federation is in a position to back up such guarantees. 
At the same time, however, we are interested in having all CIS 
states join the regime of nonproliferation of nuclear weapons. 
  The nuclear powers today are interested in strengthening the 
regime of nonproliferation of nuclear weapons and ruling out any 
access to them for adventurist and irresponsible politicians. 
Furthermore, joint actions by all nuclear powers in this sphere 
promote the development of relations of trust between them, 
which is also in line with the Russian Federation's interests. 
<H6>  4. Threats to the Preservation of State Stability and 
Security. Measures for Their Neutralization. </H6>
  The idea of "superpower status," based upon unrestrained 
militarization, was the primary cause of the Soviet Union's 
defeat in the "cold war" and its subsequent collapse. The 
Russian Federation's return to such a policy would pose the 
greatest threat to its statehood and security. 
  As for the external threat, its nature has changed. Whereas 
previously the armed threat originated primarily from the West, 
there is no worry originating from this direction at present. 
At the same time, it would be premature to rule out military 
danger from the southwest in the event of any protraction of the 
armed conflict in Yugoslavia, capable of involving neighboring 
countries. The conflict's religious aspect is especially 
dangerous, because we are talking about three faiths with 
adherents in many countries, including the Russian Federation. 
  Romania could also produce a seat of tension, or rather an 
outburst of Romanian great power chauvinism which has not 
abandoned the idea of re-creating a "Greater Romania" 
incorporating Moldova and the Dniester Region lands. Should 
this happen, any such actions by Romania will inevitably prompt 
reactions in Bulgaria (the Dobruja question), in Hungary 
(Transylvania), and even in Russia (the Dniester Republic). 
  A dangerous seat of military threat could develop in the 
region adjoining the Caucasian and Central Asian CIS states. 
Islamic fundamentalism comprises mighty forces and, in today's 
situation, it nurtures the hope of creating a bloc of Islamic 
states under the auspices of Pakistan, Iran, and -- less likely 
-- Turkey. Such a bloc will inevitably try to include in its 
orbit Azerbaijan, Turkmenistan, Uzbekistan, and Kazakhstan. It 
cannot be ruled out that it might attempt to influence 
Kyrgyzstan and Kazakhstan as well. 
  When evaluating this danger, it is necessary to take into 
account the changed nature of mutual relations within the 
triangle of the Russian Federation, the Arab countries, and 
Israel. The normalization of the Russian Federation's relations 
with Israel and the latter's "sustenance" through emigration 
from Russia, coupled with the fact that the Russian Federation 
has to a certain extent distanced itself from Libya and Iraq, 
are providing grounds for growing anti-Russian feelings in the 
Arab countries. 
  Finally, it would be a mistake to completely rule out the 
possibility of military pressure from the southeast or from 
China. Should this happen, demographic pressure will not be the 
only factor in operation. 
  Elaboration of national consensus on foreign policy 
questions. 
  It is an axiom that a state is strong through the unity of 
its citizens' positions. States have overcome the difficulties 
facing them most easily when there has been a community of views 
among their citizens. 
  It is important to make the majority of the population aware 
of the benefits and even the inevitability of Russia's present 
course of friendly relations with all countries while reducing 
the volume of its external commitments, primarily those imposed 
in the past for ideological reasons. 
  Continuation of the course of achieving accord on 
disarmament questions. 
  The widespread differences of opinion on whether the course 
of achieving accords on further reductions of armed forces and 
armaments is advantageous for Russia are, to a certain extent, 
harmful to the elaboration of national consensus on foreign 
policy questions. 
  The time has come to abandon propaganda declarations like 
the 
complete ban and withdrawal of nuclear weapons and to take a 
realistic point of view: A certain quantity of nuclear 
potential is a guarantee of security both for the Russian 
Federation and the CIS states. 
  In addition, it is necessary to aim, both now and in the 
foreseeable future, for a rational regulation of the balance of 
the nuclear missile potentials of Russia, the United States, 
Britain, France, and China, which remains the stabilizing 
foundation of the contemporary world order. This regulation 
ought to be implemented through deep cuts of nuclear arms, the 
strengthening of the regime of nonproliferation of mass 
destruction weapons and missile technologies, and the creation 
of a global system for the world community's protection against 
nuclear missile attack, as proposed by us. 
  The switch to this point of view will facilitate talks with 
the other nuclear powers, including talks on the most rational 
level of nuclear deterrence. 
  It is also important to emphasize that we are hoping for 
understanding of our desire for real nuclear disarmament by 
Ukraine, Kazakhstan, and Belarus. We are counting on their 
joining as soon as possible the Treaty on the Nonproliferation 
of Nuclear Weapons as nonnuclear states, and ratifying the START 
I Treaty. Unless this is done, the new treaty's future will be 
problematic. 
  Utilization of NATO's experience. 
  In the process of coordinating defense and military 
organizational development with the CIS countries, it is 
necessary to take into account the experience of both the WPO 
and NATO. The development of political ties in NATO started 
considerably earlier and along a multitude of avenues, including 
ties with the public through the North Atlantic Assembly. 
Consequently, the weak ties within the WPO did not withstand 
the political trials, whereas ties within NATO enabled this 
organization to adapt to changing circumstances. 
  Shifting the provisions of the Fundamentals of Military 
Doctrine to the practical plane. 
  A cementing role in mutual relations with CIS countries in 
the military sphere could be played by shifting the Russian 
Federation's defensive doctrine to the practical plane. Joint 
peacemaking operations by the armed forces are most profitable. 
The need for such operations in the short and medium term will 
remain great in the light of the dangerous instability in a 
series of regions of the former USSR. 
  A considerable role in the maintenance of normal mutual 
relations with nearby foreign countries could be played by the 
pooling of efforts to create a common system of CIS air defense, 
as well as a missile early warning system utilizing missile 
early warning facilities sited in regions of the former USSR 
(the Crimea, Moldova, Belarus, and elsewhere). 
  Transition to mixed manpower acquisition for the Armed 
Forces: on contract basis and under the Law on Military 
Service. 
  The growing complexity of combat equipment raises with 
increasing urgency the question of the Armed Forces' 
professionalization, and this line must be adopted as the main 
line for all military organizational development plans. At the 
same time, it must be borne in mind that the country must train 
a reserve for the event of unforeseen circumstances, and this 
demands the retention of the military service draft on certain 
conditions. 
  Such a dual structure could also prove suitable for the 
Internal Troops: Supplementing the cadre stength from the 
reserve. Such a structure has been successfully functioning for 
a long time now in the United States and Britain. The 
attachment of the reserve to territories would help solve 
political-nationality tasks by creating a sense of confidence 
and self-respect among ethnic groups and nationalities. The 
attainment of this goal will also be promoted by the Cossack 
movement's revival. The inclusion of Cossacks in the general 
reserve will make it possible to consolidate the Cossack 
movement's positive aspects. 
  Final uprooting of wars as means for solving 
international and interethnic conflicts. 
  The development of collaboration between states, the 
elaboration of mutually acceptable positions on key issues, and 
economic and political integration are increasingly becoming the 
predominant trend in international relations. Military force is 
correspondingly and gradually losing its importance as an 
instrument for exerting direct influence. It is becoming 
more of an "ultimate" means for preventing any destabilizing 
development of events and for containing or terminating any 
aggression threatening our national security. 
  This trend is exceptionally important for Russia. At present 
we cannot rely on the Armed Forces alone. They were created 
primarily on the basis of global strongarm confrontation between 
East and West and are not adequately capable of meeting the 
changed spectrum of threats to our national security. The 
current transition period in military organizational development 
is associated with the disintegration of the former USSR Armed 
Forces, the difficulties of establishing new relations between 
the republics in the defense sphere, the complexities of 
material backup for the disarmament and conversion programs, and 
finally the launch of military reform. 
  Russia military strength will, without any doubt, 
continue to serve as an "ultimate" means of deterrence against 
external threats and of ensuring our national security. 
  Taking into account the objective reduction of the role 
played by military strength as the main instrument for 
protecting Russia's national interests, the foremost task now is 
to create a system of collective responsibility by CIS states 
and by states -- former USSR republics -- which have not joined 
the Community for the maintenance of peace in the region, the 
earliest possible resolution of conflicts on its territory, and 
the elimination of seats of armed confrontation. Russia could 
initiate the creation of a Regional Security Council which, in 
its activity, would implement the UN ideas of collective 
security. 
  It is well known that the breeding ground for ethnic 
conflicts is created primarily by violations of human rights, 
the trampling of ethnic minorities' interests, the insulting of 
national dignity, and the most acute problem of protecting the 
rights and interests of the Russian population in nearby foreign 
countries. It is necessary to juridically formulate 
guarantees of legal defense, including the right to hold 
dual citizenship. This would be promoted by the creation 
of an International Commission for the Scrutiny 
[identifikatsiya] of National Legislations. 
  There have been forecasts of the inevitability of ensuring 
collective security by force and using peacemaking forces in hot 
spots on the territory of the former USSR. Without ignoring the 
role of the United Nations and the CSCE, it has to be clearly 
realized that the conflicts are occurring within the zone 
of Russian interests. This is admitted by the parties to 
the conflicts themselves when appealing to none other but 
Russia. Proceeding from this fact, it is necessary for the 
United Nations and the international community to give Russia's 
peacemaking forces a mandate to operate in the region's 
conflicts zones under UN auspices and with the status of "blue 
helmets." 
  One of Russia's most important foreign policy objectives is 
its participation in the strengthening of Eurasian security. 
Russia cannot accept the tendency toward NATO's expansion via 
the admission of East European countries to the bloc. This 
approach is akin to the building of a new "movable Berlin wall." 
  This would require the solution of many questions, both 
purely military and economic. The strategic grouping of 
Russia's troops in the West now is such that the potential 
admission of former WPO countries to the North Atlantic bloc 
would necessitate its radical restructuring involving huge 
economic expenditures, let alone any other losses the country's 
national economy will incur. 
  The formation of a collective security system must be 
switched to a new track: By proposing the disbandment of NATO 
and the formation of a new, broader, and more open structure 
with participation by Russia and the East European countries 
(possibly through the CSCE). 
  The positive experience accumulated by the CSCE must be 
extended to other regions in the world. On the basis of Russian 
interests, primarily to the Asia-Pacific region. By galvanizing 
its foreign policy in the Asia-Pacific region, Russia could 
initiate the launch of a process similar to the CSCE in this 
region and the holding of a summit conference (following the 
Helsinki model). One of the stages of this process could be the 
convening, on Russia's initiative, of the first Asia-Pacific 
interparliamentary conference in, for example, Vladivostok. 
  Two specific initiatives are proposed: To hold talks to 
define quotas for the arms trade and to create a permanent 
Conference of Arms Exporting Countries within the framework of a 
new international organization to be set up in the place of 
COCOM [Coordinating Committee for Multilateral Export Controls]. 
  There is full justification for placing ecology 
issues among the series of international security problems. 
The conclusion of an international convention on liability for 
damage dome to the environment as a result of the nuclear arms 
race could be an effective measure for the maintenance of 
"international ecological security." 
  Two main trends dominate the West's policy at 
present: 
  a) To use all possible means to push Russia into copying the 
Western, primarily the U.S., model regardless of any 
consequences for the country and the population. 
  b) To prevent Russia from taking full advantage of the 
West's 
modern technological achievements and drive it mainly toward the 
production of raw materials, fuel, and semimanufactures, in 
other words to sink the country in backwardness, in the "third 
world." 
  Many people believe that any expectations that the West and 
the United States will help the revival of a mighty and 
independent Russia are at best naive. The West is increasingly 
losing its interest in us because, first, we have lost our 
former economic and military strength and, second, we are no 
longer claiming to be creating a social alternative to the West. 
At the same time, as can be seen from B. Clinton's speeches, in 
the long term and by attracting resources for its modernization 
from Germany and Japan and possibly from France, Italy, and 
Britain, Russia could weaken competition between the Western 
powers in the economic sphere. 
  It is also worth noting the question of reviving the bipolar 
system but on a completely new basis. The idea of forming a 
"second pole" is certainly not the product of abstract 
imagination or a speculative project. The shortcomings and 
dangers of the "monopolar system" make it necessary to consider 
the alternative idea of a "second pole": The U.S. monopoly as 
the sole world leader could tragically destabilize international 
relations. By its very nature, the bipolar system offers a more 
stable basis for cooperation between the centers of world 
politics. 
  It will enable the "third world" countries, China, and 
Russia 
to protect their common and individual interests in a more or 
less organized way and, consequently, to guarantee the greater 
effectiveness of their efforts. 
  The creation of a "second pole" could also strengthen 
military-political stability in the countries adjoining it and 
could become an instrument for settling conflicts without the 
West's interference. 
  A serious motivation for this could be provided by the need 
to protect national cultural assets, to counter the expansion of 
Western mass culture, and at the same time to pool efforts for 
the shaping of competitive national cultures on the basis of the 
peoples' own vital values and the renewal of their traditions. 
Equal collaboration between all cultures could serve as a 
counterweight to the hegemony of Western mass culture which is 
being implanted. 
  Finally, a substantial justification for forming a "second 
pole" is provided by the quest for a new type of civilization to 
replace the dominant industrial-capitalist one, whose exhaustion 
and crisis are increasingly obvious and universally recognized. 
This objective could attract sympathy for the "second pole" 
among many progressive streams in the West, which are concerned 
with the quest for a new way of life. 
  Collaboration between the two centers would most probably 
lead to positive changes in the nature and content of the first 
pole's activity and give it a more realistic orientation. Even 
the actual discussion of the problems of creating a "second 
pole" could lead to favorable, albeit partial, positive changes. 
In our opinion, bipolarity will accelerate the process of 
forming a global system on the basis of the balance of interests 
and become a step in that direction. 
  All of mankind, including the Atlantic center, is interested 
in creating the "second pole" because it offers a program for 
extrication from the crisis being experienced by the whole 
world. Although the "second pole" is needed partly as a 
counterweight to the first, their relations need not be 
antagonistic but could be built on the principle of cooperation, 
including cooperation between the United States and Russia. 
  A return to the bipolar model of the world is not the only 
possible option. The multipolar system also has its advantages. 
In any case, it is important to ensure that this system 
guarantees stability and Russia occupies in it a position 
befitting the status of a great power. 
<H6>  5. Disarmament Problems </H6>
  Russia did not inherit any military-political allies from 
the 
USSR. It is objectively unable to maintain the mighty armed 
forces which the Soviet Union had. In many directions, the 
parameters of Russia's defense were moved far beyond the limits 
of its state borders. Now the country either has no such 
parameters, or they have ended up being unusually close to its 
central regions. 
  The end of the "great confrontation" between the two 
superpowers did not lead to the triumph of the principle of 
nonuse of force in international affairs as proclaimed by the 
United Nations, or to the disbandment of military-political 
alliances created, or so the explanation went, to parry "the 
Soviet military threat." Moreover, the sole remaining 
"superpower" displays a noticeably stronger desire to impose its 
will wherever it feels that U.S. interests exist, including the 
Baltic countries. 
  There is no need to explain that if Russia intends to solve 
its own problems guided by its own national 
interests, it must be strong in every respect including -- 
by no means least -- in defense questions. We have the full 
potential to do so. 
  This does not run counter to the long-term peacemaking 
guidelines proclaimed by Russia's president in his January 1992 
message to the UN Secretary General. The "principles of 
effective global and regional military-political stability" 
declared in this message also presuppose measures for mutual 
disarmament. This is precisely why Russia officially took over 
from the USSR the baton of reducing the military potentials of 
states and easing the level of international tension, it 
confirmed the commitments under international treaties and 
agreements to which the Soviet side was a party, and also signed 
in January 1993 the Russian-U.S. Treaty on the Further Reduction 
and Limitation of Strategic Offensive Arms (START II). Thus, 
the track taken by Russia in the sphere of the disarmament 
process is in line with the one which the USSR followed during 
the last years of its existence. But the different 
military-strategic conditions in which Russia now finds itself 
demand of it the elaboration of new concepts and approaches 
toward the solution of problems concerning the arms limitation 
and reduction. 
<H5>  Nuclear Disarmament Problems </H5>
  The SALT I and SALT II Soviet-U.S. agreements in the 
strategic arms limitation sphere were underpinned by the 
principle of equality and identical security which was agreed by 
the sides. Its main criterion was the ensuring of 
military-strategic equilibrium. This, in the sides' opinion, not 
only coincided with the security interests of the partners in 
the talks but also promoted the stabilization of the world 
situation. 
  But the last Soviet-U.S. Treaty on the Reduction and 
Limitation of Strategic Offensive Arms (START I) contained 
provisions making it possible to bypass this principle if 
necessary. 
  The Treaty's shortcomings included not only the universally 
known notional count of weapons which totally negated the sides' 
initially proclaimed intention to reduce their strategic 
potential by one-half, but also a series of provisions placing 
the sides in unequal conditions. 
  For example, the Treaty imposes stricter limitations on 
land-based ICBM's which have traditionally been the foundations 
of the USSR's (and now of Russia's) strategic might. At the 
same time, the most liberal interpretation has been applied to 
reduction requirements for heavy bombers, in which the United 
States enjoys a threefold advantage. 
  There is absolutely no justification for excluding from the 
Treaty's effect the strategic sea-launched cruise missiles, 
which are objectively more advantageous for the United States. 
  The Soviet side simply failed to obtain agreement from its 
partners at the talks that the ABM Treaty should be observed 
while the START I Treaty is in force. Consequently, the United 
States retained the possibility to change the strategic 
potential to its advantage by implementing the SDI program. 
  The START I Treaty has still not come into force. Despite 
this, a new -- now Russian-U.S. -- Treaty on the Further 
Reduction and Limitation of Strategic Offensive Weapons (START 
II) was signed in January 1993 following comparatively brief 
talks. But this treay is not flawless. 
  Suffice it to mention its provisions on the procedure for 
the 
conversion of ICBM's and submarine-launched ballistic missiles 
from multiple-warhead to single-warhead and the "reorientation" 
of 100 U.S. heavy bombers "for the performance of nonnuclear 
tasks." 
  The START II Treaty's provisions potentially offer the U.S. 
side an opportunity to re-install more than 4,500 nuclear 
warheads on strategic delivery platforms within the briefest of 
time frames. Bearing in mind that the total number of nuclear 
warheads the sides may hold after the reductions should not 
exceed 3,000-3,500 units, Russia runs the risk of finding itself 
in a situation whereby the United States, having for some reason 
denounced the START II Treaty, could very quickly double its 
strategic nuclear potential. Under the terms of the Treaty, 
Russia, should it wish to do the same, would not be able to 
boost its potential by more than 900 units the same way. 
  Nonetheless, Russia has ratified the START I Treaty and has 
expressed rediness to ratify the START II Treaty with all their 
shortcomings and positive aspects. 
  At the same time, it is perfectly clear that the process of 
the limitation and reduction of strategic arms will be 
continued. At some stage it will be joined by other nuclear 
powers. On what basis should these talks be conducted? What 
should be their ultimate goal? 
  The question of complete elimination of nuclear weapons will 
hardly be raised in the foreseeable future -- the other nuclear 
powers are not raising this task even as an idea. The agenda 
will evidently include the question of arriving at some maximum 
level for strategic nuclear arms to correspond with the 
so-called "minimum nuclear deterrence." Back in the past the 
USSR expressed readiness to support this idea and to discuss and 
agree its strategic meaning and basic criteria. It might 
possibly be useful to repeat this attempt. Nevertheless, 
regardless of whether this concept will be discussed on a 
multilateral or bilateral (with the United States) basis, 
Russia will have to determine: What, in its 
military-strategic position, should be meant by "minimum nuclear 
deterrence," and this should be the subsequent guiding principle 
when elaborating positions for talks on strategic nuclear arms 
and on nuclear arms in general. This will help prevent any 
reduction of Russian nuclear forces below a certain critical 
limit. It would not go amiss to also appraise the extent to 
which this criterion corresponds with the START I and START II 
Treaties. 
  When accpting the concept of "minimum nuclear deterrence" at 
the talks, it is necessary to bear in mind that this decision 
will inevitably necessitate the examination -- either in 
parallel or jointly with strategic nuclear arms -- of the 
questions of tactical nuclear arms, especially if they are 
deployed so as to reach targets on the other side's territory, 
including ship-based weapons, as well as the unconditional 
observance of the ABM Treaty. 
<H5>  Limitation of Conventional Armed Forces and Their Armaments </H5>
  The consistent process of disarmament must certainly become 
the normal policy of any peaceloving state in the 
post-confrontation period. Furthermore, the outbreaks of 
interethnic and other regional conflicts testify that the 
reduction of the potential of conventional armed forces and 
armaments is a task as important as that of reducing strategic 
and tactical nuclear potentials. 
  The continuation of talks on conventional armed forces and 
armaments is especially topical for Russia. It is necessary not 
only because it is becoming increasingly difficult to man and 
maintain such large armed forces, but also because we will have 
to honor committments under the 1990 Treaty on Conventional 
Armed Forces in Europe, the party to which was the Soviet Union 
and not Russia. This is not the same thing. 
  Therefore, strictly speaking, following the disappearance 
from the military-political arena of one of the collective 
parties to the Treaty -- the WPO -- and later on of the USSR, 
new talks ought to be held on the reduction of conventional 
armed forces in Europe and a new accord ought to be reached 
taking into account the sharp changes in the situation in this 
important region of the planet. 
  On 8 July 1992 Russia ratified the Treaty, under which it 
also committed itself to the stage-by-stage reduction of 
the numerical strength of its Army and Navy from 2.8 million to 
2.1 million men by 1995 and to 1.5 million men by the year 2000. 
At the same time, the NATO states did not embark on any 
limitation and reduction of the numerical strength of their 
armed forces and firmly refused to take naval forces -- one of 
the most important components -- into account when determining 
the military-strategic balance. Enjoying undisputed 
superiority in naval armaments capable of delivering strikes 
against land-based targets (carrier-borne aviation, sea-launched 
cruise missiles), NATO was unwilling to lose this "imbalance." 
This position is most typical of the entire "Western" approach 
toward talks on the limitation of conventional armed forces in 
Europe -- it envisaged the elimination of "imbalances" but only 
in those categories of armaments where the WPO enjoyed the 
advantage. 
  It is clear that any potential future talks cannot 
leave the question of naval armaments outside the scope of 
agreement, especially as regards armaments designed to strike 
against land-based targets. 
  The very fact of the acceptance of commitments under an 
accord elaborated for another state (the USSR) and for different 
military-strategic conditions really goes beyond the framework 
of ordinary common sense, which indicates that Russia 
ought to accept and honor only commitments which have been 
thoroughly and specifically elaborated for the Russian 
conditions. Otherwise the situation may reach the point of 
absurdity, as it did in 1993 during the withdrawal of troops 
from Germany and the attempt to deploy them in the North 
Caucasus Military District. It emerged that Russia could not do 
this without breaching several provisions of the treaty it had 
ratified. It also emerged that Russia cannot show any concern 
for its southern flank as it sees fit, since it is constrained 
by limitations under this treaty. 
  Much has been and is being said about the principle of 
"sufficiency." There is hardly a single state in the world 
which would declare that the military organizational development 
of its armed forces is guided by the principle of 
"insufficiency" or "supersufficiency." Therefore, the term of 
simple "sufficiency" is meaningless. The term "defensive 
sufficiency" or "sufficiency for defense" would be more 
appropriate to the concept of Russia's defense policy. But the 
meaning of even this term demands thorough elaboration. 
Only when this term has been given specific content, in line 
with the Russian state's military doctrine, it can and must 
provide the basis of positions for subsequent talks on arms 
limitation. 
<H6>  6. The Need To Improve the Mechanisms for Managing Military 
Organizational Development </H6>
  Any political programs of the leadership need a finetuned 
mechanism for their implementation, otherwise they will remain 
nothing but wishful thinking. In the sphere of military work, 
we are still nurturing the illusion that we are talking only of 
a partial reduction of the Armed Forces and a partial switch of 
the military economy to the manufacture of national economic 
output, and that the actual mechanism for managing military 
organizational development can remain basically the same. 
  Fundamental documents in the defense sphere are being 
implemented with difficulty. There is no doubt that the basic 
provisions of the military doctrine will create the necessary 
prerequisites for the organizational development of de facto new 
Armed Forces for Russia, for the reliable protection of its 
interests, for the elaboration of long-term military-technical 
policy, for the creation and further development of 
qualitatively new forces, and for the training and education of 
the personnel. The military doctrine approved by the 
president basically ensures that Russia will honor its 
international commitments on the reduction of armaments and 
Armed Forces and the maintenance of peace. 
  The specific application of the military doctrine in the 
sphere of the military economy is defined in the president's 
special edict No. 1850 of 11 November 1992. 
  Whereas only certain clarifying remarks can be made as 
regards the doctrine's military and military-technical aspects, 
there are doubts arising as regards the economic mechanism. 
This is because attempts are being made to retain the old 
methods of management and adapt them to the completely different 
socioeconomic conditions now developing in Russia. 
  Under the former administrative edict system of management, 
when all elements of the economic organism were not only 
subordinate to the state but also belonged to it, the main 
"mechanisms" of management were programs and plans (five-year, 
annual, and so on). The plans' ratification was followed by the 
implementation of the principle that "The plan is law and must 
be fulfilled at all costs." At times it was wrecked, more often 
than not it was fulfilled, but the "mechanism" functioned. 
  Now the situation has changed radically. Completely 
different laws operate in the market economy. Even the Law on 
Defense, adopted in 1992, enshrines that the state order, in 
other words the plan issued from above, calls for mandatory 
fulfillment only in wartime. Financial and economic incentives 
should be used in peacetime. The budget and the taxation 
system become the main instruments of management. 
  It is therefore anachronistic for the military doctrine, in 
its section on military-technical and economic foundations, to 
rely on "elaboration and implementation of long-term (up to 
10-15 years) programs for armaments and military equipment on 
the basis of state defense orders financed by the state." 
  Attention must mainly be given to a comprehensively 
substantiated and balanced defense budget. It is the budget 
that brings together the contradictory interests of various 
departments involved in the solution of tasks concerning the 
country's defense. Suffice it to recall the August-September 
1993 outburst of passions surrounding the budget at the highest 
level in Russia. This is why the budget needs independent expert 
appraisal. It will help the practical implementation of the 
doctrine's military-political provisions, and it is through the 
budget that civilian control will be exercised over the activity 
of the "power departments." 
  This is why representatives of various nonstate institutions 
advocate a public discussion of the defense budget, 
comprehensive control, and prompt accountability for its 
fuilfillment. 
  The Basic Provisions of the Military Doctrine also contain 
other weak points, which prompt criticism by the opposition. 
Indeed, a series of provisions need clarification and amendment 
to the extent that life and Russia's military-strategic 
situation will change. 
<H5>  Challenges and Potentials </H5>
  History's main lesson is that we won World War II but lost 
the leadership race which is run according to economic rules. 
Having lost its superpower status, Russia slid headlong to the 
ranks of developing countries, and now even of regressing 
countries. For the first time in the last 40 years, we are not 
threatened by the permanent danger of global military conflict. 
But the domestic instability, the chaos, the devastation 
in the economy, and the mentality of losers pose an equal threat 
to national security. 
  The fundamentally new political reality of which our 
country's citizens are becoming painfully aware is that, for the 
first time throughout its thousand-year history, Russia 
has become a dependent country. It depends at least 
on foreign creditors, the dollar-ruble rate of exchange, foreign 
aid and investments, import deliveries, and raw material prices 
on the world market. The Russian Federation's foreign policy is 
no longer fully autonomous. International banks and agreements 
are largely trying to dictate even our domestic policy. We are 
virtually without allies in the world. 
  On the other hands, there are fewer external enemies, too. 
Russia has joined the system of multipolar coordinates of 
international security. 
  The situation is significantly worse within the area of the 
former USSR. Interethnic conflicts have flared along the 
borders. The former military-political and economic alliances 
and institutions have been destroyed, new ones have either not 
been created or are not functioning. The national pride of 
Great Russians has been denigrated. 
  The choice that society and the state now have to make is 
not 
free, either. Today we have to choose from a very limited 
number of options: 
  -- either Russia will remain a fully dependent 
country, 
  -- or it will remain partially dependent, 
  -- or Russia will strive for full independence. 
  Having decided this crucial issue for ourselves, we will be 
able to choose the sole scenario for the further development of 
events. 
  It appears that only the second option is the most 
realistic. It presupposes development based mainly on reliance 
on our own strength, but with a high degree of external aid. 
But our future freedom in decisionmaking will be limited in 
proportion with the degree of dependence. 
  To paraphrase W. Churchill's famous sentence, it can be said 
about Russia that we no longer have any friends, we have only 
partners. Whether we like it or not, this world is based 
on respect for the strength of authority and the might of the 
state. Unfortunately, we cannot expect the former respect 
without having the former might. Consequently, the most 
important task of Russia's leadership over the next few years is 
to restructure the economy, modernize fixed production 
assets, and reduce the energy- and materials-intensiveness of 
production. 
  The economic, financial, political, and military might can 
be 
boosted only on this basis. Only a program for steady economic 
growth over the next 10-15 years can ensure significant progress 
in the Russian economy's successful reform. 
  Democracy is fragile. All countries that have traversed the 
long path of nurturing genuine democracy know that a young 
democracy, unless it is legally, economically, and 
sociopolitically protected, is as a rule doomed to degenerate. 
  This is the mortal danger at present. 
  All this is aggravated by the fact that the new structure of 
life we are building in Russia is still far away from genuine 
diversity. The social base of reforms remains narrow. The 
shaping of a genuine middle class -- the foundation of future 
stabilization -- took the wrong path from the very beginning. 
  The restoration of our domestic viability in the sphere of 
productivity, investments, technology, education, and 
energy is the most important task for ensuring both 
domestic and external security, stability, and independence. 
This is the basis on which the new nationwide 
ideology should be formulated. 
  The government, local administrations, and Federal Assembly 
deputies must realize: We are living in a changed and changing 
world. The independent states' economies can no longer remain 
strictly national. Differences between domestic and foreign 
policy are fading. In our relations with CIS states it is 
important to convincingly demonstrate the role of 
destructive economic nationalism and cooperate with 
them in the quest for peaceful ways to resolve ethnic crises 
threatening stability in Russia, Europe, and the world. 
  It is also necessary to be aware that, having failed to 
organize our own efficient production of competitive goods, we 
are forced to import them from abroad thus creating additional 
jobs over there rather than at home and dooming our own workers 
to unemployment and poverty. The opposite also applies. This 
is why the majority of social problems and crises in 1994 will 
be associated with the economy and with domestic and foreign 
policy. The realization of this is already halfway to solution, 
and the adoption of correct decisions is halfway to success. 
The other half will be determined by Russia's citizens -- their 
mood, new incentives for labor, discipline, and 
entrepreneurship, respect for the law, and faith in reform. 
Hundreds of correct laws may be promulgated, the world's best 
constitution may be adopted, but we will not extricate ourselves 
from the system's crisis unless man feels the need to live and 
work better. 
  The central problem in 1994 is to restore the prestige 
of state power and create an effective mechanism for the laws' 
operation and for monitoring the fulfillment of adopted 
decisions. 
  National security begins with reliable protection of 
Russia's 
citizens against any attacks and infringements. It is necessary 
to radically review the attitude toward this question, because 
the problem of human rights stands right behind it. 
Why should the assassination of one U.S. citizen in any country 
immediately result in inevitable and effective sanctions, while 
the assassination of Russian officers in Georgia and Tajikistan 
goes unpunished? The state's might was not created in order to 
remain inactive. The experience of the latest mass operations 
to impose elementary order in the capital and the country shows 
that the population will understand and support any actions by 
the authorities to put an end to crime. This does not in any 
way contradict the norms of democracy. 
  Moreover, it ought to be borne in mind that the authority of 
the Russian Federation's government, Federal Assembly, and 
president is largely determined by the quality of our 
ideas, values, and leadership and the competitiveness of our 
goods in the world market, rather than by superior military 
might. 
  We will have to solve the budget deficit problems, curb 
inflation, strengthen the regime of savings, and increase 
capital investments. We also need a taxation system and a 
legislative system capable of boosting production rather than 
hindering it. The lost heights in the spheres of health care, 
education, vocational training, and social security must be 
regained step by step. 
  Following the disintegration of the former economic ties, 
there has been a sharp deterioration of the condition of the 
Russian infrastructure as a whole, and targeted investments will 
be required there. 
  The following problems will be inevitably exacerbated in 
1994: 
  -- inflation will evolve into galloping 
hyperinflation; 
  -- the rising prices of energy sources will produce a 
"domino effect" -- a race in prices of foodstuffs, commodities, 
and services; 
  -- there will be a further slump in production and a 
series of sectors will come to a halt on a nationwide scale; 
  --there is a threat of social explosion in the further 
growth of the strike movement, whose participants will 
increasingly often, and in parallel with economic demands, make 
strictly political demands: the government's resignation, the 
president's impeachment; 
  -- society's corruption will reach an 
unprecedented scale; 
  -- the rise in crime will take mainly the path of growing 
numbers of economic crimes and gangster-like 
formations; 
  -- demographic regression: higher mortality rate, 
reduced life expectancy, declining birth rate; pensioners and 
declasse elements will die off on a massive scale; 
  -- unless effective changes are introduced in tax 
legislation, the gap between the richest and the poorest strata 
of the population will widen and will exceed all world 
indicators; 
  -- we can expect a significant increase in the number 
of Russian-speaking refugees from nearby foreign countries to 
Russia which will significantly complicate the social 
atmosphere in many regions. The government will have to firmly 
apply economic sanctions against neighboring states where the 
rights of the Russian-speaking population are violated; 
  -- new seats of interethnic conflicts will possibly 
emerge; 
  -- 1994 will see a higher proportion of private trade, 
free enterprise, and the private sector of production in 
general. But the banking system will have to be made more 
flexible and efficient with a view to encouraging the 
development of production, rather than redistribution; 
  -- potential economic progress in Russia in 1994 will depend 
largely on the restoration, at a qualitatively new level, of 
regional and international ties, partnership, and cooperation; 
  -- as national currencies are introduced in a series of CIS 
countries and the single ruble zone is being destroyed, it 
is forecast that they will be swiftly devalued against both the 
ruble and the dollar. Russia could be swamped by the flood of 
Russian bank notes being sent back. This could be worse 
than the size of any emission in terms of its inflationary 
consequences. There will be a need for emergency monetary 
reform and the introduction of a new ruble backed by the 
International Russian Bank; 
  -- fresh attempts may be made to secede from the 
Federation and the separatism of its components may be stepped 
up; 
  -- Russia today has been bled almost dry and it cannot 
continue to act as a selfless donor for nearby foreign 
countries solely on the strength of the inertia of the 
"proletarian internationalism" ideology. It can be forecast 
that there will be a tenfold increase of the number of 
attempts to illegally export commodities and raw materials from 
the Russian Federation; 
  -- in 1994 the government will inevitably face the problem 
of 
building hundreds of border checkpoints along Russia's new 
state border with all former Union republics, including 
Cossack detachments and settlements and a firm rejection of 
border "transparency." Full-scale consulates and embassies will 
have to be open and a large number of bilateral treaties and 
decisions will have to be adopted; 
  -- in contrast with the majority of government organizations 
and institutions, we are forced to forecast something which has 
been disregarded hitherto: Russia is approaching an 
ecological disaster; 
  It is necessary to promptly introduce in Russia tough 
standards of environmental quality and sanctions for 
their violation, even including criminal liability; 
  -- Russia's talents have always been and still remain 
one of its categories of national wealth. The so-called 
brain drain abroad has reached unprecendented levels at present. 
The national science, culture, art, and literature have been 
shunted to the preiphery of state interests. It can be said -- 
not just about oil and gas fields but also about the Russian 
talents -- that, by silently backing this antinational policy, 
we are "selling off" our grandchildren's heritage and depriving 
them of prospects for their intellectual and spiritual 
development; 
  -- Russia's successes in the exploration of space 
have always been and still remain a matter of national pride. 
It is necessaty to adopt a targeted program for the 
long-term preservation of science-intensive production units and 
space reasearch. To encourage private and foreign capital 
investments in space research and to create new jobs. If we 
miss the opportunity to adopt radical decisions about the future 
of science and space research, their degradation will 
become irreversible and this, in its turn, will slow down 
the growth of our country's economy and the development of its 
scientific, engineering, and industrial base. 
  Thus we can imagine what Russia's future can be 
like. We want to and can ensure that our great country is 
dominated by Peace, Spirituality, Democracy, Love for the 
Fatherland and our neighbor, in accordance with the genuine 
laws of the development of civilization. 
  In order to ensure that the proposed strategy becomes 
reality 
and part of all citizens' world outlook and is given a chance to 
succeed, it must be constructively discussed. 
  Of course, its realization will demand FAITH in our 
future, TREMENDOUS COURAGE, and mainly PATIENT AND SELFLESS WORK 
and INSPIRATION. All these qualities are inherent in the 
Russian people. 
  Let us then make our Dream a Reality! Russia is a great 
country, with a great history, a harsh present, but also a great 
future. We believe that the coming 21st century will be 
Russia's century. 

